
--**--**--
 'Then I hope this London man won't come; for I don't know what I should
 do, papa.'
 
 'Well, it would be awkward, certainly.'
 
 'I should hardly think he would come to-day.'
 
 'Why?'
 
 'Because the wind blows so.'
 
 'Wind! What ideas you have, Elfride! Who ever heard of wind stopping a
 man from doing his business? The idea of this toe of mine coming on so
 suddenly!...If he should come, you must send him up to me, I suppose,
 and then give him some food and put him to bed in some way. Dear me,
 what a nuisance all this is!'
 
 'Must he have dinner?'
 
 'Too heavy for a tired man at the end of a tedious journey.'
 
 'Tea, then?'
 
 'Not substantial enough.'
 
 'High tea, then? There is cold fowl, rabbit-pie, some pasties, and
 things of that kind.'
 
 'Yes, high tea.'
 
 'Must I pour out his tea, papa?'
 
 'Of course; you are the mistress of the house.'
 
 'What! sit there all the time with a stranger, just as if I knew him,
 and not anybody to introduce us?'
 
 'Nonsense, child, about introducing; you know better than that. A
 practical professional man, tired and hungry, who has been travelling
 ever since daylight this morning, will hardly be inclined to talk and
 air courtesies to-night. He wants food and shelter, and you must see
 that he has it, simply because I am suddenly laid up and cannot. There
 is nothing so dreadful in that, I hope? You get all kinds of stuff into
 your head from reading so many of those novels.'
 
 'Oh no; there is nothing dreadful in it when it becomes plainly a case
 of necessity like this. But, you see, you are always there when people
 come to dinner, even if we know them; and this is some strange London
--**--**--
 He then turned himself sideways, and keenly scrutinized the almost
 invisible house with an interest which the indistinct picture itself
 seemed far from adequate to create. 'Yes, that's Lord Luxellian's,' he
 said yet again after a while, as he still looked in the same direction.
 
 'What, be we going there?'
 
 'No; Endelstow Vicarage, as I have told you.'
 
 'I thought you m't have altered your mind, sir, as ye have stared that
 way at nothing so long.'
 
 'Oh no; I am interested in the house, that's all.'
 
 'Most people be, as the saying is.'
 
 'Not in the sense that I am.'
 
 'Oh!...Well, his family is no better than my own, 'a b'lieve.'
 
 'How is that?'
 
 'Hedgers and ditchers by rights. But once in ancient times one of 'em,
 when he was at work, changed clothes with King Charles the Second, and
 saved the king's life. King Charles came up to him like a common man,
 and said off-hand, "Man in the smock-frock, my name is Charles the
 Second, and that's the truth on't. Will you lend me your clothes?" "I
 don't mind if I do," said Hedger Luxellian; and they changed there and
 then. "Now mind ye," King Charles the Second said, like a common man, as
 he rode away, "if ever I come to the crown, you come to court, knock at
 the door, and say out bold, 'Is King Charles the Second at home?' Tell
 your name, and they shall let you in, and you shall be made a lord."
 Now, that was very nice of Master Charley?'
 
 'Very nice indeed.'
 
 'Well, as the story is, the king came to the throne; and some years
 after that, away went Hedger Luxellian, knocked at the king's door,
 and asked if King Charles the Second was in. "No, he isn't," they said.
--**--**--
 anywhere. They alighted; the man felt his way into the porch, and rang
 the bell.
 
 At the end of three or four minutes, spent in patient waiting without
 hearing any sounds of a response, the stranger advanced and repeated the
 call in a more decided manner. He then fancied he heard footsteps in the
 hall, and sundry movements of the door-knob, but nobody appeared.
 
 'Perhaps they beant at home,' sighed the driver. 'And I promised myself
 a bit of supper in Pa'son Swancourt's kitchen. Sich lovely mate-pize and
 figged keakes, and cider, and drops o' cordial that they do keep here!'
 
 'All right, naibours! Be ye rich men or be ye poor men, that ye must
 needs come to the world's end at this time o' night?' exclaimed a voice
 at this instant; and, turning their heads, they saw a rickety individual
 shambling round from the back door with a horn lantern dangling from his
 hand.
 
 'Time o' night, 'a b'lieve! and the clock only gone seven of 'em. Show a
 light, and let us in, William Worm.'
 
 'Oh, that you, Robert Lickpan?'
 
 'Nobody else, William Worm.'
 
 'And is the visiting man a-come?'
 
 'Yes,' said the stranger. 'Is Mr. Swancourt at home?'
 
 'That 'a is, sir. And would ye mind coming round by the back way? The
 front door is got stuck wi' the wet, as he will do sometimes; and the
 Turk can't open en. I know I am only a poor wambling man that 'ill never
 pay the Lord for my making, sir; but I can show the way in, sir.'
 
 The new arrival followed his guide through a little door in a wall, and
 then promenaded a scullery and a kitchen, along which he passed with
 eyes rigidly fixed in advance, an inbred horror of prying forbidding
--**--**--
 arranged to survey and make drawings of the aisle and tower of your
 parish church, and of the dilapidations which have been suffered to
 accrue thereto, with a view to its restoration.
 
 'My assistant, Mr. Stephen Smith, will leave London by the early train
 to-morrow morning for the purpose. Many thanks for your proposal to
 accommodate him. He will take advantage of your offer, and will
 probably reach your house at some hour of the evening. You may put every
 confidence in him, and may rely upon his discernment in the matter of
 church architecture.
 
 'Trusting that the plans for the restoration, which I shall prepare from
 the details of his survey, will prove satisfactory to yourself and Lord
 Luxellian, I am, dear sir, yours faithfully,
 
 WALTER HEWBY.'
 
 
 
 
 Chapter III
 
      'Melodious birds sing madrigals'
 
 
 That first repast in Endelstow Vicarage was a very agreeable one to
 young Stephen Smith. The table was spread, as Elfride had suggested to
 her father, with the materials for the heterogeneous meal called high
 tea--a class of refection welcome to all when away from men and towns,
 and particularly attractive to youthful palates. The table was prettily
 decked with winter flowers and leaves, amid which the eye was greeted by
 chops, chicken, pie, &c., and two huge pasties overhanging the sides of
 the dish with a cheerful aspect of abundance.
 
 At the end, towards the fireplace, appeared the tea-service, of
 old-fashioned Worcester porcelain, and behind this arose the slight
 form of Elfride, attempting to add matronly dignity to the movement of
 pouring out tea, and to have a weighty and concerned look in matters of
 marmalade, honey, and clotted cream. Having made her own meal before he
 arrived, she found to her embarrassment that there was nothing left for
 her to do but talk when not assisting him. She asked him if he would
--**--**--
 family of Swancourt have a root. Here, you see,' he continued, turning
 to the page, 'is Geoffrey, the one among my ancestors who lost a barony
 because he would cut his joke. Ah, it's the sort of us! But the story
 is too long to tell now. Ay, I'm a poor man--a poor gentleman, in fact:
 those I would be friends with, won't be friends with me; those who are
 willing to be friends with me, I am above being friends with. Beyond
 dining with a neighbouring incumbent or two, and an occasional
 chat--sometimes dinner--with Lord Luxellian, a connection of mine, I am
 in absolute solitude--absolute.'
 
 'You have your studies, your books, and your--daughter.'
 
 'Oh yes, yes; and I don't complain of poverty. Canto coram latrone.
 Well, Mr. Smith, don't let me detain you any longer in a sick room. Ha!
 that reminds me of a story I once heard in my younger days.' Here
 the vicar began a series of small private laughs, and Stephen looked
 inquiry. 'Oh, no, no! it is too bad--too bad to tell!' continued Mr.
 Swancourt in undertones of grim mirth. 'Well, go downstairs; my daughter
 must do the best she can with you this evening. Ask her to sing to
 you--she plays and sings very nicely. Good-night; I feel as if I had
 known you for five or six years. I'll ring for somebody to show you
 down.'
 
 'Never mind,' said Stephen, 'I can find the way.' And he went
 downstairs, thinking of the delightful freedom of manner in the remoter
 counties in comparison with the reserve of London.
 
 
 'I forgot to tell you that my father was rather deaf,' said Elfride
 anxiously, when Stephen entered the little drawing-room.
 
 'Never mind; I know all about it, and we are great friends,' the man of
--**--**--
 the hollowness of such expressions was but too evident to her pet, who
 darted and dodged in carefully timed counterpart.
 
 The scene down there was altogether different from that of the hills.
 A thicket of shrubs and trees enclosed the favoured spot from the
 wilderness without; even at this time of the year the grass was
 luxuriant there. No wind blew inside the protecting belt of evergreens,
 wasting its force upon the higher and stronger trees forming the outer
 margin of the grove.
 
 Then he heard a heavy person shuffling about in slippers, and calling
 'Mr. Smith!' Smith proceeded to the study, and found Mr. Swancourt. The
 young man expressed his gladness to see his host downstairs.
 
 'Oh yes; I knew I should soon be right again. I have not made the
 acquaintance of gout for more than two years, and it generally goes off
 the second night. Well, where have you been this morning? I saw you come
 in just now, I think!'
 
 'Yes; I have been for a walk.'
 
 'Start early?'
 
 'Yes.'
 
 'Very early, I think?'
 
 'Yes, it was rather early.'
 
 'Which way did you go? To the sea, I suppose. Everybody goes seaward.'
 
 'No; I followed up the river as far as the park wall.'
 
 'You are different from your kind. Well, I suppose such a wild place is
 a novelty, and so tempted you out of bed?'
 
 'Not altogether a novelty. I like it.'
 
 The youth seemed averse to explanation.
 
 'You must, you must; to go cock-watching the morning after a journey of
 fourteen or sixteen hours. But there's no accounting for tastes, and
 I am glad to see that yours are no meaner. After breakfast, but not
 before, I shall be good for a ten miles' walk, Master Smith.'
 
 Certainly there seemed nothing exaggerated in that assertion. Mr.
--**--**--
 
 'Ay, sure, we did; harder than some here and there--hee, hee!' said
 William Worm, cropping up from somewhere. 'Like slaves, 'a b'lieve--hee,
 hee! And weren't ye foaming mad, sir, when the nails wouldn't go
 straight? Mighty I! There, 'tisn't so bad to cuss and keep it in as to
 cuss and let it out, is it, sir?'
 
 'Well--why?'
 
 'Because you, sir, when ye were a-putting on the roof, only used to cuss
 in your mind, which is, I suppose, no harm at all.'
 
 'I don't think you know what goes on in my mind, Worm.'
 
 'Oh, doan't I, sir--hee, hee! Maybe I'm but a poor wambling thing, sir,
 and can't read much; but I can spell as well as some here and there.
 Doan't ye mind, sir, that blustrous night when ye asked me to hold the
 candle to ye in yer workshop, when you were making a new chair for the
 chancel?'
 
 'Yes; what of that?'
 
 'I stood with the candle, and you said you liked company, if 'twas only
 a dog or cat--maning me; and the chair wouldn't do nohow.'
 
 'Ah, I remember.'
 
 'No; the chair wouldn't do nohow. 'A was very well to look at; but,
 Lord!----'
 
 'Worm, how often have I corrected you for irreverent speaking?'
 
 '--'A was very well to look at, but you couldn't sit in the chair nohow.
 'Twas all a-twist wi' the chair, like the letter Z, directly you sat
 down upon the chair. "Get up, Worm," says you, when you seed the chair
 go all a-sway wi' me. Up you took the chair, and flung en like fire
 and brimstone to t'other end of your shop--all in a passion. "Damn the
 chair!" says I. "Just what I was thinking," says you, sir. "I could see
 it in your face, sir," says I, "and I hope you and God will forgi'e
--**--**--
 
 Elfride assented; and the little breakfast-party separated. Stephen
 rose to go and take a few final measurements at the church, the vicar
 following him to the door with a mysterious expression of inquiry on his
 face.
 
 'You'll put up with our not having family prayer this morning, I hope?'
 he whispered.
 
 'Yes; quite so,' said Stephen.
 
 'To tell you the truth,' he continued in the same undertone, 'we don't
 make a regular thing of it; but when we have strangers visiting us, I am
 strongly of opinion that it is the proper thing to do, and I always do
 it. I am very strict on that point. But you, Smith, there is something
 in your face which makes me feel quite at home; no nonsense about you,
 in short. Ah, it reminds me of a splendid story I used to hear when I
 was a helter-skelter young fellow--such a story! But'--here the vicar
 shook his head self-forbiddingly, and grimly laughed.
 
 'Was it a good story?' said young Smith, smiling too.
 
 'Oh yes; but 'tis too bad--too bad! Couldn't tell it to you for the
 world!'
 
 Stephen went across the lawn, hearing the vicar chuckling privately at
 the recollection as he withdrew.
 
 
 They started at three o'clock. The gray morning had resolved itself
 into an afternoon bright with a pale pervasive sunlight, without the
 sun itself being visible. Lightly they trotted along--the wheels nearly
 silent, the horse's hoofs clapping, almost ringing, upon the hard,
 white, turnpike road as it followed the level ridge in a perfectly
 straight line, seeming to be absorbed ultimately by the white of the
 sky.
 
 Targan Bay--which had the merit of being easily got at--was duly
 visited. They then swept round by innumerable lanes, in which not twenty
 consecutive yards were either straight or level, to the domain of Lord
--**--**--
 Surely not. Yet the motion might have been a kiss. Then both shadows
 swelled to colossal dimensions--grew distorted--vanished.
 
 Two minutes elapsed.
 
 'Ah, Miss Swancourt! I am so glad to find you. I was looking for
 you,' said a voice at her elbow--Stephen's voice. She stepped into the
 passage.
 
 'Do you know any of the members of this establishment?' said she.
 
 'Not a single one: how should I?' he replied.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter VI
 
      'Fare thee weel awhile!'
 
 
 Simultaneously with the conclusion of Stephen's remark, the sound of
 the closing of an external door in their immediate neighbourhood reached
 Elfride's ears. It came from the further side of the wing containing the
 illuminated room. She then discerned, by the aid of the dusky departing
 light, a figure, whose sex was undistinguishable, walking down the
 gravelled path by the parterre towards the river. The figure grew
 fainter, and vanished under the trees.
 
 Mr. Swancourt's voice was heard calling out their names from a distant
 corridor in the body of the building. They retraced their steps, and
 found him with his coat buttoned up and his hat on, awaiting their
 advent in a mood of self-satisfaction at having brought his search to
 a successful close. The carriage was brought round, and without further
 delay the trio drove away from the mansion, under the echoing gateway
 arch, and along by the leafless sycamores, as the stars began to kindle
 their trembling lights behind the maze of branches and twigs.
 
 No words were spoken either by youth or maiden. Her unpractised mind was
 completely occupied in fathoming its recent acquisition. The young man
 who had inspired her with such novelty of feeling, who had come directly
 from London on business to her father, having been brought by chance to
 Endelstow House had, by some means or other, acquired the privilege
--**--**--
 
 
 
 Chapter VII
 
      'No more of me you knew, my love!'
 
 
 Stephen Smith revisited Endelstow Vicarage, agreeably to his promise. He
 had a genuine artistic reason for coming, though no such reason
 seemed to be required. Six-and-thirty old seat ends, of exquisite
 fifteenth-century workmanship, were rapidly decaying in an aisle of
 the church; and it became politic to make drawings of their worm-eaten
 contours ere they were battered past recognition in the turmoil of the
 so-called restoration.
 
 He entered the house at sunset, and the world was pleasant again to
 the two fair-haired ones. A momentary pang of disappointment had,
 nevertheless, passed through Elfride when she casually discovered that
 he had not come that minute post-haste from London, but had reached the
 neighbourhood the previous evening. Surprise would have accompanied the
 feeling, had she not remembered that several tourists were haunting the
 coast at this season, and that Stephen might have chosen to do likewise.
 
 They did little besides chat that evening, Mr. Swancourt beginning to
 question his visitor, closely yet paternally, and in good part, on his
 hopes and prospects from the profession he had embraced. Stephen gave
 vague answers. The next day it rained. In the evening, when twenty-four
 hours of Elfride had completely rekindled her admirer's ardour, a game
 of chess was proposed between them.
 
 The game had its value in helping on the developments of their future.
 
 Elfride soon perceived that her opponent was but a learner. She next
 noticed that he had a very odd way of handling the pieces when castling
 or taking a man. Antecedently she would have supposed that the same
 performance must be gone through by all players in the same manner; she
 was taught by his differing action that all ordinary players, who learn
 the game by sight, unconsciously touch the men in a stereotyped way.
--**--**--
 and without reading the factitiousness of her manner.
 
 'No; not one.'
 
 'Only on your cheek?'
 
 'No.'
 
 'Forehead?'
 
 'Certainly not.'
 
 'You care for somebody else, then? Ah, I thought so!'
 
 'I am sure I do not.'
 
 'Nor for me either?'
 
 'How can I tell?' she said simply, the simplicity lying merely in the
 broad outlines of her manner and speech. There were the semitone of
 voice and half-hidden expression of eyes which tell the initiated how
 very fragile is the ice of reserve at these times.
 
 Footsteps were heard. Mr. Swancourt then entered the room, and their
 private colloquy ended.
 
 The day after this partial revelation, Mr. Swancourt proposed a drive to
 the cliffs beyond Targan Bay, a distance of three or four miles.
 
 Half an hour before the time of departure a crash was heard in the back
 yard, and presently Worm came in, saying partly to the world in general,
 partly to himself, and slightly to his auditors:
 
 'Ay, ay, sure! That frying of fish will be the end of William Worm. They
 be at it again this morning--same as ever--fizz, fizz, fizz!'
 
 'Your head bad again, Worm?' said Mr. Swancourt. 'What was that noise we
 heard in the yard?'
 
 'Ay, sir, a weak wambling man am I; and the frying have been going on in
 my poor head all through the long night and this morning as usual; and I
 was so dazed wi' it that down fell a piece of leg-wood across the shaft
 of the pony-shay, and splintered it off. "Ay," says I, "I feel it as if
 'twas my own shay; and though I've done it, and parish pay is my lot if
 I go from here, perhaps I am as independent as one here and there."'
 
 'Dear me, the shaft of the carriage broken!' cried Elfride. She was
--**--**--
 the direction of the cliffs. At the boundary of the fields nearest the
 sea she expressed a wish to dismount. The horse was tied to a post, and
 they both followed an irregular path, which ultimately terminated upon
 a flat ledge passing round the face of the huge blue-black rock at a
 height about midway between the sea and the topmost verge. There, far
 beneath and before them, lay the everlasting stretch of ocean; there,
 upon detached rocks, were the white screaming gulls, seeming ever
 intending to settle, and yet always passing on. Right and left ranked
 the toothed and zigzag line of storm-torn heights, forming the series
 which culminated in the one beneath their feet.
 
 Behind the youth and maiden was a tempting alcove and seat, formed
 naturally in the beetling mass, and wide enough to admit two or three
 persons. Elfride sat down, and Stephen sat beside her.
 
 'I am afraid it is hardly proper of us to be here, either,' she said
 half inquiringly. 'We have not known each other long enough for this
 kind of thing, have we!'
 
 'Oh yes,' he replied judicially; 'quite long enough.'
 
 'How do you know?'
 
 'It is not length of time, but the manner in which our minutes beat,
 that makes enough or not enough in our acquaintanceship.'
 
 'Yes, I see that. But I wish papa suspected or knew what a VERY NEW
 THING I am doing. He does not think of it at all.'
 
 'Darling Elfie, I wish we could be married! It is wrong for me to say
 it--I know it is--before you know more; but I wish we might be, all the
 same. Do you love me deeply, deeply?'
 
 'No!' she said in a fluster.
 
 At this point-blank denial, Stephen turned his face away decisively, and
 preserved an ominous silence; the only objects of interest on earth for
--**--**--
 little toss. 'He must be an interesting man to take up so much of your
 attention.'
 
 'Interesting!' said Stephen, his face glowing with his fervour; 'noble,
 you ought to say.'
 
 'Oh yes, yes; I forgot,' she said half satirically. 'The noblest man in
 England, as you told us last night.'
 
 'He is a fine fellow, laugh as you will, Miss Elfie.'
 
 'I know he is your hero. But what does he do? anything?'
 
 'He writes.'
 
 'What does he write? I have never heard of his name.'
 
 'Because his personality, and that of several others like him, is
 absorbed into a huge WE, namely, the impalpable entity called the
 PRESENT--a social and literary Review.'
 
 'Is he only a reviewer?'
 
 'ONLY, Elfie! Why, I can tell you it is a fine thing to be on the staff
 of the PRESENT. Finer than being a novelist considerably.'
 
 'That's a hit at me, and my poor COURT OF KELLYON CASTLE.'
 
 'No, Elfride,' he whispered; 'I didn't mean that. I mean that he is
 really a literary man of some eminence, and not altogether a reviewer.
 He writes things of a higher class than reviews, though he reviews
 a book occasionally. His ordinary productions are social and ethical
 essays--all that the PRESENT contains which is not literary reviewing.'
 
 'I admit he must be talented if he writes for the PRESENT. We have it
 sent to us irregularly. I want papa to be a subscriber, but he's so
 conservative. Now the next point in this Mr. Knight--I suppose he is a
 very good man.'
 
 'An excellent man. I shall try to be his intimate friend some day.'
 
 'But aren't you now?'
 
 'No; not so much as that,' replied Stephen, as if such a supposition
 were extravagant. 'You see, it was in this way--he came originally from
--**--**--
 'No, dear Elfride; I love you dearly.'
 
 'And I don't like you to tell me so warmly about him when you are in
 the middle of loving me. Stephen, suppose that I and this man Knight of
 yours were both drowning, and you could only save one of us----'
 
 'Yes--the stupid old proposition--which would I save?
 
 'Well, which? Not me.'
 
 'Both of you,' he said, pressing her pendent hand.
 
 'No, that won't do; only one of us.'
 
 'I cannot say; I don't know. It is disagreeable--quite a horrid idea to
 have to handle.'
 
 'A-ha, I know. You would save him, and let me drown, drown, drown; and I
 don't care about your love!'
 
 She had endeavoured to give a playful tone to her words, but the latter
 speech was rather forced in its gaiety.
 
 At this point in the discussion she trotted off to turn a corner which
 was avoided by the footpath, the road and the path reuniting at a point
 a little further on. On again making her appearance she continually
 managed to look in a direction away from him, and left him in the
 cool shade of her displeasure. Stephen was soon beaten at this game of
 indifference. He went round and entered the range of her vision.
 
 'Are you offended, Elfie? Why don't you talk?'
 
 'Save me, then, and let that Mr. Clever of yours drown. I hate him. Now,
 which would you?'
 
 'Really, Elfride, you should not press such a hard question. It is
 ridiculous.'
 
 'Then I won't be alone with you any more. Unkind, to wound me so!' She
 laughed at her own absurdity but persisted.
 
 'Come, Elfie, let's make it up and be friends.'
 
 'Say you would save me, then, and let him drown.'
 
 'I would save you--and him too.'
 
 'And let him drown. Come, or you don't love me!' she teasingly went on.
--**--**--
 'Somewhere in the kitchen garden, I think,' she replied. 'That is his
 favourite evening retreat. I will leave you now. Say all that's to be
 said--do all there is to be done. Think of me waiting anxiously for the
 end.' And she re-entered the house.
 
 She waited in the drawing-room, watching the lights sink to shadows, the
 shadows sink to darkness, until her impatience to know what had occurred
 in the garden could no longer be controlled. She passed round the
 shrubbery, unlatched the garden door, and skimmed with her keen eyes the
 whole twilighted space that the four walls enclosed and sheltered: they
 were not there. She mounted a little ladder, which had been used for
 gathering fruit, and looked over the wall into the field. This field
 extended to the limits of the glebe, which was enclosed on that side by
 a privet-hedge. Under the hedge was Mr. Swancourt, walking up and down,
 and talking aloud--to himself, as it sounded at first. No: another voice
 shouted occasional replies; and this interlocutor seemed to be on the
 other side of the hedge. The voice, though soft in quality, was not
 Stephen's.
 
 The second speaker must have been in the long-neglected garden of an old
 manor-house hard by, which, together with a small estate attached, had
 lately been purchased by a person named Troyton, whom Elfride had never
 seen. Her father might have struck up an acquaintanceship with some
 member of that family through the privet-hedge, or a stranger to the
 neighbourhood might have wandered thither.
 
 Well, there was no necessity for disturbing him.
 
 And it seemed that, after all, Stephen had not yet made his desired
 communication to her father. Again she went indoors, wondering where
 Stephen could be. For want of something better to do, she went upstairs
--**--**--
 story, but not now. There is nothing more to say now, beyond giving
 places, persons, and dates.' His voice became timidly slow at this
 point.
 
 'No; don't take trouble to say more. You are a dear honest fellow to say
 so much as you have; and it is not so dreadful either. It has become a
 normal thing that millionaires commence by going up to London with their
 tools at their back, and half-a-crown in their pockets. That sort of
 origin is getting so respected,' she continued cheerfully, 'that it is
 acquiring some of the odour of Norman ancestry.'
 
 'Ah, if I had MADE my fortune, I shouldn't mind. But I am only a
 possible maker of it as yet.'
 
 'It is quite enough. And so THIS is what your trouble was?'
 
 'I thought I was doing wrong in letting you love me without telling you
 my story; and yet I feared to do so, Elfie. I dreaded to lose you, and I
 was cowardly on that account.'
 
 'How plain everything about you seems after this explanation! Your
 peculiarities in chess-playing, the pronunciation papa noticed in your
 Latin, your odd mixture of book-knowledge with ignorance of ordinary
 social accomplishments, are accounted for in a moment. And has this
 anything to do with what I saw at Lord Luxellian's?'
 
 'What did you see?'
 
 'I saw the shadow of yourself putting a cloak round a lady. I was at the
 side door; you two were in a room with the window towards me. You came
 to me a moment later.'
 
 'She was my mother.'
 
 'Your mother THERE!' She withdrew herself to look at him silently in her
 interest.
 
 'Elfride,' said Stephen, 'I was going to tell you the remainder
 to-morrow--I have been keeping it back--I must tell it now, after all.
--**--**--
 
 'Where had I got on to, sir?'
 
 'To driving the pile,' said Mr. Swancourt.
 
 'The pile 'twas. So, as I was saying, Nat was driving the pile in this
 manner, as I might say.' Here Mr. Cannister held his walking-stick
 scrupulously vertical with his left hand, and struck a blow with great
 force on the knob of the stick with his right. 'John was steadying the
 pile so, as I might say.' Here he gave the stick a slight shake, and
 looked firmly in the various eyes around to see that before proceeding
 further his listeners well grasped the subject at that stage. 'Well,
 when Nat had struck some half-dozen blows more upon the pile, 'a stopped
 for a second or two. John, thinking he had done striking, put his hand
 upon the top o' the pile to gie en a pull, and see if 'a were firm in
 the ground.' Mr. Cannister spread his hand over the top of the stick,
 completely covering it with his palm. 'Well, so to speak, Nat hadn't
 maned to stop striking, and when John had put his hand upon the pile,
 the beetle----'
 
 'Oh dreadful!' said Elfride.
 
 'The beetle was already coming down, you see, sir. Nat just caught sight
 of his hand, but couldn't stop the blow in time. Down came the beetle
 upon poor John Smith's hand, and squashed en to a pummy.'
 
 'Dear me, dear me! poor fellow!' said the vicar, with an intonation like
 the groans of the wounded in a pianoforte performance of the 'Battle of
 Prague.'
 
 'John Smith, the master-mason?' cried Stephen hurriedly.
 
 'Ay, no other; and a better-hearted man God A'mighty never made.'
 
 'Is he so much hurt?'
 
 'I have heard,' said Mr. Swancourt, not noticing Stephen, 'that he has a
 son in London, a very promising young fellow.'
--**--**--
 
 'Elfride, what have you to say to this?' inquired her father, coming up
 immediately Stephen had retired.
 
 With feminine quickness she grasped at any straw that would enable her
 to plead his cause. 'He had told me of it,' she faltered; 'so that it is
 not a discovery in spite of him. He was just coming in to tell you.'
 
 'COMING to tell! Why hadn't he already told? I object as much, if
 not more, to his underhand concealment of this, than I do to the fact
 itself. It looks very much like his making a fool of me, and of you too.
 You and he have been about together, and corresponding together, in a
 way I don't at all approve of--in a most unseemly way. You should have
 known how improper such conduct is. A woman can't be too careful not to
 be seen alone with I-don't-know-whom.'
 
 'You saw us, papa, and have never said a word.'
 
 'My fault, of course; my fault. What the deuce could I be thinking of!
 He, a villager's son; and we, Swancourts, connections of the Luxellians.
 We have been coming to nothing for centuries, and now I believe we have
 got there. What shall I next invite here, I wonder!'
 
 Elfride began to cry at this very unpropitious aspect of affairs.
 'O papa, papa, forgive me and him! We care so much for one another,
 papa--O, so much! And what he was going to ask you is, if you will allow
 of an engagement between us till he is a gentleman as good as you. We
 are not in a hurry, dear papa; we don't want in the least to marry now;
 not until he is richer. Only will you let us be engaged, because I love
 him so, and he loves me?'
--**--**--
 accepted word.'
 
 'Let me speak, please, Elfride! My assistant, Mr. Stephen Smith, will
 leave London by the early train to-morrow morning...MANY THANKS FOR YOUR
 PROPOSAL TO ACCOMMODATE HIM...YOU MAY PUT EVERY CONFIDENCE IN HIM, and
 may rely upon his discernment in the matter of church architecture."
 Well, I repeat that Hewby ought to be ashamed of himself for making so
 much of a poor lad of that sort.'
 
 'Professional men in London,' Elfride argued, 'don't know anything about
 their clerks' fathers and mothers. They have assistants who come to
 their offices and shops for years, and hardly even know where they
 live. What they can do--what profits they can bring the firm--that's all
 London men care about. And that is helped in him by his faculty of being
 uniformly pleasant.'
 
 'Uniform pleasantness is rather a defect than a faculty. It shows that a
 man hasn't sense enough to know whom to despise.'
 
 'It shows that he acts by faith and not by sight, as those you claim
 succession from directed.'
 
 'That's some more of what he's been telling you, I suppose! Yes, I was
 inclined to suspect him, because he didn't care about sauces of any
 kind. I always did doubt a man's being a gentleman if his palate had no
 acquired tastes. An unedified palate is the irrepressible cloven foot
 of the upstart. The idea of my bringing out a bottle of my '40
 Martinez--only eleven of them left now--to a man who didn't know it from
 eighteenpenny! Then the Latin line he gave to my quotation; it was very
 cut-and-dried, very; or I, who haven't looked into a classical author
 for the last eighteen years, shouldn't have remembered it. Well,
 Elfride, you had better go to your room; you'll get over this bit of
 tomfoolery in time.'
--**--**--
 enclosed plot towards the house on the other side. It was his father,
 with his hand in a sling, taking a general moonlight view of the garden,
 and particularly of a plot of the youngest of young turnips, previous to
 closing the cottage for the night.
 
 He saluted his son with customary force. 'Hallo, Stephen! We should ha'
 been in bed in another ten minutes. Come to see what's the matter wi'
 me, I suppose, my lad?'
 
 The doctor had come and gone, and the hand had been pronounced as
 injured but slightly, though it might possibly have been considered
 a far more serious case if Mr. Smith had been a more important man.
 Stephen's anxious inquiry drew from his father words of regret at the
 inconvenience to the world of his doing nothing for the next two days,
 rather than of concern for the pain of the accident. Together they
 entered the house.
 
 John Smith--brown as autumn as to skin, white as winter as to
 clothes--was a satisfactory specimen of the village artificer in stone.
 In common with most rural mechanics, he had too much individuality to be
 a typical 'working-man'--a resultant of that beach-pebble attrition with
 his kind only to be experienced in large towns, which metamorphoses the
 unit Self into a fraction of the unit Class.
 
 There was not the speciality in his labour which distinguishes the
 handicraftsmen of towns. Though only a mason, strictly speaking, he was
 not above handling a brick, if bricks were the order of the day; or a
 slate or tile, if a roof had to be covered before the wet weather set
 in, and nobody was near who could do it better. Indeed, on one or two
 occasions in the depth of winter, when frost peremptorily forbids all
 use of the trowel, making foundations to settle, stones to fly, and
--**--**--
 my time as there is in these days--when you must make a god-almighty of
 a man to get en to hae ye--I'd have trod clay for bricks before I'd ever
 have lowered my dignity to marry, or there's no bread in nine loaves.'
 
 The discussion now dropped, and as it was getting late, Stephen bade his
 parents farewell for the evening, his mother none the less warmly
 for their sparring; for although Mrs. Smith and Stephen were always
 contending, they were never at enmity.
 
 'And possibly,' said Stephen, 'I may leave here altogether to-morrow;
 I don't know. So that if I shouldn't call again before returning to
 London, don't be alarmed, will you?'
 
 'But didn't you come for a fortnight?' said his mother. 'And haven't you
 a month's holiday altogether? They are going to turn you out, then?'
 
 'Not at all. I may stay longer; I may go. If I go, you had better say
 nothing about my having been here, for her sake. At what time of the
 morning does the carrier pass Endelstow lane?'
 
 'Seven o'clock.'
 
 And then he left them. His thoughts were, that should the vicar permit
 him to become engaged, to hope for an engagement, or in any way to think
 of his beloved Elfride, he might stay longer. Should he be forbidden to
 think of any such thing, he resolved to go at once. And the latter, even
 to young hopefulness, seemed the more probable alternative.
 
 Stephen walked back to the vicarage through the meadows, as he had come,
 surrounded by the soft musical purl of the water through little
 weirs, the modest light of the moon, the freshening smell of the dews
 out-spread around. It was a time when mere seeing is meditation, and
 meditation peace. Stephen was hardly philosopher enough to avail
--**--**--
 that favour suddenly withdrawn?'
 
 'Yes. It is not as if we had from the beginning acted in opposition to
 your papa's wishes. Only think, Elfie, how pleasant he was towards me
 but six hours ago! He liked me, praised me, never objected to my being
 alone with you.'
 
 'I believe he MUST like you now,' she cried. 'And if he found that you
 irremediably belonged to me, he would own it and help you. 'O Stephen,
 Stephen,' she burst out again, as the remembrance of his packing came
 afresh to her mind, 'I cannot bear your going away like this! It is
 too dreadful. All I have been expecting miserably killed within me like
 this!'
 
 Stephen flushed hot with impulse. 'I will not be a doubt to you--thought
 of you shall not be a misery to me!' he said. 'We will be wife and
 husband before we part for long!'
 
 She hid her face on his shoulder. 'Anything to make SURE!' she
 whispered.
 
 'I did not like to propose it immediately,' continued Stephen. 'It
 seemed to me--it seems to me now--like trying to catch you--a girl
 better in the world than I.'
 
 'Not that, indeed! And am I better in worldly station? What's the use of
 have beens? We may have been something once; we are nothing now.'
 
 Then they whispered long and earnestly together; Stephen hesitatingly
 proposing this and that plan, Elfride modifying them, with quick
 breathings, and hectic flush, and unnaturally bright eyes. It was two
 o'clock before an arrangement was finally concluded.
 
 She then told him to leave her, giving him his light to go up to his own
 room. They parted with an agreement not to meet again in the morning.
 After his door had been some time closed he heard her softly gliding
 into her chamber.
--**--**--
 he could meet her at Plymouth. Her father had been on a journey to
 Stratleigh, and returned in unusual buoyancy of spirit. It was a good
 opportunity; and since the dismissal of Stephen her father had been
 generally in a mood to make small concessions, that he might steer clear
 of large ones connected with that outcast lover of hers.
 
 'Next Thursday week I am going from home in a different direction,' said
 her father. 'In fact, I shall leave home the night before. You might
 choose the same day, for they wish to take up the carpets, or some such
 thing, I think. As I said, I don't like you to be seen in a town on
 horseback alone; but go if you will.'
 
 Thursday week. Her father had named the very day that Stephen also had
 named that morning as the earliest on which it would be of any use to
 meet her; that was, about fifteen days from the day on which he had left
 Endelstow. Fifteen days--that fragment of duration which has acquired
 such an interesting individuality from its connection with the English
 marriage law.
 
 She involuntarily looked at her father so strangely, that on becoming
 conscious of the look she paled with embarrassment. Her father, too,
 looked confused. What was he thinking of?
 
 There seemed to be a special facility offered her by a power external
 to herself in the circumstance that Mr. Swancourt had proposed to leave
 home the night previous to her wished-for day. Her father seldom took
 long journeys; seldom slept from home except perhaps on the night
 following a remote Visitation. Well, she would not inquire too curiously
 into the reason of the opportunity, nor did he, as would have been
 natural, proceed to explain it of his own accord. In matters of fact
--**--**--
 and Elfride felt it would be absurd to turn her little mare's head the
 other way. 'Still,' she thought, 'if I had a mamma at home I WOULD go
 back!'
 
 And making one of those stealthy movements by which women let their
 hearts juggle with their brains, she did put the horse's head about, as
 if unconsciously, and went at a hand-gallop towards home for more than
 a mile. By this time, from the inveterate habit of valuing what we
 have renounced directly the alternative is chosen, the thought of her
 forsaken Stephen recalled her, and she turned about, and cantered on to
 St. Launce's again.
 
 This miserable strife of thought now began to rage in all its wildness.
 Overwrought and trembling, she dropped the rein upon Pansy's shoulders,
 and vowed she would be led whither the horse would take her.
 
 Pansy slackened her pace to a walk, and walked on with her agitated
 burden for three or four minutes. At the expiration of this time they
 had come to a little by-way on the right, leading down a slope to a pool
 of water. The pony stopped, looked towards the pool, and then advanced
 and stooped to drink.
 
 Elfride looked at her watch and discovered that if she were going to
 reach St. Launce's early enough to change her dress at the Falcon,
 and get a chance of some early train to Plymouth--there were only two
 available--it was necessary to proceed at once.
 
 She was impatient. It seemed as if Pansy would never stop drinking; and
 the repose of the pool, the idle motions of the insects and flies upon
 it, the placid waving of the flags, the leaf-skeletons, like Genoese
 filigree, placidly sleeping at the bottom, by their contrast with her
 own turmoil made her impatience greater.
--**--**--
 my returning; that you will not hate me for it, Stephen! It is better
 that I should return again; indeed it is, Stephen.'
 
 'But we can't return now,' he said in a deprecatory tone.
 
 'I must! I will!'
 
 'How? When do you want to go?'
 
 'Now. Can we go at once?'
 
 The lad looked hopelessly along the platform.
 
 'If you must go, and think it wrong to remain, dearest,' said he sadly,
 'you shall. You shall do whatever you like, my Elfride. But would you in
 reality rather go now than stay till to-morrow, and go as my wife?'
 
 'Yes, yes--much--anything to go now. I must; I must!' she cried.
 
 'We ought to have done one of two things,' he answered gloomily. 'Never
 to have started, or not to have returned without being married. I don't
 like to say it, Elfride--indeed I don't; but you must be told this, that
 going back unmarried may compromise your good name in the eyes of people
 who may hear of it.'
 
 'They will not; and I must go.'
 
 'O Elfride! I am to blame for bringing you away.'
 
 'Not at all. I am the elder.'
 
 'By a month; and what's that? But never mind that now.' He looked
 around. 'Is there a train for Plymouth to-night?' he inquired of a
 guard. The guard passed on and did not speak.
 
 'Is there a train for Plymouth to-night?' said Elfride to another.
 
 'Yes, miss; the 8.10--leaves in ten minutes. You have come to the wrong
 platform; it is the other side. Change at Bristol into the night mail.
 Down that staircase, and under the line.'
 
 They ran down the staircase--Elfride first--to the booking-office, and
 into a carriage with an official standing beside the door. 'Show your
 tickets, please.' They are locked in--men about the platform accelerate
--**--**--
 field afar off. The certainty of possession had not come, and there was
 nothing to mitigate the youth's gloom, that increased with the thought
 of the parting now so near.
 
 At length she came trotting round to him, in appearance much as on the
 romantic morning of their visit to the cliff, but shorn of the radiance
 which glistened about her then. However, her comparative immunity
 from further risk and trouble had considerably composed her. Elfride's
 capacity for being wounded was only surpassed by her capacity for
 healing, which rightly or wrongly is by some considered an index of
 transientness of feeling in general.
 
 'Elfride, what did they say at the Falcon?'
 
 'Nothing. Nobody seemed curious about me. They knew I went to Plymouth,
 and I have stayed there a night now and then with Miss Bicknell. I
 rather calculated upon that.'
 
 And now parting arose like a death to these children, for it was
 imperative that she should start at once. Stephen walked beside her for
 nearly a mile. During the walk he said sadly:
 
 'Elfride, four-and-twenty hours have passed, and the thing is not done.'
 
 'But you have insured that it shall be done.'
 
 'How have I?'
 
 'O Stephen, you ask how! Do you think I could marry another man on earth
 after having gone thus far with you? Have I not shown beyond possibility
 of doubt that I can be nobody else's? Have I not irretrievably committed
 myself?--pride has stood for nothing in the face of my great love. You
 misunderstood my turning back, and I cannot explain it. It was wrong to
 go with you at all; and though it would have been worse to go further,
 it would have been better policy, perhaps. Be assured of this, that
 whenever you have a home for me--however poor and humble--and come and
--**--**--
 'Of course, of course. Well, whatever her looks are, she's as excellent
 a woman as ever breathed. She has had lately left her as absolute
 property three thousand five hundred a year, besides the devise of this
 estate--and, by the way, a large legacy came to her in satisfaction of
 dower, as it is called.'
 
 'Three thousand five hundred a year!'
 
 'And a large--well, a fair-sized--mansion in town, and a pedigree as
 long as my walking-stick; though that bears evidence of being rather a
 raked-up affair--done since the family got rich--people do those
 things now as they build ruins on maiden estates and cast antiques at
 Birmingham.'
 
 Elfride merely listened and said nothing.
 
 He continued more quietly and impressively. 'Yes, Elfride, she is
 wealthy in comparison with us, though with few connections. However, she
 will introduce you to the world a little. We are going to exchange her
 house in Baker Street for one at Kensington, for your sake. Everybody is
 going there now, she says. At Easters we shall fly to town for the usual
 three months--I shall have a curate of course by that time. Elfride, I
 am past love, you know, and I honestly confess that I married her for
 your sake. Why a woman of her standing should have thrown herself
 away upon me, God knows. But I suppose her age and plainness were too
 pronounced for a town man. With your good looks, if you now play your
 cards well, you may marry anybody. Of course, a little contrivance will
 be necessary; but there's nothing to stand between you and a husband
 with a title, that I can see. Lady Luxellian was only a squire's
 daughter. Now, don't you see how foolish the old fancy was? But come,
 she is indoors waiting to see you. It is as good as a play, too,'
--**--**--
 doubly beautiful by the contrast. Within the railings is a flower-garden
 of respectable dahlias and chrysanthemums, where a man is sweeping the
 leaves from the grass.
 
 Stephen selects a doorway, and ascends an old though wide wooden
 staircase, with moulded balusters and handrail, which in a country
 manor-house would be considered a noteworthy specimen of Renaissance
 workmanship. He reaches a door on the first floor, over which is
 painted, in black letters, 'Mr. Henry Knight'--'Barrister-at-law' being
 understood but not expressed. The wall is thick, and there is a door at
 its outer and inner face. The outer one happens to be ajar: Stephen goes
 to the other, and taps.
 
 'Come in!' from distant penetralia.
 
 First was a small anteroom, divided from the inner apartment by a
 wainscoted archway two or three yards wide. Across this archway hung
 a pair of dark-green curtains, making a mystery of all within the arch
 except the spasmodic scratching of a quill pen. Here was grouped
 a chaotic assemblage of articles--mainly old framed prints and
 paintings--leaning edgewise against the wall, like roofing slates in
 a builder's yard. All the books visible here were folios too big to be
 stolen--some lying on a heavy oak table in one corner, some on the
 floor among the pictures, the whole intermingled with old coats, hats,
 umbrellas, and walking-sticks.
 
 Stephen pushed aside the curtain, and before him sat a man writing away
 as if his life depended upon it--which it did.
 
 A man of thirty in a speckled coat, with dark brown hair, curly beard,
 and crisp moustache: the latter running into the beard on each side of
 the mouth, and, as usual, hiding the real expression of that organ under
 a chronic aspect of impassivity.
 
 'Ah, my dear fellow, I knew 'twas you,' said Knight, looking up with a
--**--**--
 'No. But I'll tell you. The young person----'
 
 'Come, that's dreadfully ungallant. But perhaps I understand the frame
 of mind a little, so go on. Your sweetheart----'
 
 'She is rather higher in the world than I am.'
 
 'As it should be.'
 
 'And her father won't hear of it, as I now stand.'
 
 'Not an uncommon case.'
 
 'And now comes what I want your advice upon. Something has happened at
 her house which makes it out of the question for us to ask her father
 again now. So we are keeping silent. In the meantime an architect in
 India has just written to Mr. Hewby to ask whether he can find for him
 a young assistant willing to go over to Bombay to prepare drawings for
 work formerly done by the engineers. The salary he offers is 350 rupees
 a month, or about 35 Pounds. Hewby has mentioned it to me, and I have
 been to Dr. Wray, who says I shall acclimatise without much illness.
 Now, would you go?'
 
 'You mean to say, because it is a possible road to the young lady.'
 
 'Yes; I was thinking I could go over and make a little money, and then
 come back and ask for her. I have the option of practising for myself
 after a year.'
 
 'Would she be staunch?'
 
 'Oh yes! For ever--to the end of her life!'
 
 'How do you know?'
 
 'Why, how do people know? Of course, she will.'
 
 Knight leant back in his chair. 'Now, though I know her thoroughly as
 she exists in your heart, Stephen, I don't know her in the flesh. All
 I want to ask is, is this idea of going to India based entirely upon a
 belief in her fidelity?'
 
 'Yes; I should not go if it were not for her.'
--**--**--
 lengthwise. Crowds--mostly of women--were surging, bustling, and pacing
 up and down. Gaslights glared from butchers' stalls, illuminating the
 lumps of flesh to splotches of orange and vermilion, like the wild
 colouring of Turner's later pictures, whilst the purl and babble of
 tongues of every pitch and mood was to this human wild-wood what the
 ripple of a brook is to the natural forest.
 
 Nearly ten minutes passed. Then Knight also came to the window.
 
 'Well, now, I call a cab and vanish down the street in the direction
 of Berkeley Square,' he said, buttoning his waistcoat and kicking his
 morning suit into a corner. Stephen rose to leave.
 
 'What a heap of literature!' remarked the young man, taking a final
 longing survey round the room, as if to abide there for ever would be
 the great pleasure of his life, yet feeling that he had almost outstayed
 his welcome-while. His eyes rested upon an arm-chair piled full of
 newspapers, magazines, and bright new volumes in green and red.
 
 'Yes,' said Knight, also looking at them and breathing a sigh of
 weariness; 'something must be done with several of them soon, I suppose.
 Stephen, you needn't hurry away for a few minutes, you know, if you want
 to stay; I am not quite ready. Overhaul those volumes whilst I put on my
 coat, and I'll walk a little way with you.'
 
 Stephen sat down beside the arm-chair and began to tumble the books
 about. Among the rest he found a novelette in one volume, THE COURT OF
 KELLYON CASTLE. By Ernest Field.
 
 'Are you going to review this?' inquired Stephen with apparent
 unconcern, and holding up Elfride's effusion.
 
 'Which? Oh, that! I may--though I don't do much light reviewing now. But
 it is reviewable.'
 
 'How do you mean?'
 
 Knight never liked to be asked what he meant. 'Mean! I mean that the
--**--**--
 musical voice--the only beautiful point in the old woman--prevented from
 being wearisome.
 
 'Now,' she said to Elfride, who, like AEneas at Carthage, was full
 of admiration for the brilliant scene, 'you will find that our
 companionless state will give us, as it does everybody, an extraordinary
 power in reading the features of our fellow-creatures here. I always
 am a listener in such places as these--not to the narratives told by my
 neighbours' tongues, but by their faces--the advantage of which is, that
 whether I am in Row, Boulevard, Rialto, or Prado, they all speak the
 same language. I may have acquired some skill in this practice through
 having been an ugly lonely woman for so many years, with nobody to give
 me information; a thing you will not consider strange when the parallel
 case is borne in mind,--how truly people who have no clocks will tell
 the time of day.'
 
 'Ay, that they will,' said Mr. Swancourt corroboratively. 'I have known
 labouring men at Endelstow and other farms who had framed complete
 systems of observation for that purpose. By means of shadows, winds,
 clouds, the movements of sheep and oxen, the singing of birds, the
 crowing of cocks, and a hundred other sights and sounds which people
 with watches in their pockets never know the existence of, they are
 able to pronounce within ten minutes of the hour almost at any required
 instant. That reminds me of an old story which I'm afraid is too
 bad--too bad to repeat.' Here the vicar shook his head and laughed
 inwardly.
 
 'Tell it--do!' said the ladies.
 
 'I mustn't quite tell it.'
 
 'That's absurd,' said Mrs. Swancourt.
 
 'It was only about a man who, by the same careful system of observation,
 was known to deceive persons for more than two years into the belief
--**--**--
 walking-sticks to their lips, occasionally laughing from far down their
 throats and with their eyes, their mouths not being concerned in the
 operation at all. Lord Luxellian then told the coachman to drive on,
 lifted his hat, smiled a smile that missed its mark and alighted on a
 total stranger, who bowed in bewilderment. Lord Luxellian looked long at
 Elfride.
 
 The look was a manly, open, and genuine look of admiration; a momentary
 tribute of a kind which any honest Englishman might have paid to
 fairness without being ashamed of the feeling, or permitting it to
 encroach in the slightest degree upon his emotional obligations as
 a husband and head of a family. Then Lord Luxellian turned away, and
 walked musingly to the upper end of the promenade.
 
 Mr. Swancourt had alighted at the same time with Elfride, crossing over
 to the Row for a few minutes to speak to a friend he recognized there;
 and his wife was thus left sole tenant of the carriage.
 
 Now, whilst this little act had been in course of performance, there
 stood among the promenading spectators a man of somewhat different
 description from the rest. Behind the general throng, in the rear of the
 chairs, and leaning against the trunk of a tree, he looked at Elfride
 with quiet and critical interest.
 
 Three points about this unobtrusive person showed promptly to
 the exercised eye that he was not a Row man pur sang. First, an
 irrepressible wrinkle or two in the waist of his frock-coat--denoting
 that he had not damned his tailor sufficiently to drive that tradesman
 up to the orthodox high pressure of cunning workmanship. Second, a
 slight slovenliness of umbrella, occasioned by its owner's habit of
 resting heavily upon it, and using it as a veritable walking-stick,
 instead of letting its point touch the ground in the most coquettish of
--**--**--
 and one to be proud of having brought out of a man who has never seen
 you.'
 
 'Ah, yes,' murmured Elfride wofully. 'But, then, see further on!'
 
 'Well the next bit is rather unkind, I must own,' said Mrs. Swancourt,
 and read on. '"Instead of this we found ourselves in the hands of some
 young lady, hardly arrived at years of discretion, to judge by the silly
 device it has been thought worth while to adopt on the title-page, with
 the idea of disguising her sex."'
 
 'I am not "silly"!' said Elfride indignantly. 'He might have called me
 anything but that.'
 
 'You are not, indeed. Well:--"Hands of a young lady...whose chapters are
 simply devoted to impossible tournaments, towers, and escapades, which
 read like flat copies of like scenes in the stories of Mr. G. P. R.
 James, and the most unreal portions of IVANHOE. The bait is so palpably
 artificial that the most credulous gudgeon turns away." Now, my dear,
 I don't see overmuch to complain of in that. It proves that you were
 clever enough to make him think of Sir Walter Scott, which is a great
 deal.'
 
 'Oh yes; though I cannot romance myself, I am able to remind him of
 those who can!' Elfride intended to hurl these words sarcastically
 at her invisible enemy, but as she had no more satirical power than a
 wood-pigeon, they merely fell in a pretty murmur from lips shaped to a
 pout.
 
 'Certainly: and that's something. Your book is good enough to be bad in
 an ordinary literary manner, and doesn't stand by itself in a melancholy
 position altogether worse than assailable.--"That interest in an
 historical romance may nowadays have any chance of being sustained, it
 is indispensable that the reader find himself under the guidance of
 some nearly extinct species of legendary, who, in addition to an impulse
--**--**--
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XVI
 
      'Then fancy shapes--as fancy can.'
 
 
 On a day about three weeks later, the Swancourt trio were sitting
 quietly in the drawing-room of The Crags, Mrs. Swancourt's house at
 Endelstow, chatting, and taking easeful survey of their previous month
 or two of town--a tangible weariness even to people whose acquaintances
 there might be counted on the fingers.
 
 A mere season in London with her practised step-mother had so advanced
 Elfride's perceptions, that her courtship by Stephen seemed emotionally
 meagre, and to have drifted back several years into a childish past.
 In regarding our mental experiences, as in visual observation, our own
 progress reads like a dwindling of that we progress from.
 
 She was seated on a low chair, looking over her romance with melancholy
 interest for the first time since she had become acquainted with the
 remarks of the PRESENT thereupon.
 
 'Still thinking of that reviewer, Elfie?'
 
 'Not of him personally; but I am thinking of his opinion. Really, on
 looking into the volume after this long time has elapsed, he seems to
 have estimated one part of it fairly enough.'
 
 'No, no; I wouldn't show the white feather now! Fancy that of all people
 in the world the writer herself should go over to the enemy. How shall
 Monmouth's men fight when Monmouth runs away?'
 
 'I don't do that. But I think he is right in some of his arguments,
 though wrong in others. And because he has some claim to my respect I
 regret all the more that he should think so mistakenly of my motives in
 one or two instances. It is more vexing to be misunderstood than to
 be misrepresented; and he misunderstands me. I cannot be easy whilst
 a person goes to rest night after night attributing to me intentions I
 never had.'
--**--**--
      'Her welcome, spoke in faltering phrase.'
 
 
 'There is Henry Knight, I declare!' said Mrs. Swancourt one day.
 
 They were gazing from the jutting angle of a wild enclosure not far from
 The Crags, which almost overhung the valley already described as leading
 up from the sea and little port of Castle Boterel. The stony escarpment
 upon which they stood had the contour of a man's face, and it was
 covered with furze as with a beard. People in the field above were
 preserved from an accidental roll down these prominences and hollows
 by a hedge on the very crest, which was doing that kindly service for
 Elfride and her mother now.
 
 Scrambling higher into the hedge and stretching her neck further over
 the furze, Elfride beheld the individual signified. He was walking
 leisurely along the little green path at the bottom, beside the stream,
 a satchel slung upon his left hip, a stout walking-stick in his hand,
 and a brown-holland sun-hat upon his head. The satchel was worn and old,
 and the outer polished surface of the leather was cracked and peeling
 off.
 
 Knight having arrived over the hills to Castle Boterel upon the top of a
 crazy omnibus, preferred to walk the remaining two miles up the valley,
 leaving his luggage to be brought on.
 
 Behind him wandered, helter-skelter, a boy of whom Knight had briefly
 inquired the way to Endelstow; and by that natural law of physics which
 causes lesser bodies to gravitate towards the greater, this boy had
 kept near to Knight, and trotted like a little dog close at his heels,
 whistling as he went, with his eyes fixed upon Knight's boots as they
 rose and fell.
 
 When they had reached a point precisely opposite that in which Mrs. and
 Miss Swancourt lay in ambush, Knight stopped and turned round.
--**--**--
 Elfride, in her turn, was not particularly attending to his words at
 this moment. She had, unconsciously to herself, a way of seizing any
 point in the remarks of an interlocutor which interested her, and
 dwelling upon it, and thinking thoughts of her own thereupon, totally
 oblivious of all that he might say in continuation. On such occasions
 she artlessly surveyed the person speaking; and then there was a time
 for a painter. Her eyes seemed to look at you, and past you, as you were
 then, into your future; and past your future into your eternity--not
 reading it, but gazing in an unused, unconscious way--her mind still
 clinging to its original thought.
 
 This is how she was looking at Knight.
 
 Suddenly Elfride became conscious of what she was doing, and was
 painfully confused.
 
 'What were you so intent upon in me?' he inquired.
 
 'As far as I was thinking of you at all, I was thinking how clever you
 are,' she said, with a want of premeditation that was startling in its
 honesty and simplicity.
 
 Feeling restless now that she had so unwittingly spoken, she arose and
 stepped to the window, having heard the voices of her father and Mrs.
 Swancourt coming up below the terrace. 'Here they are,' she said, going
 out. Knight walked out upon the lawn behind her. She stood upon the edge
 of the terrace, close to the stone balustrade, and looked towards the
 sun, hanging over a glade just now fair as Tempe's vale, up which her
 father was walking.
 
 Knight could not help looking at her. The sun was within ten degrees
 of the horizon, and its warm light flooded her face and heightened the
 bright rose colour of her cheeks to a vermilion red, their moderate pink
 hue being only seen in its natural tone where the cheek curved round
--**--**--
 'I don't agree to it. And you needn't get so angry with me; I am not
 worth it.'
 
 'Indeed you are. You are worth the enmity of princes, as was said of
 such another. Now, then, will you clasp your hands behind my neck, that
 I may carry you down without hurting you?'
 
 'No, no.'
 
 'You had better, or I shall foreclose.'
 
 'What's that!'
 
 'Deprive you of your chance.'
 
 Elfride gave a little toss.
 
 'Now, don't writhe so when I attempt to carry you.'
 
 'I can't help it.'
 
 'Then submit quietly.'
 
 'I don't care. I don't care,' she murmured in languid tones and with
 closed eyes.
 
 He took her into his arms, entered the turret, and with slow and
 cautious steps descended round and round. Then, with the gentleness of
 a nursing mother, he attended to the cut on her arm. During his progress
 through the operations of wiping it and binding it up anew, her face
 changed its aspect from pained indifference to something like bashful
 interest, interspersed with small tremors and shudders of a trifling
 kind.
 
 In the centre of each pale cheek a small red spot the size of a wafer
 had now made its appearance, and continued to grow larger. Elfride
 momentarily expected a recurrence to the lecture on her foolishness, but
 Knight said no more than this--
 
 'Promise me NEVER to walk on that parapet again.'
 
 'It will be pulled down soon: so I do.' In a few minutes she continued
 in a lower tone, and seriously, 'You are familiar of course, as
 everybody is, with those strange sensations we sometimes have, that our
 life for the moment exists in duplicate.'
 
 'That we have lived through that moment before?'
 
 'Or shall again. Well, I felt on the tower that something similar to
 that scene is again to be common to us both.'
--**--**--
 
 'Let us play, by all means, if you wish it,' said Knight.
 
 So, when breakfast was over, the combatants withdrew to the quiet of the
 library, and the door was closed. Elfride seemed to have an idea
 that her conduct was rather ill-regulated and startlingly free from
 conventional restraint. And worse, she fancied upon Knight's face a
 slightly amused look at her proceedings.
 
 'You think me foolish, I suppose,' she said recklessly; 'but I want to
 do my very best just once, and see whether I can overcome you.'
 
 'Certainly: nothing more natural. Though I am afraid it is not the plan
 adopted by women of the world after a defeat.'
 
 'Why, pray?'
 
 'Because they know that as good as overcoming is skill in effacing
 recollection of being overcome, and turn their attention to that
 entirely.'
 
 'I am wrong again, of course.'
 
 'Perhaps your wrong is more pleasing than their right.'
 
 'I don't quite know whether you mean that, or whether you are laughing
 at me,' she said, looking doubtingly at him, yet inclining to accept the
 more flattering interpretation. 'I am almost sure you think it vanity in
 me to think I am a match for you. Well, if you do, I say that vanity is
 no crime in such a case.'
 
 'Well, perhaps not. Though it is hardly a virtue.'
 
 'Oh yes, in battle! Nelson's bravery lay in his vanity.'
 
 'Indeed! Then so did his death.'
 
 Oh no, no! For it is written in the book of the prophet Shakespeare--
 
 
    "Fear and be slain? no worse can come to fight;
     And fight and die, is death destroying death!"
 
 
 And down they sat, and the contest began, Elfride having the first move.
 The game progressed. Elfride's heart beat so violently that she could
 not sit still. Her dread was lest he should hear it. And he did discover
--**--**--
 
 'That is to be proved!' she returned proudly; and the play went on.
 
 Nothing is now heard but the ticking of a quaint old timepiece on the
 summit of a bookcase. Ten minutes pass; he captures her knight; she
 takes his knight, and looks a very Rhadamanthus.
 
 More minutes tick away; she takes his pawn and has the advantage,
 showing her sense of it rather prominently.
 
 Five minutes more: he takes her bishop: she brings things even by taking
 his knight.
 
 Three minutes: she looks bold, and takes his queen: he looks placid, and
 takes hers.
 
 Eight or ten minutes pass: he takes a pawn; she utters a little pooh!
 but not the ghost of a pawn can she take in retaliation.
 
 Ten minutes pass: he takes another pawn and says, 'Check!' She flushes,
 extricates herself by capturing his bishop, and looks triumphant. He
 immediately takes her bishop: she looks surprised.
 
 Five minutes longer: she makes a dash and takes his only remaining
 bishop; he replies by taking her only remaining knight.
 
 Two minutes: he gives check; her mind is now in a painful state of
 tension, and she shades her face with her hand.
 
 Yet a few minutes more: he takes her rook and checks again. She
 literally trembles now lest an artful surprise she has in store for him
 shall be anticipated by the artful surprise he evidently has in store
 for her.
 
 Five minutes: 'Checkmate in two moves!' exclaims Elfride.
 
 'If you can,' says Knight.
 
 'Oh, I have miscalculated; that is cruel!'
 
 'Checkmate,' says Knight; and the victory is won.
 
 Elfride arose and turned away without letting him see her face. Once in
 the hall she ran upstairs and into her room, and flung herself down upon
 her bed, weeping bitterly.
 
 
 'Where is Elfride?' said her father at luncheon.
--**--**--
 
 'Take it,' said Elfride quickly. 'I don't want to read it.'
 
 'Could you understand it?' said Knight.
 
 'As far as I looked. But I didn't care to read much.'
 
 'Why, Miss Swancourt?'
 
 'Only because I didn't wish to--that's all.'
 
 'I warned you that you might not.'
 
 'Yes, but I never supposed you would have put me there.'
 
 'Your name is not mentioned once within the four corners.'
 
 'Not my name--I know that.'
 
 'Nor your description, nor anything by which anybody would recognize
 you.'
 
 'Except myself. For what is this?' she exclaimed, taking it from him and
 opening a page. 'August 7. That's the day before yesterday. But I won't
 read it,' Elfride said, closing the book again with pretty hauteur. 'Why
 should I? I had no business to ask to see your book, and it serves me
 right.'
 
 Knight hardly recollected what he had written, and turned over the book
 to see. He came to this:
 
 'Aug. 7. Girl gets into her teens, and her self-consciousness is born.
 After a certain interval passed in infantine helplessness it begins to
 act. Simple, young, and inexperienced at first. Persons of observation
 can tell to a nicety how old this consciousness is by the skill it has
 acquired in the art necessary to its success--the art of hiding
 itself. Generally begins career by actions which are popularly termed
 showing-off. Method adopted depends in each case upon the disposition,
 rank, residence, of the young lady attempting it. Town-bred girl will
 utter some moral paradox on fast men, or love. Country miss adopts the
 more material media of taking a ghastly fence, whistling, or making your
 blood run cold by appearing to risk her neck. (MEM. On Endelstow Tower.)
 
 'An innocent vanity is of course the origin of these displays. "Look
 at me," say these youthful beginners in womanly artifice, without
--**--**--
 old lady having, for the above reason, vacated it by the second door as
 they entered by the first.
 
 Knight went to the chimney-piece, and carelessly surveyed two portraits
 on ivory.
 
 'Though these pink ladies had very rudimentary features, judging by what
 I see here,' he observed, 'they had unquestionably beautiful heads of
 hair.'
 
 'Yes; and that is everything,' said Elfride, possibly conscious of her
 own, possibly not.
 
 'Not everything; though a great deal, certainly.'
 
 'Which colour do you like best?' she ventured to ask.
 
 'More depends on its abundance than on its colour.'
 
 'Abundances being equal, may I inquire your favourite colour?'
 
 'Dark.'
 
 'I mean for women,' she said, with the minutest fall of countenance, and
 a hope that she had been misunderstood.
 
 'So do I,' Knight replied.
 
 It was impossible for any man not to know the colour of Elfride's hair.
 In women who wear it plainly such a feature may be overlooked by men not
 given to ocular intentness. But hers was always in the way. You saw her
 hair as far as you could see her sex, and knew that it was the palest
 brown. She knew instantly that Knight, being perfectly aware of this,
 had an independent standard of admiration in the matter.
 
 Elfride was thoroughly vexed. She could not but be struck with the
 honesty of his opinions, and the worst of it was, that the more they
 went against her, the more she respected them. And now, like a reckless
 gambler, she hazarded her last and best treasure. Her eyes: they were
 her all now.
 
 'What coloured eyes do you like best, Mr. Knight?' she said slowly.
 
 'Honestly, or as a compliment?'
 
 'Of course honestly; I don't want anybody's compliment!'
 
 And yet Elfride knew otherwise: that a compliment or word of approval
--**--**--
 
 'So you are to come just the same,' urged Mrs. Swancourt, for she had
 seen an almost imperceptible fall of countenance in her stepdaughter at
 Knight's announcement.
 
 Knight half promised to call on his return journey; but the uncertainty
 with which he spoke was quite enough to fill Elfride with a regretful
 interest in all he did during the few remaining hours. The curate having
 already officiated twice that day in the two churches, Mr. Swancourt had
 undertaken the whole of the evening service, and Knight read the lessons
 for him. The sun streamed across from the dilapidated west window, and
 lighted all the assembled worshippers with a golden glow, Knight as he
 read being illuminated by the same mellow lustre. Elfride at the organ
 regarded him with a throbbing sadness of mood which was fed by a sense
 of being far removed from his sphere. As he went deliberately through
 the chapter appointed--a portion of the history of Elijah--and ascended
 that magnificent climax of the wind, the earthquake, the fire, and
 the still small voice, his deep tones echoed past with such apparent
 disregard of her existence, that his presence inspired her with a
 forlorn sense of unapproachableness, which his absence would hardly have
 been able to cause.
 
 At the same time, turning her face for a moment to catch the glory of
 the dying sun as it fell on his form, her eyes were arrested by the
 shape and aspect of a woman in the west gallery. It was the bleak barren
 countenance of the widow Jethway, whom Elfride had not seen much of
 since the morning of her return with Stephen Smith. Possessing the
 smallest of competencies, this unhappy woman appeared to spend her life
 in journeyings between Endelstow Churchyard and that of a village near
--**--**--
 
 'I want to be able to play with more feeling. But I have not a good
 selection of music, sacred or secular. I wish I had a nice little
 music-library--well chosen, and that the only new pieces sent me were
 those of genuine merit.'
 
 'I am glad to hear such a wish from you. It is extraordinary how many
 women have no honest love of music as an end and not as a means, even
 leaving out those who have nothing in them. They mostly like it for its
 accessories. I have never met a woman who loves music as do ten or a
 dozen men I know.'
 
 'How would you draw the line between women with something and women with
 nothing in them?'
 
 'Well,' said Knight, reflecting a moment, 'I mean by nothing in them
 those who don't care about anything solid. This is an instance: I knew a
 man who had a young friend in whom he was much interested; in fact, they
 were going to be married. She was seemingly poetical, and he offered her
 a choice of two editions of the British poets, which she pretended to
 want badly. He said, "Which of them would you like best for me to send?"
 She said, "A pair of the prettiest earrings in Bond Street, if you don't
 mind, would be nicer than either." Now I call her a girl with not much
 in her but vanity; and so do you, I daresay.'
 
 'Oh yes,' replied Elfride with an effort.
 
 Happening to catch a glimpse of her face as she was speaking, and
 noticing that her attempt at heartiness was a miserable failure, he
 appeared to have misgivings.
 
 'You, Miss Swancourt, would not, under such circumstances, have
 preferred the nicknacks?'
 
 'No, I don't think I should, indeed,' she stammered.
--**--**--
 like them--that's what my meaning is--indeed it is, Mr. Knight.'
 
 'I am afraid I have been very harsh and rude,' said Knight, with a look
 of regret at seeing how disturbed she was. 'But seriously, if women only
 knew how they ruin their good looks by such appurtenances, I am sure
 they would never want them.'
 
 'They were lovely, and became me so!'
 
 'Not if they were like the ordinary hideous things women stuff their
 ears with nowadays--like the governor of a steam-engine, or a pair
 of scales, or gold gibbets and chains, and artists' palettes, and
 compensation pendulums, and Heaven knows what besides.'
 
 'No; they were not one of those things. So pretty--like this,' she said
 with eager animation. And she drew with the point of her parasol an
 enlarged view of one of the lamented darlings, to a scale that would
 have suited a giantess half-a-mile high.
 
 'Yes, very pretty--very,' said Knight dryly. 'How did you come to lose
 such a precious pair of articles?'
 
 'I only lost one--nobody ever loses both at the same time.'
 
 She made this remark with embarrassment, and a nervous movement of
 the fingers. Seeing that the loss occurred whilst Stephen Smith was
 attempting to kiss her for the first time on the cliff, her confusion
 was hardly to be wondered at. The question had been awkward, and
 received no direct answer.
 
 Knight seemed not to notice her manner.
 
 'Oh, nobody ever loses both--I see. And certainly the fact that it was a
 case of loss takes away all odour of vanity from your choice.'
 
 'As I never know whether you are in earnest, I don't now,' she said,
 looking up inquiringly at the hairy face of the oracle. And coming
 gallantly to her own rescue, 'If I really seem vain, it is that I am
--**--**--
 
 'There's a bright star exactly over me.'
 
 'Each bright star is overhead somewhere.'
 
 'Is it? Oh yes, of course. Where is that one?' and she pointed with her
 finger.
 
 'That is poised like a white hawk over one of the Cape Verde Islands.'
 
 'And that?'
 
 'Looking down upon the source of the Nile.'
 
 'And that lonely quiet-looking one?'
 
 'He watches the North Pole, and has no less than the whole equator for
 his horizon. And that idle one low down upon the ground, that we have
 almost rolled away from, is in India--over the head of a young friend of
 mine, who very possibly looks at the star in our zenith, as it hangs
 low upon his horizon, and thinks of it as marking where his true love
 dwells.'
 
 Elfride glanced at Knight with misgiving. Did he mean her? She could not
 see his features; but his attitude seemed to show unconsciousness.
 
 'The star is over MY head,' she said with hesitation.
 
 'Or anybody else's in England.'
 
 'Oh yes, I see:' she breathed her relief.
 
 'His parents, I believe, are natives of this county. I don't know
 them, though I have been in correspondence with him for many years till
 lately. Fortunately or unfortunately for him he fell in love, and then
 went to Bombay. Since that time I have heard very little of him.'
 
 Knight went no further in his volunteered statement, and though Elfride
 at one moment was inclined to profit by the lessons in honesty he had
 just been giving her, the flesh was weak, and the intention dispersed
 into silence. There seemed a reproach in Knight's blind words, and yet
 she was not able to clearly define any disloyalty that she had been
 guilty of.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XX
 
      'A distant dearness in the hill.'
 
 
 Knight turned his back upon the parish of Endelstow, and crossed over to
--**--**--
 to Barwith Strand, a local lion which neither Mrs. Swancourt nor Knight
 had seen. Knight scented romantic occasions from afar, and foresaw that
 such a one might be expected before the coming night.
 
 The journey was along a road by neutral green hills, upon which
 hedgerows lay trailing like ropes on a quay. Gaps in these uplands
 revealed the blue sea, flecked with a few dashes of white and a solitary
 white sail, the whole brimming up to a keen horizon which lay like a
 line ruled from hillside to hillside. Then they rolled down a pass, the
 chocolate-toned rocks forming a wall on both sides, from one of which
 fell a heavy jagged shade over half the roadway. A spout of fresh water
 burst from an occasional crevice, and pattering down upon broad green
 leaves, ran along as a rivulet at the bottom. Unkempt locks of heather
 overhung the brow of each steep, whence at divers points a bramble swung
 forth into mid-air, snatching at their head-dresses like a claw.
 
 They mounted the last crest, and the bay which was to be the end of
 their pilgrimage burst upon them. The ocean blueness deepened its colour
 as it stretched to the foot of the crags, where it terminated in a
 fringe of white--silent at this distance, though moving and heaving
 like a counterpane upon a restless sleeper. The shadowed hollows of the
 purple and brown rocks would have been called blue had not that tint
 been so entirely appropriated by the water beside them.
 
 The carriage was put up at a little cottage with a shed attached, and
 an ostler and the coachman carried the hamper of provisions down to the
 shore.
 
 Knight found his opportunity. 'I did not forget your wish,' he began,
 when they were apart from their friends.
--**--**--
 At the same time a slight constraint of manner was visible between
 them for the remainder of the afternoon. The tide turned, and they were
 obliged to ascend to higher ground. The day glided on to its end with
 the usual quiet dreamy passivity of such occasions--when every deed done
 and thing thought is in endeavouring to avoid doing and thinking
 more. Looking idly over the verge of a crag, they beheld their stone
 dining-table gradually being splashed upon and their crumbs and
 fragments all washed away by the incoming sea. The vicar drew a moral
 lesson from the scene; Knight replied in the same satisfied strain. And
 then the waves rolled in furiously--the neutral green-and-blue tongues
 of water slid up the slopes, and were metamorphosed into foam by a
 careless blow, falling back white and faint, and leaving trailing
 followers behind.
 
 The passing of a heavy shower was the next scene--driving them to
 shelter in a shallow cave--after which the horses were put in, and they
 started to return homeward. By the time they reached the higher levels
 the sky had again cleared, and the sunset rays glanced directly upon
 the wet uphill road they had climbed. The ruts formed by their
 carriage-wheels on the ascent--a pair of Liliputian canals--were as
 shining bars of gold, tapering to nothing in the distance. Upon this
 also they turned their backs, and night spread over the sea.
 
 The evening was chilly, and there was no moon. Knight sat close to
 Elfride, and, when the darkness rendered the position of a person a
 matter of uncertainty, particularly close. Elfride edged away.
 
 'I hope you allow me my place ungrudgingly?' he whispered.
 
 'Oh yes; 'tis the least I can do in common civility,' she said,
 accenting the words so that he might recognize them as his own returned.
--**--**--
 
 'At the end of the week, I said, papa.'
 
 Her father did not reply, and Elfride left the room.
 
 She began to look out for the postman again. Three mornings later he
 brought an inland letter from Stephen. It contained very little matter,
 having been written in haste; but the meaning was bulky enough. Stephen
 said that, having executed a commission in Liverpool, he should arrive
 at his father's house, East Endelstow, at five or six o'clock that same
 evening; that he would after dusk walk on to the next village, and meet
 her, if she would, in the church porch, as in the old time. He proposed
 this plan because he thought it unadvisable to call formally at her
 house so late in the evening; yet he could not sleep without having seen
 her. The minutes would seem hours till he clasped her in his arms.
 
 Elfride was still steadfast in her opinion that honour compelled her to
 meet him. Probably the very longing to avoid him lent additional weight
 to the conviction; for she was markedly one of those who sigh for the
 unattainable--to whom, superlatively, a hope is pleasing because not a
 possession. And she knew it so well that her intellect was inclined to
 exaggerate this defect in herself.
 
 So during the day she looked her duty steadfastly in the face; read
 Wordsworth's astringent yet depressing ode to that Deity; committed
 herself to her guidance; and still felt the weight of chance desires.
 
 But she began to take a melancholy pleasure in contemplating the
 sacrifice of herself to the man whom a maidenly sense of propriety
 compelled her to regard as her only possible husband. She would meet
 him, and do all that lay in her power to marry him. To guard against
 a relapse, a note was at once despatched to his father's cottage for
--**--**--
 turned back, and alighted on the ground behind them. They themselves
 were in a dead calm.
 
 'A boat crosses Niagara immediately at the foot of the falls, where
 the water is quite still, the fallen mass curving under it. We are in
 precisely the same position with regard to our atmospheric cataract
 here. If you run back from the cliff fifty yards, you will be in a brisk
 wind. Now I daresay over the bank is a little backward current.'
 
 Knight rose and leant over the bank. No sooner was his head above it
 than his hat appeared to be sucked from his head--slipping over his
 forehead in a seaward direction.
 
 'That's the backward eddy, as I told you,' he cried, and vanished over
 the little bank after his hat.
 
 Elfride waited one minute; he did not return. She waited another, and
 there was no sign of him.
 
 A few drops of rain fell, then a sudden shower.
 
 She arose, and looked over the bank. On the other side were two or three
 yards of level ground--then a short steep preparatory slope--then the
 verge of the precipice.
 
 On the slope was Knight, his hat on his head. He was on his hands and
 knees, trying to climb back to the level ground. The rain had wetted the
 shaly surface of the incline. A slight superficial wetting of the soil
 hereabout made it far more slippery to stand on than the same soil
 thoroughly drenched. The inner substance was still hard, and was
 lubricated by the moistened film.
 
 'I find a difficulty in getting back,' said Knight.
 
 Elfride's heart fell like lead.
 
 'But you can get back?' she wildly inquired.
 
 Knight strove with all his might for two or three minutes, and the drops
 of perspiration began to bead his brow.
--**--**--
 precision of machines, they were over the edge and whirling in mid-air.
 
 For this purpose it was necessary that he should recover the breath and
 strength which his previous efforts had cost him. So he still waited,
 and looked in the face of the enemy.
 
 The crest of this terrible natural facade passed among the neighbouring
 inhabitants as being seven hundred feet above the water it overhung.
 It had been proved by actual measurement to be not a foot less than six
 hundred and fifty.
 
 That is to say, it is nearly three times the height of Flamborough, half
 as high again as the South Foreland, a hundred feet higher than
 Beachy Head--the loftiest promontory on the east or south side of this
 island--twice the height of St. Aldhelm's, thrice as high as the Lizard,
 and just double the height of St. Bee's. One sea-bord point on the
 western coast is known to surpass it in altitude, but only by a few
 feet. This is Great Orme's Head, in Caernarvonshire.
 
 And it must be remembered that the cliff exhibits an intensifying
 feature which some of those are without--sheer perpendicularity from the
 half-tide level.
 
 Yet this remarkable rampart forms no headland: it rather walls in an
 inlet--the promontory on each side being much lower. Thus, far from
 being salient, its horizontal section is concave. The sea, rolling
 direct from the shores of North America, has in fact eaten a chasm into
 the middle of a hill, and the giant, embayed and unobtrusive, stands in
 the rear of pigmy supporters. Not least singularly, neither hill, chasm,
 nor precipice has a name. On this account I will call the precipice the
 Cliff without a Name.*
 
      * See Preface
 
 What gave an added terror to its height was its blackness. And upon this
--**--**--
 inveterate antagonism of these black precipices to all strugglers for
 life is in no way more forcibly suggested than by the paucity of tufts
 of grass, lichens, or confervae on their outermost ledges.
 
 Knight pondered on the meaning of Elfride's hasty disappearance, but
 could not avoid an instinctive conclusion that there existed but a
 doubtful hope for him. As far as he could judge, his sole chance of
 deliverance lay in the possibility of a rope or pole being brought; and
 this possibility was remote indeed. The soil upon these high downs was
 left so untended that they were unenclosed for miles, except by a
 casual bank or dry wall, and were rarely visited but for the purpose
 of collecting or counting the flock which found a scanty means of
 subsistence thereon.
 
 At first, when death appeared improbable, because it had never visited
 him before, Knight could think of no future, nor of anything connected
 with his past. He could only look sternly at Nature's treacherous
 attempt to put an end to him, and strive to thwart her.
 
 From the fact that the cliff formed the inner face of the segment of a
 huge cylinder, having the sky for a top and the sea for a bottom, which
 enclosed the cove to the extent of more than a semicircle, he could see
 the vertical face curving round on each side of him. He looked far down
 the facade, and realized more thoroughly how it threatened him. Grimness
 was in every feature, and to its very bowels the inimical shape was
 desolation.
 
 By one of those familiar conjunctions of things wherewith the inanimate
 world baits the mind of man when he pauses in moments of suspense,
 opposite Knight's eyes was an imbedded fossil, standing forth in low
 relief from the rock. It was a creature with eyes. The eyes, dead and
--**--**--
 seemed to cling to her like a glove.
 
 Without heeding the attack of the clouds further than by raising her
 hand and wiping away the spirts of rain when they went more particularly
 into her eyes, she sat down and hurriedly began rending the linen into
 strips. These she knotted end to end, and afterwards twisted them like
 the strands of a cord. In a short space of time she had formed a perfect
 rope by this means, six or seven yards long.
 
 'Can you wait while I bind it?' she said, anxiously extending her gaze
 down to him.
 
 'Yes, if not very long. Hope has given me a wonderful instalment of
 strength.'
 
 Elfride dropped her eyes again, tore the remaining material into narrow
 tape-like ligaments, knotted each to each as before, but on a smaller
 scale, and wound the lengthy string she had thus formed round and round
 the linen rope, which, without this binding, had a tendency to spread
 abroad.
 
 'Now,' said Knight, who, watching the proceedings intently, had by this
 time not only grasped her scheme, but reasoned further on, 'I can
 hold three minutes longer yet. And do you use the time in testing the
 strength of the knots, one by one.'
 
 She at once obeyed, tested each singly by putting her foot on the rope
 between each knot, and pulling with her hands. One of the knots slipped.
 
 'Oh, think! It would have broken but for your forethought,' Elfride
 exclaimed apprehensively.
 
 She retied the two ends. The rope was now firm in every part.
 
 'When you have let it down,' said Knight, already resuming his position
 of ruling power, 'go back from the edge of the slope, and over the bank
 as far as the rope will allow you. Then lean down, and hold the end with
--**--**--
 nevertheless. He fully appreciated Elfride's girlish delicacy in
 refusing his escort in the meagre habiliments she wore, yet felt
 that necessary abstraction of herself for a short half-hour as a most
 grievous loss to him.
 
 He gathered up her knotted and twisted plumage of linen, lace, and
 embroidery work, and laid it across his arm. He noticed on the ground
 an envelope, limp and wet. In endeavouring to restore this to its proper
 shape, he loosened from the envelope a piece of paper it had contained,
 which was seized by the wind in falling from Knight's hand. It was blown
 to the right, blown to the left--it floated to the edge of the cliff and
 over the sea, where it was hurled aloft. It twirled in the air, and then
 flew back over his head.
 
 Knight followed the paper, and secured it. Having done so, he looked to
 discover if it had been worth securing.
 
 The troublesome sheet was a banker's receipt for two hundred pounds,
 placed to the credit of Miss Swancourt, which the impractical girl had
 totally forgotten she carried with her.
 
 Knight folded it as carefully as its moist condition would allow, put it
 in his pocket, and followed Elfride.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXIII
 
      'Should auld acquaintance be forgot?'
 
 
 By this time Stephen Smith had stepped out upon the quay at Castle
 Boterel, and breathed his native air.
 
 A darker skin, a more pronounced moustache, and an incipient beard, were
 the chief additions and changes noticeable in his appearance.
 
 In spite of the falling rain, which had somewhat lessened, he took a
 small valise in his hand, and, leaving the remainder of his luggage at
 the inn, ascended the hills towards East Endelstow. This place lay in
 a vale of its own, further inland than the west village, and though so
--**--**--
 up.'
 
 Mrs. Barbara Worm, not wishing to take any mean advantage of persons
 in a muddle by observing them, removed her bonnet and mantle with eyes
 fixed upon the flowers in the plot outside the door.
 
 'What beautiful tiger-lilies!' said Mrs. Worm.
 
 'Yes, they be very well, but such a trouble to me on account of the
 children that come here. They will go eating the berries on the stem,
 and call 'em currants. Taste wi' junivals is quite fancy, really.'
 
 'And your snapdragons look as fierce as ever.'
 
 'Well, really,' answered Mrs. Smith, entering didactically into the
 subject, 'they are more like Christians than flowers. But they make up
 well enough wi' the rest, and don't require much tending. And the same
 can be said o' these miller's wheels. 'Tis a flower I like very much,
 though so simple. John says he never cares about the flowers o' 'em,
 but men have no eye for anything neat. He says his favourite flower is
 a cauliflower. And I assure you I tremble in the springtime, for 'tis
 perfect murder.'
 
 'You don't say so, Mrs. Smith!'
 
 'John digs round the roots, you know. In goes his blundering spade,
 through roots, bulbs, everything that hasn't got a good show above
 ground, turning 'em up cut all to slices. Only the very last fall I went
 to move some tulips, when I found every bulb upside down, and the stems
 crooked round. He had turned 'em over in the spring, and the cunning
 creatures had soon found that heaven was not where it used to be.'
 
 'What's that long-favoured flower under the hedge?'
 
 'They? O Lord, they are the horrid Jacob's ladders! Instead of praising
 'em, I be mad wi' 'em for being so ready to bide where they are not
 wanted. They be very well in their way, but I do not care for things
--**--**--
 'Yes,' continued the pig-killer, as one accustomed to be heard. 'One
 that I knowed was deaf and dumb, and we couldn't make out what was the
 matter wi' the pig. 'A would eat well enough when 'a seed the trough,
 but when his back was turned, you might a-rattled the bucket all day,
 the poor soul never heard ye. Ye could play tricks upon en behind his
 back, and a' wouldn't find it out no quicker than poor deaf Grammer
 Cates. But a' fatted well, and I never seed a pig open better when a'
 was killed, and 'a was very tender eating, very; as pretty a bit of mate
 as ever you see; you could suck that mate through a quill.
 
 'And another I knowed,' resumed the killer, after quietly letting a pint
 of ale run down his throat of its own accord, and setting down the
 cup with mathematical exactness upon the spot from which he had raised
 it--'another went out of his mind.'
 
 'How very mournful!' murmured Mrs. Worm.
 
 'Ay, poor thing, 'a did! As clean out of his mind as the cleverest
 Christian could go. In early life 'a was very melancholy, and never
 seemed a hopeful pig by no means. 'Twas Andrew Stainer's pig--that's
 whose pig 'twas.'
 
 'I can mind the pig well enough,' attested John Smith.
 
 'And a pretty little porker 'a was. And you all know Farmer Buckle's
 sort? Every jack o' em suffer from the rheumatism to this day, owing to
 a damp sty they lived in when they were striplings, as 'twere.'
 
 'Well, now we'll weigh,' said John.
 
 'If so be he were not so fine, we'd weigh en whole: but as he is, we'll
 take a side at a time. John, you can mind my old joke, ey?'
 
 'I do so; though 'twas a good few years ago I first heard en.'
--**--**--
 lapse of time. He was awakened from his reverie by Castle Boterel clock.
 
 One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, TEN.
 
 One little fall of the hammer in addition to the number it had been
 sharp pleasure to hear, and what a difference to him!
 
 He left the churchyard on the side opposite to his point of entrance,
 and went down the hill. Slowly he drew near the gate of her house. This
 he softly opened, and walked up the gravel drive to the door. Here he
 paused for several minutes.
 
 At the expiration of that time the murmured speech of a manly voice came
 out to his ears through an open window behind the corner of the house.
 This was responded to by a clear soft laugh. It was the laugh of
 Elfride.
 
 Stephen was conscious of a gnawing pain at his heart. He retreated as he
 had come. There are disappointments which wring us, and there are those
 which inflict a wound whose mark we bear to our graves. Such are so
 keen that no future gratification of the same desire can ever obliterate
 them: they become registered as a permanent loss of happiness. Such a
 one was Stephen's now: the crowning aureola of the dream had been the
 meeting here by stealth; and if Elfride had come to him only ten
 minutes after he had turned away, the disappointment would have been
 recognizable still.
 
 When the young man reached home he found there a letter which had
 arrived in his absence. Believing it to contain some reason for her
 non-appearance, yet unable to imagine one that could justify her, he
 hastily tore open the envelope.
 
 The paper contained not a word from Elfride. It was the deposit-note for
 his two hundred pounds. On the back was the form of a cheque, and this
--**--**--
 of the two coal brigs lying alangside, as if they had been tiny lamps
 suspended in the ropes. The masts rocked sleepily to the infinitesimal
 flux of the tide, which clucked and gurgled with idle regularity in
 nooks and holes of the harbour wall.
 
 The twilight was now quite pronounced enough for his purpose; and as,
 rather sad at heart, he was about to move on, a little boat containing
 two persons glided up the middle of the harbour with the lightness of
 a shadow. The boat came opposite him, passed on, and touched the
 landing-steps at the further end. One of its occupants was a man, as
 Stephen had known by the easy stroke of the oars. When the pair ascended
 the steps, and came into greater prominence, he was enabled to discern
 that the second personage was a woman; also that she wore a white
 decoration--apparently a feather--in her hat or bonnet, which spot of
 white was the only distinctly visible portion of her clothing.
 
 Stephen remained a moment in their rear, and they passed on, when he
 pursued his way also, and soon forgot the circumstance. Having crossed
 a bridge, forsaken the high road, and entered the footpath which led
 up the vale to West Endelstow, he heard a little wicket click softly
 together some yards ahead. By the time that Stephen had reached the
 wicket and passed it, he heard another click of precisely the same
 nature from another gate yet further on. Clearly some person or persons
 were preceding him along the path, their footsteps being rendered
 noiseless by the soft carpet of turf. Stephen now walked a little
 quicker, and perceived two forms. One of them bore aloft the white
 feather he had noticed in the woman's hat on the quay: they were the
--**--**--
 one before you?'
 
 'You are Mrs. Jethway, I think. What do you do here? And why do you talk
 so wildly?'
 
 'Because my heart is desolate, and nobody cares about it. May hers be so
 that brought trouble upon me!'
 
 'Silence!' said Stephen, staunch to Elfride in spite of himself. 'She
 would harm nobody wilfully, never would she! How do you come here?'
 
 'I saw the two coming up the path, and wanted to learn if she were not
 one of them. Can I help disliking her if I think of the past? Can I
 help watching her if I remember my boy? Can I help ill-wishing her if I
 well-wish him?'
 
 The bowed form went on, passed through the wicket, and was enveloped by
 the shadows of the field.
 
 Stephen had heard that Mrs. Jethway, since the death of her son, had
 become a crazed, forlorn woman; and bestowing a pitying thought
 upon her, he dismissed her fancied wrongs from his mind, but not her
 condemnation of Elfride's faithlessness. That entered into and mingled
 with the sensations his new experience had begotten. The tale told by
 the little scene he had witnessed ran parallel with the unhappy woman's
 opinion, which, however baseless it might have been antecedently, had
 become true enough as regarded himself.
 
 A slow weight of despair, as distinct from a violent paroxysm as
 starvation from a mortal shot, filled him and wrung him body and soul.
 The discovery had not been altogether unexpected, for throughout his
 anxiety of the last few days since the night in the churchyard, he had
 been inclined to construe the uncertainty unfavourably for himself. His
 hopes for the best had been but periodic interruptions to a chronic fear
 of the worst.
 
 A strange concomitant of his misery was the singularity of its form.
--**--**--
 
 The light in the churchyard he next discovered to have its source in a
 point very near the ground, and Stephen imagined it might come from a
 lantern in the interior of a partly-dug grave. But a nearer approach
 showed him that its position was immediately under the wall of the
 aisle, and within the mouth of an archway. He could now hear voices, and
 the truth of the whole matter began to dawn upon him. Walking on towards
 the opening, Smith discerned on his left hand a heap of earth,
 and before him a flight of stone steps which the removed earth had
 uncovered, leading down under the edifice. It was the entrance to a
 large family vault, extending under the north aisle.
 
 Stephen had never before seen it open, and descending one or two steps
 stooped to look under the arch. The vault appeared to be crowded with
 coffins, with the exception of an open central space, which had been
 necessarily kept free for ingress and access to the sides, round three
 of which the coffins were stacked in stone bins or niches.
 
 The place was well lighted with candles stuck in slips of wood that were
 fastened to the wall. On making the descent of another step the living
 inhabitants of the vault were recognizable. They were his father the
 master-mason, an under-mason, Martin Cannister, and two or three young
 and old labouring-men. Crowbars and workmen's hammers were scattered
 about. The whole company, sitting round on coffins which had been
 removed from their places, apparently for some alteration or enlargement
 of the vault, were eating bread and cheese, and drinking ale from a cup
 with two handles, passed round from each to each.
 
 'Who is dead?' Stephen inquired, stepping down.
 
 
 
 
 Chapter XXVI
 
      'To that last nothing under earth.'
--**--**--
 'Not more than seven or eight and twenty by candlelight. But, Lord! by
 day 'a was forty if 'a were an hour.'
 
 'Ay, night-time or day-time makes a difference of twenty years to rich
 feymels,' observed Martin.
 
 'She was one and thirty really,' said John Smith. 'I had it from them
 that know.'
 
 'Not more than that!'
 
 ''A looked very bad, poor lady. In faith, ye might say she was dead for
 years afore 'a would own it.'
 
 'As my old father used to say, "dead, but wouldn't drop down."'
 
 'I seed her, poor soul,' said a labourer from behind some removed
 coffins, 'only but last Valentine's-day of all the world. 'A was arm
 in crook wi' my lord. I says to myself, "You be ticketed Churchyard, my
 noble lady, although you don't dream on't."'
 
 'I suppose my lord will write to all the other lords anointed in the
 nation, to let 'em know that she that was is now no more?'
 
 ''Tis done and past. I see a bundle of letters go off an hour after the
 death. Sich wonderful black rims as they letters had--half-an-inch wide,
 at the very least.'
 
 'Too much,' observed Martin. 'In short, 'tis out of the question that
 a human being can be so mournful as black edges half-an-inch wide. I'm
 sure people don't feel more than a very narrow border when they feels
 most of all.'
 
 'And there are two little girls, are there not?' said Stephen.
 
 'Nice clane little faces!--left motherless now.'
 
 'They used to come to Parson Swancourt's to play with Miss Elfride
 when I were there,' said William Worm. 'Ah, they did so's!' The latter
 sentence was introduced to add the necessary melancholy to a remark
 which, intrinsically, could hardly be made to possess enough for the
 occasion. 'Yes,' continued Worm, 'they'd run upstairs, they'd run down;
--**--**--
 said). Anyhow, they were buried the same day--father and mother--but the
 baby lived. Ay, my lord's family made much of that man then, and put him
 here with his wife, and there in the corner the man is now. The Sunday
 after there was a funeral sermon: the text was, "Or ever the silver cord
 be loosed, or the golden bowl be broken;" and when 'twas preaching the
 men drew their hands across their eyes several times, and every woman
 cried out loud.'
 
 'And what became of the baby?' said Stephen, who had frequently heard
 portions of the story.
 
 'She was brought up by her grandmother, and a pretty maid she were. And
 she must needs run away with the curate--Parson Swancourt that is now.
 Then her grandmother died, and the title and everything went away to
 another branch of the family altogether. Parson Swancourt wasted a good
 deal of his wife's money, and she left him Miss Elfride. That trick
 of running away seems to be handed down in families, like craziness or
 gout. And they two women be alike as peas.'
 
 'Which two?'
 
 'Lady Elfride and young Miss that's alive now. The same hair and eyes:
 but Miss Elfride's mother was darker a good deal.'
 
 'Life's a strangle bubble, ye see,' said William Worm musingly. 'For
 if the Lord's anointment had descended upon women instead of men, Miss
 Elfride would be Lord Luxellian--Lady, I mane. But as it is, the blood
 is run out, and she's nothing to the Luxellian family by law, whatever
 she may be by gospel.'
 
 'I used to fancy,' said Simeon, 'when I seed Miss Elfride hugging the
 little ladyships, that there was a likeness; but I suppose 'twas only my
 dream, for years must have altered the old family shape.'
 
 'And now we'll move these two, and home-along,' interposed John Smith,
--**--**--
 thought.
 
 In the afternoon the lovers went out together on horseback for an hour
 or two; and though not wishing to be observed, by reason of the late
 death of Lady Luxellian, whose funeral had taken place very privately
 on the previous day, they yet found it necessary to pass East Endelstow
 Church.
 
 The steps to the vault, as has been stated, were on the outside of the
 building, immediately under the aisle wall. Being on horseback,
 both Knight and Elfride could overlook the shrubs which screened the
 church-yard.
 
 'Look, the vault seems still to be open,' said Knight.
 
 'Yes, it is open,' she answered
 
 'Who is that man close by it? The mason, I suppose?'
 
 'Yes.'
 
 'I wonder if it is John Smith, Stephen's father?'
 
 'I believe it is,' said Elfride, with apprehension.
 
 'Ah, and can it be? I should like to inquire how his son, my truant
 protege', is going on. And from your father's description of the vault,
 the interior must be interesting. Suppose we go in.'
 
 'Had we better, do you think? May not Lord Luxellian be there?'
 
 'It is not at all likely.'
 
 Elfride then assented, since she could do nothing else. Her heart,
 which at first had quailed in consternation, recovered itself when she
 considered the character of John Smith. A quiet unassuming man, he would
 be sure to act towards her as before those love passages with his son,
 which might have given a more pretentious mechanic airs. So without much
 alarm she took Knight's arm after dismounting, and went with him between
 and over the graves. The master-mason recognized her as she approached,
 and, as usual, lifted his hat respectfully.
 
 'I know you to be Mr. Smith, my former friend Stephen's father,' said
 Knight, directly he had scanned the embrowned and ruddy features of
--**--**--
 were now revealed more clearly than at first, the whitened walls and
 arches throwing them forward in strong relief. It was a scene which was
 remembered by all three as an indelible mark in their history. Knight,
 with an abstracted face, was standing between his companions, though a
 little in advance of them, Elfride being on his right hand, and Stephen
 Smith on his left. The white daylight on his right side gleamed faintly
 in, and was toned to a blueness by contrast with the yellow rays from
 the candle against the wall. Elfride, timidly shrinking back, and
 nearest the entrance, received most of the light therefrom, whilst
 Stephen was entirely in candlelight, and to him the spot of outer sky
 visible above the steps was as a steely blue patch, and nothing more.
 
 'I have been here two or three times since it was opened,' said Stephen.
 'My father was engaged in the work, you know.'
 
 'Yes. What are you doing?' Knight inquired, looking at the note-book and
 pencil Stephen held in his hand.
 
 'I have been sketching a few details in the church, and since then I
 have been copying the names from some of the coffins here. Before I left
 England I used to do a good deal of this sort of thing.'
 
 'Yes; of course. Ah, that's poor Lady Luxellian, I suppose.' Knight
 pointed to a coffin of light satin-wood, which stood on the stone
 sleepers in the new niche. 'And the remainder of the family are on this
 side. Who are those two, so snug and close together?'
 
 Stephen's voice altered slightly as he replied 'That's Lady Elfride
 Kingsmore--born Luxellian, and that is Arthur, her husband. I have heard
 my father say that they--he--ran away with her, and married her against
 the wish of her parents.'
--**--**--
 should be proportioned rather to the intensity of the experience than
 to its actual length. Their glance, but a moment chronologically, was
 a season in their history. To Elfride the intense agony of reproach in
 Stephen's eye was a nail piercing her heart with a deadliness no words
 can describe. With a spasmodic effort she withdrew her eyes, urged on
 the horse, and in the chaos of perturbed memories was oblivious of any
 presence beside her. The deed of deception was complete.
 
 Gaining a knoll on which the park transformed itself into wood and
 copse, Knight came still closer to her side, and said, 'Are you better
 now, dearest?'
 
 'Oh yes.' She pressed a hand to her eyes, as if to blot out the image of
 Stephen. A vivid scarlet spot now shone with preternatural brightness in
 the centre of each cheek, leaving the remainder of her face lily-white
 as before.
 
 'Elfride,' said Knight, rather in his old tone of mentor, 'you know I
 don't for a moment chide you, but is there not a great deal of unwomanly
 weakness in your allowing yourself to be so overwhelmed by the sight of
 what, after all, is no novelty? Every woman worthy of the name should, I
 think, be able to look upon death with something like composure. Surely
 you think so too?'
 
 'Yes; I own it.'
 
 His obtuseness to the cause of her indisposition, by evidencing his
 entire freedom from the suspicion of anything behind the scenes, showed
 how incapable Knight was of deception himself, rather than any inherent
 dulness in him regarding human nature. This, clearly perceived by
 Elfride, added poignancy to her self-reproach, and she idolized him the
 more because of their difference. Even the recent sight of Stephen's
 face and the sound of his voice, which for a moment had stirred a chord
--**--**--
 'I knew it was his name--of course I did; but I am sure, Mrs. Jethway, I
 did not intend anybody to tell him.'
 
 'But you knew they would.'
 
 'No, I didn't.'
 
 'And then, after that, when you were riding on Revels-day by our house,
 and the lads were gathered there, and you wanted to dismount, when Jim
 Drake and George Upway and three or four more ran forward to hold your
 pony, and Felix stood back timid, why did you beckon to him, and say you
 would rather he held it?'
 
 'O Mrs. Jethway, you do think so mistakenly! I liked him best--that's
 why I wanted him to do it. He was gentle and nice--I always thought him
 so--and I liked him.'
 
 'Then why did you let him kiss you?'
 
 'It is a falsehood; oh, it is, it is!' said Elfride, weeping with
 desperation. 'He came behind me, and attempted to kiss me; and that was
 why I told him never to let me see him again.'
 
 'But you did not tell your father or anybody, as you would have if you
 had looked upon it then as the insult you now pretend it was.'
 
 'He begged me not to tell, and foolishly enough I did not. And I wish
 I had now. I little expected to be scourged with my own kindness. Pray
 leave me, Mrs. Jethway.' The girl only expostulated now.
 
 'Well, you harshly dismissed him, and he died. And before his body was
 cold, you took another to your heart. Then as carelessly sent him about
 his business, and took a third. And if you consider that nothing, Miss
 Swancourt,' she continued, drawing closer; 'it led on to what was very
 serious indeed. Have you forgotten the would-be runaway marriage? The
 journey to London, and the return the next day without being married,
--**--**--
 
 'It was worth anybody's!'
 
 Her hand was plashing in the little waterfall, and her eyes were bent
 the same way.
 
 'You talk about my severity with you, Elfride. You are unkind to me, you
 know.'
 
 'How?' she asked, looking up from her idle occupation.
 
 'After my taking trouble to get jewellery to please you, you wouldn't
 accept it.'
 
 'Perhaps I would now; perhaps I want to.'
 
 'Do!' said Knight.
 
 And the packet was withdrawn from his pocket and presented the third
 time. Elfride took it with delight. The obstacle was rent in twain, and
 the significant gift was hers.
 
 'I'll take out these ugly ones at once,' she exclaimed, 'and I'll wear
 yours--shall I?'
 
 'I should be gratified.'
 
 Now, though it may seem unlikely, considering how far the two had gone
 in converse, Knight had never yet ventured to kiss Elfride. Far slower
 was he than Stephen Smith in matters like that. The utmost advance he
 had made in such demonstrations had been to the degree witnessed by
 Stephen in the summer-house. So Elfride's cheek being still forbidden
 fruit to him, he said impulsively.
 
 'Elfie, I should like to touch that seductive ear of yours. Those are my
 gifts; so let me dress you in them.'
 
 She hesitated with a stimulating hesitation.
 
 'Let me put just one in its place, then?'
 
 Her face grew much warmer.
 
 'I don't think it would be quite the usual or proper course,' she said,
 suddenly turning and resuming her operation of plashing in the miniature
 cataract.
 
 The stillness of things was disturbed by a bird coming to the streamlet
 to drink. After watching him dip his bill, sprinkle himself, and fly
 into a tree, Knight replied, with the courteous brusqueness she so much
 liked to hear--
 
 'Elfride, now you may as well be fair. You would mind my doing it but
--**--**--
 
 'Did you ever go by water?' said Knight.
 
 'Never--by never, I mean not since the time of railways.'
 
 'Then if you can afford an additional day, I propose that we do it,'
 said Knight. 'The Channel is like a lake just now. We should reach
 Plymouth in about forty hours, I think, and the boats start from just
 below the bridge here' (pointing over his shoulder eastward).
 
 'Hear, hear!' said the vicar.
 
 'It's an idea, certainly,' said his wife.
 
 'Of course these coasters are rather tubby,' said Knight. 'But you
 wouldn't mind that?'
 
 'No: we wouldn't mind.'
 
 'And the saloon is a place like the fishmarket of a ninth-rate country
 town, but that wouldn't matter?'
 
 'Oh dear, no. If we had only thought of it soon enough, we might have
 had the use of Lord Luxellian's yacht. But never mind, we'll go. We
 shall escape the worrying rattle through the whole length of London
 to-morrow morning--not to mention the risk of being killed by excursion
 trains, which is not a little one at this time of the year, if the
 papers are true.'
 
 Elfride, too, thought the arrangement delightful; and accordingly, ten
 o'clock the following morning saw two cabs crawling round by the Mint,
 and between the preternaturally high walls of Nightingale Lane towards
 the river side.
 
 The first vehicle was occupied by the travellers in person, and the
 second brought up the luggage, under the supervision of Mrs. Snewson,
 Mrs. Swancourt's maid--and for the last fortnight Elfride's also;
 for although the younger lady had never been accustomed to any such
 attendant at robing times, her stepmother forced her into a semblance of
 familiarity with one when they were away from home.
 
 Presently waggons, bales, and smells of all descriptions increased to
 such an extent that the advance of the cabs was at the slowest possible
--**--**--
 scarcer instinct, to a more recently learnt emotion, than that which
 responds to the sort of beauty called charming and fair.
 
 Indeed, it is a question if the exclusive reign of this orthodox beauty
 is not approaching its last quarter. The new Vale of Tempe may be a
 gaunt waste in Thule; human souls may find themselves in closer and
 closer harmony with external things wearing a sombreness distasteful to
 our race when it was young. The time seems near, if it has not actually
 arrived, when the chastened sublimity of a moor, a sea, or a mountain
 will be all of nature that is absolutely in keeping with the moods
 of the more thinking among mankind. And ultimately, to the commonest
 tourist, spots like Iceland may become what the vineyards and myrtle
 gardens of South Europe are to him now; and Heidelberg and Baden
 be passed unheeded as he hastens from the Alps to the sand dunes of
 Scheveningen.
 
 The most thoroughgoing ascetic could feel that he had a natural right to
 wander on Egdon--he was keeping within the line of legitimate indulgence
 when he laid himself open to influences such as these. Colours and
 beauties so far subdued were, at least, the birthright of all. Only in
 summer days of highest feather did its mood touch the level of gaiety.
 Intensity was more usually reached by way of the solemn than by way of
 the brilliant, and such a sort of intensity was often arrived at
 during winter darkness, tempests, and mists. Then Egdon was aroused to
 reciprocity; for the storm was its lover, and the wind its friend.
 Then it became the home of strange phantoms; and it was found to be the
 hitherto unrecognized original of those wild regions of obscurity which
 are vaguely felt to be compassing us about in midnight dreams of flight
--**--**--
 less lately? If so, I know her; and I can guess what has happened."
 
 "'Tis no matter....Now, sir, I am sorry to say that we shall soon have
 to part company. My ponies are tired, and I have further to go, and I am
 going to rest them under this bank for an hour."
 
 The elder traveller nodded his head indifferently, and the reddleman
 turned his horses and van in upon the turf, saying, "Good night." The
 old man replied, and proceeded on his way as before.
 
 The reddleman watched his form as it diminished to a speck on the road
 and became absorbed in the thickening films of night. He then took
 some hay from a truss which was slung up under the van, and, throwing a
 portion of it in front of the horses, made a pad of the rest, which he
 laid on the ground beside his vehicle. Upon this he sat down, leaning
 his back against the wheel. From the interior a low soft breathing came
 to his ear. It appeared to satisfy him, and he musingly surveyed the
 scene, as if considering the next step that he should take.
 
 To do things musingly, and by small degrees, seemed, indeed, to be a
 duty in the Egdon valleys at this transitional hour, for there was that
 in the condition of the heath itself which resembled protracted and
 halting dubiousness. It was the quality of the repose appertaining
 to the scene. This was not the repose of actual stagnation, but the
 apparent repose of incredible slowness. A condition of healthy life so
 nearly resembling the torpor of death is a noticeable thing of its
 sort; to exhibit the inertness of the desert, and at the same time to be
 exercising powers akin to those of the meadow, and even of the forest,
--**--**--
 Such a perfect, delicate, and necessary finish did the figure give
 to the dark pile of hills that it seemed to be the only obvious
 justification of their outline. Without it, there was the dome without
 the lantern; with it the architectural demands of the mass were
 satisfied. The scene was strangely homogeneous, in that the vale, the
 upland, the barrow, and the figure above it amounted only to unity.
 Looking at this or that member of the group was not observing a complete
 thing, but a fraction of a thing.
 
 The form was so much like an organic part of the entire motionless
 structure that to see it move would have impressed the mind as a strange
 phenomenon. Immobility being the chief characteristic of that whole
 which the person formed portion of, the discontinuance of immobility in
 any quarter suggested confusion.
 
 Yet that is what happened. The figure perceptibly gave up its fixity,
 shifted a step or two, and turned round. As if alarmed, it descended on
 the right side of the barrow, with the glide of a water-drop down a bud,
 and then vanished. The movement had been sufficient to show more clearly
 the characteristics of the figure, and that it was a woman's.
 
 The reason of her sudden displacement now appeared. With her dropping
 out of sight on the right side, a newcomer, bearing a burden, protruded
 into the sky on the left side, ascended the tumulus, and deposited the
 burden on the top. A second followed, then a third, a fourth, a fifth,
 and ultimately the whole barrow was peopled with burdened figures.
 
 The only intelligible meaning in this sky-backed pantomime of
 silhouettes was that the woman had no relation to the forms who had
 taken her place, was sedulously avoiding these, and had come thither
--**--**--
 eyes that had been fixed on the distant conflagrations back to their own
 attempt in the same kind. The cheerful blaze streaked the inner surface
 of the human circle--now increased by other stragglers, male and
 female--with its own gold livery, and even overlaid the dark turf around
 with a lively luminousness, which softened off into obscurity where the
 barrow rounded downwards out of sight. It showed the barrow to be the
 segment of a globe, as perfect as on the day when it was thrown up, even
 the little ditch remaining from which the earth was dug. Not a plough
 had ever disturbed a grain of that stubborn soil. In the heath's
 barrenness to the farmer lay its fertility to the historian. There had
 been no obliteration, because there had been no tending.
 
 It seemed as if the bonfire-makers were standing in some radiant upper
 story of the world, detached from and independent of the dark stretches
 below. The heath down there was now a vast abyss, and no longer a
 continuation of what they stood on; for their eyes, adapted to
 the blaze, could see nothing of the deeps beyond its influence.
 Occasionally, it is true, a more vigorous flare than usual from their
 faggots sent darting lights like aides-de-camp down the inclines to some
 distant bush, pool, or patch of white sand, kindling these to replies
 of the same colour, till all was lost in darkness again. Then the whole
 black phenomenon beneath represented Limbo as viewed from the brink by
 the sublime Florentine in his vision, and the muttered articulations of
 the wind in the hollows were as complaints and petitions from the "souls
 of mighty worth" suspended therein.
 
 It was as if these men and boys had suddenly dived into past ages, and
 fetched therefrom an hour and deed which had before been familiar with
--**--**--
 that be so, though I only guess as much, to be sure," said Grandfer
 Cantle, still strenuously preserving a sensible bearing and mien.
 
 "Ah, well, I was at church that day," said Fairway, "which was a very
 curious thing to happen."
 
 "If 'twasn't my name's Simple," said the Grandfer emphatically. "I
 ha'n't been there to-year; and now the winter is a-coming on I won't say
 I shall."
 
 "I ha'n't been these three years," said Humphrey; "for I'm so dead
 sleepy of a Sunday; and 'tis so terrible far to get there; and when you
 do get there 'tis such a mortal poor chance that you'll be chose for up
 above, when so many bain't, that I bide at home and don't go at all."
 
 "I not only happened to be there," said Fairway, with a fresh collection
 of emphasis, "but I was sitting in the same pew as Mis'ess Yeobright.
 And though you may not see it as such, it fairly made my blood run cold
 to hear her. Yes, it is a curious thing; but it made my blood run
 cold, for I was close at her elbow." The speaker looked round upon
 the bystanders, now drawing closer to hear him, with his lips gathered
 tighter than ever in the rigorousness of his descriptive moderation.
 
 "'Tis a serious job to have things happen to 'ee there," said a woman
 behind.
 
 "'Ye are to declare it,' was the parson's words," Fairway continued.
 "And then up stood a woman at my side--a-touching of me. 'Well, be
 damned if there isn't Mis'ess Yeobright a-standing up,' I said to
 myself. Yes, neighbours, though I was in the temple of prayer that's
 what I said. 'Tis against my conscience to curse and swear in company,
 and I hope any woman here will overlook it. Still what I did say I did
--**--**--
 "Yes, 'tis bad," said Grandfer Cantle, shaking his head.
 
 "Mother know'd 'twas no moon, for she asked another woman that had
 an almanac, as she did whenever a boy was born to her, because of the
 saying, 'No moon, no man,' which made her afeard every man-child she
 had. Do ye really think it serious, Mister Fairway, that there was no
 moon?"
 
 "Yes. 'No moon, no man.' 'Tis one of the truest sayings ever spit out.
 The boy never comes to anything that's born at new moon. A bad job for
 thee, Christian, that you should have showed your nose then of all days
 in the month."
 
 "I suppose the moon was terrible full when you were born?" said
 Christian, with a look of hopeless admiration at Fairway.
 
 "Well, 'a was not new," Mr. Fairway replied, with a disinterested gaze.
 
 "I'd sooner go without drink at Lammas-tide than be a man of no moon,"
 continued Christian, in the same shattered recitative. "'Tis said I be
 only the rames of a man, and no good for my race at all; and I suppose
 that's the cause o't."
 
 "Ay," said Grandfer Cantle, somewhat subdued in spirit; "and yet his
 mother cried for scores of hours when 'a was a boy, for fear he should
 outgrow hisself and go for a soldier."
 
 "Well, there's many just as bad as he." said Fairway.
 
 "Wethers must live their time as well as other sheep, poor soul."
 
 "So perhaps I shall rub on? Ought I to be afeared o' nights, Master
 Fairway?"
 
 "You'll have to lie alone all your life; and 'tis not to married couples
 but to single sleepers that a ghost shows himself when 'a do come. One
 has been seen lately, too. A very strange one."
 
 "No--don't talk about it if 'tis agreeable of ye not to! 'Twill make my
--**--**--
          Or hang'-ed thou' shouldst bee'."
 
 "Well, that's what we'll do," said Fairway. "We'll give 'em a song, an'
 it please the Lord. What's the good of Thomasin's cousin Clym a-coming
 home after the deed's done? He should have come afore, if so be he
 wanted to stop it, and marry her himself."
 
 "Perhaps he's coming to bide with his mother a little time, as she must
 feel lonely now the maid's gone."
 
 "Now, 'tis very odd, but I never feel lonely--no, not at all," said
 Grandfer Cantle. "I am as brave in the nighttime as a' admiral!"
 
 The bonfire was by this time beginning to sink low, for the fuel had not
 been of that substantial sort which can support a blaze long. Most
 of the other fires within the wide horizon were also dwindling weak.
 Attentive observation of their brightness, colour, and length of
 existence would have revealed the quality of the material burnt, and
 through that, to some extent the natural produce of the district in
 which each bonfire was situate. The clear, kingly effulgence that had
 characterized the majority expressed a heath and furze country like
 their own, which in one direction extended an unlimited number of miles;
 the rapid flares and extinctions at other points of the compass showed
 the lightest of fuel--straw, beanstalks, and the usual waste from
 arable land. The most enduring of all--steady unaltering eyes like
 Planets--signified wood, such as hazel-branches, thorn-faggots, and
 stout billets. Fires of the last-mentioned materials were rare, and
 though comparatively small in magnitude beside the transient blazes, now
 began to get the best of them by mere long continuance. The great ones
 had perished, but these remained. They occupied the remotest visible
 positions--sky-backed summits rising out of rich coppice and plantation
 districts to the north, where the soil was different, and heath foreign
--**--**--
 
 "It gied me a turn likewise," said Susan Nunsuch, "for I had a dream
 last night of a death's head."
 
 "Don't ye talk o't no more," said Christian. "If he had a handkerchief
 over his head he'd look for all the world like the Devil in the picture
 of the Temptation."
 
 "Well, thank you for telling me," said the young reddleman, smiling
 faintly. "And good night t'ye all."
 
 He withdrew from their sight down the barrow.
 
 "I fancy I've seen that young man's face before," said Humphrey. "But
 where, or how, or what his name is, I don't know."
 
 The reddleman had not been gone more than a few minutes when another
 person approached the partially revived bonfire. It proved to be a
 well-known and respected widow of the neighbourhood, of a standing which
 can only be expressed by the word genteel. Her face, encompassed by
 the blackness of the receding heath, showed whitely, and with-out
 half-lights, like a cameo.
 
 She was a woman of middle-age, with well-formed features of the type
 usually found where perspicacity is the chief quality enthroned within.
 At moments she seemed to be regarding issues from a Nebo denied to
 others around. She had something of an estranged mien; the solitude
 exhaled from the heath was concentrated in this face that had risen from
 it. The air with which she looked at the heathmen betokened a certain
 unconcern at their presence, or at what might be their opinions of
 her for walking in that lonely spot at such an hour, thus indirectly
 implying that in some respect or other they were not up to her level.
 The explanation lay in the fact that though her husband had been a small
 farmer she herself was a curate's daughter, who had once dreamt of doing
 better things.
--**--**--
 whither she supposed her niece to have returned with Wildeve from their
 wedding at Anglebury that day.
 
 She first reached Wildeve's Patch, as it was called, a plot of land
 redeemed from the heath, and after long and laborious years brought into
 cultivation. The man who had discovered that it could be tilled died of
 the labour; the man who succeeded him in possession ruined himself in
 fertilizing it. Wildeve came like Amerigo Vespucci, and received the
 honours due to those who had gone before.
 
 When Mrs. Yeobright had drawn near to the inn, and was about to enter,
 she saw a horse and vehicle some two hundred yards beyond it, coming
 towards her, a man walking alongside with a lantern in his hand. It
 was soon evident that this was the reddleman who had inquired for her.
 Instead of entering the inn at once, she walked by it and towards the
 van.
 
 The conveyance came close, and the man was about to pass her with
 little notice, when she turned to him and said, "I think you have been
 inquiring for me? I am Mrs. Yeobright of Blooms-End."
 
 The reddleman started, and held up his finger. He stopped the horses,
 and beckoned to her to withdraw with him a few yards aside, which she
 did, wondering.
 
 "You don't know me, ma'am, I suppose?" he said.
 
 "I do not," said she. "Why, yes, I do! You are young Venn--your father
 was a dairyman somewhere here?"
 
 "Yes; and I knew your niece, Miss Tamsin, a little. I have something bad
 to tell you."
 
 "About her--no! She has just come home, I believe, with her husband.
 They arranged to return this afternoon--to the inn beyond here."
 
 "She's not there."
 
 "How do you know?"
 
 "Because she's here. She's in my van," he added slowly.
--**--**--
 to keep the occupant of the little couch from contact with the red
 materials of his trade. A young girl lay thereon, covered with a cloak.
 She was asleep, and the light of the lantern fell upon her features.
 
 A fair, sweet, and honest country face was revealed, reposing in a nest
 of wavy chestnut hair. It was between pretty and beautiful. Though her
 eyes were closed, one could easily imagine the light necessarily shining
 in them as the culmination of the luminous workmanship around. The
 groundwork of the face was hopefulness; but over it now I ay like a
 foreign substance a film of anxiety and grief. The grief had been there
 so shortly as to have abstracted nothing of the bloom, and had as yet
 but given a dignity to what it might eventually undermine. The scarlet
 of her lips had not had time to abate, and just now it appeared still
 more intense by the absence of the neighbouring and more transient
 colour of her cheek. The lips frequently parted, with a murmur of words.
 She seemed to belong rightly to a madrigal--to require viewing through
 rhyme and harmony.
 
 One thing at least was obvious: she was not made to be looked at
 thus. The reddleman had appeared conscious of as much, and, while Mrs.
 Yeobright looked in upon her, he cast his eyes aside with a delicacy
 which well became him. The sleeper apparently thought so too, for the
 next moment she opened her own.
 
 The lips then parted with something of anticipation, something more of
 doubt; and her several thoughts and fractions of thoughts, as signalled
 by the changes on her face, were exhibited by the light to the utmost
 nicety. An ingenuous, transparent life was disclosed, as if the flow of
 her existence could be seen passing within her. She understood the scene
--**--**--
 read it I wasn't aware of that."
 
 "But you had been staying at Anglebury?"
 
 "No. I had been at Budmouth--till two days ago--and that was where I
 had intended to take her; but when I came to fetch her we decided upon
 Anglebury, forgetting that a new license would be necessary. There was
 not time to get to Budmouth afterwards."
 
 "I think you are very much to blame," said Mrs. Yeobright.
 
 "It was quite my fault we chose Anglebury," Thomasin pleaded. "I
 proposed it because I was not known there."
 
 "I know so well that I am to blame that you need not remind me of it,"
 replied Wildeve shortly.
 
 "Such things don't happen for nothing," said the aunt. "It is a great
 slight to me and my family; and when it gets known there will be a
 very unpleasant time for us. How can she look her friends in the face
 tomorrow? It is a very great injury, and one I cannot easily forgive. It
 may even reflect on her character."
 
 "Nonsense," said Wildeve.
 
 Thomasin's large eyes had flown from the face of one to the face of
 the other during this discussion, and she now said anxiously, "Will you
 allow me, Aunt, to talk it over alone with Damon for five minutes? Will
 you, Damon?"
 
 "Certainly, dear," said Wildeve, "if your aunt will excuse us." He led
 her into an adjoining room, leaving Mrs. Yeobright by the fire.
 
 As soon as they were alone, and the door closed, Thomasin said, turning
 up her pale, tearful face to him, "It is killing me, this, Damon! I did
 not mean to part from you in anger at Anglebury this morning; but I was
 frightened and hardly knew what I said. I've not let Aunt know how much
 I suffered today; and it is so hard to command my face and voice, and to
--**--**--
 a good while. But tomorrow's Sunday, thank God."
 
 "I feel'd for all the world like some bold soldier after I had had some
 once," said Christian.
 
 "You shall feel so again," said Wildeve, with condescension, "Cups or
 glasses, gentlemen?"
 
 "Well, if you don't mind, we'll have the beaker, and pass 'en round;
 'tis better than heling it out in dribbles."
 
 "Jown the slippery glasses," said Grandfer Cantle. "What's the good of
 a thing that you can't put down in the ashes to warm, hey, neighbours;
 that's what I ask?"
 
 "Right, Grandfer," said Sam; and the mead then circulated.
 
 "Well," said Timothy Fairway, feeling demands upon his praise in some
 form or other, "'tis a worthy thing to be married, Mr. Wildeve; and the
 woman you've got is a dimant, so says I. Yes," he continued, to Grandfer
 Cantle, raising his voice so as to be heard through the partition, "her
 father (inclining his head towards the inner room) was as good a
 feller as ever lived. He always had his great indignation ready against
 anything underhand."
 
 "Is that very dangerous?" said Christian.
 
 "And there were few in these parts that were upsides with him," said
 Sam. "Whenever a club walked he'd play the clarinet in the band that
 marched before 'em as if he'd never touched anything but a clarinet all
 his life. And then, when they got to church door he'd throw down the
 clarinet, mount the gallery, snatch up the bass viol, and rozum away as
 if he'd never played anything but a bass viol. Folk would say--folk that
 knowed what a true stave was--'Surely, surely that's never the same man
 that I saw handling the clarinet so masterly by now!"
 
 "I can mind it," said the furze-cutter. "'Twas a wonderful thing that
 one body could hold it all and never mix the fingering."
--**--**--
 and finishing the little that remained. "Well, really, now I think we
 must be moving," said Humphrey, observing the emptiness of the vessel.
 
 "But we'll gie 'em another song?" said Grandfer Cantle. "I'm as full of
 notes as a bird!"
 
 "Thank you, Grandfer," said Wildeve. "But we will not trouble you now.
 Some other day must do for that--when I have a party."
 
 "Be jown'd if I don't learn ten new songs for't, or I won't learn a
 line!" said Grandfer Cantle. "And you may be sure I won't disappoint ye
 by biding away, Mr. Wildeve."
 
 "I quite believe you," said that gentleman.
 
 All then took their leave, wishing their entertainer long life and
 happiness as a married man, with recapitulations which occupied some
 time. Wildeve attended them to the door, beyond which the deep-dyed
 upward stretch of heath stood awaiting them, an amplitude of darkness
 reigning from their feet almost to the zenith, where a definite form
 first became visible in the lowering forehead of Rainbarrow. Diving
 into the dense obscurity in a line headed by Sam the turf-cutter, they
 pursued their trackless way home.
 
 When the scratching of the furze against their leggings had fainted upon
 the ear, Wildeve returned to the room where he had left Thomasin and her
 aunt. The women were gone.
 
 They could only have left the house in one way, by the back window; and
 this was open.
 
 Wildeve laughed to himself, remained a moment thinking, and idly
 returned to the front room. Here his glance fell upon a bottle of wine
 which stood on the mantelpiece. "Ah--old Dowden!" he murmured; and going
 to the kitchen door shouted, "Is anybody here who can take something to
 old Dowden?"
 
 There was no reply. The room was empty, the lad who acted as his
--**--**--
 show a turnpike road, lay in the development of the sense of touch in
 the feet, which comes with years of night-rambling in little-trodden
 spots. To a walker practised in such places a difference between impact
 on maiden herbage, and on the crippled stalks of a slight footway, is
 perceptible through the thickest boot or shoe.
 
 The solitary figure who walked this beat took no notice of the windy
 tune still played on the dead heathbells. She did not turn her head to
 look at a group of dark creatures further on, who fled from her presence
 as she skirted a ravine where they fed. They were about a score of the
 small wild ponies known as heath-croppers. They roamed at large on the
 undulations of Egdon, but in numbers too few to detract much from the
 solitude.
 
 The pedestrian noticed nothing just now, and a clue to her abstraction
 was afforded by a trivial incident. A bramble caught hold of her skirt,
 and checked her progress. Instead of putting it off and hastening along,
 she yielded herself up to the pull, and stood passively still. When she
 began to extricate herself it was by turning round and round, and so
 unwinding the prickly switch. She was in a desponding reverie.
 
 Her course was in the direction of the small undying fire which had
 drawn the attention of the men on Rainbarrow and of Wildeve in the
 valley below. A faint illumination from its rays began to glow upon
 her face, and the fire soon revealed itself to be lit, not on the level
 ground, but on a salient corner or redan of earth, at the junction of
 two converging bank fences. Outside was a ditch, dry except immediately
 under the fire, where there was a large pool, bearded all round by
--**--**--
 After her attentive survey of the wild slopes and hollow ravines a
 gesture of impatience escaped Eustacia. She vented petulant words
 every now and then, but there were sighs between her words, and sudden
 listenings between her sighs. Descending from her perch she again
 sauntered off towards Rainbarrow, though this time she did not go the
 whole way.
 
 Twice she reappeared at intervals of a few minutes and each time she
 said--
 
 "Not any flounce into the pond yet, little man?"
 
 "No, Miss Eustacia," the child replied.
 
 "Well," she said at last, "I shall soon be going in, and then I will
 give you the crooked sixpence, and let you go home."
 
 "Thank'ee, Miss Eustacia," said the tired stoker, breathing more easily.
 And Eustacia again strolled away from the fire, but this time not
 towards Rainbarrow. She skirted the bank and went round to the wicket
 before the house, where she stood motionless, looking at the scene.
 
 Fifty yards off rose the corner of the two converging banks, with the
 fire upon it; within the bank, lifting up to the fire one stick at a
 time, just as before, the figure of the little child. She idly watched
 him as he occasionally climbed up in the nook of the bank and stood
 beside the brands. The wind blew the smoke, and the child's hair, and
 the corner of his pinafore, all in the same direction; the breeze died,
 and the pinafore and hair lay still, and the smoke went up straight.
 
 While Eustacia looked on from this distance the boy's form visibly
 started--he slid down the bank and ran across towards the white gate.
 
 "Well?" said Eustacia.
 
 "A hopfrog have jumped into the pond. Yes, I heard 'en!"
 
 "Then it is going to rain, and you had better go home. You will not be
--**--**--
 
 "Did you indeed think I believed you were married?" she again demanded
 earnestly. "Then you wronged me; and upon my life and heart I can hardly
 bear to recognize that you have such ill thoughts of me! Damon, you are
 not worthy of me--I see it, and yet I love you. Never mind, let it go--I
 must bear your mean opinion as best I may....It is true, is it not," she
 added with ill-concealed anxiety, on his making no demonstration, "that
 you could not bring yourself to give me up, and are still going to love
 me best of all?"
 
 "Yes; or why should I have come?" he said touchily. "Not that
 fidelity will be any great merit in me after your kind speech about my
 unworthiness, which should have been said by myself if by anybody, and
 comes with an ill grace from you. However, the curse of inflammability
 is upon me, and I must live under it, and take any snub from a woman. It
 has brought me down from engineering to innkeeping--what lower stage it
 has in store for me I have yet to learn." He continued to look upon her
 gloomily.
 
 She seized the moment, and throwing back the shawl so that the firelight
 shone full upon her face and throat, said with a smile, "Have you seen
 anything better than that in your travels?"
 
 Eustacia was not one to commit herself to such a position without good
 ground. He said quietly, "No."
 
 "Not even on the shoulders of Thomasin?"
 
 "Thomasin is a pleasing and innocent woman."
 
 "That's nothing to do with it," she cried with quick passionateness. "We
 will leave her out; there are only you and me now to think of." After a
 long look at him she resumed with the old quiescent warmth, "Must I go
--**--**--
 was the gift of Heaven--a happy convergence of natural laws. Among other
 things opportunity had of late years been denied her of learning to
 be undignified, for she lived lonely. Isolation on a heath renders
 vulgarity well-nigh impossible. It would have been as easy for the
 heath-ponies, bats, and snakes to be vulgar as for her. A narrow life in
 Budmouth might have completely demeaned her.
 
 The only way to look queenly without realms or hearts to queen it over
 is to look as if you had lost them; and Eustacia did that to a triumph.
 In the captain's cottage she could suggest mansions she had never seen.
 Perhaps that was because she frequented a vaster mansion than any of
 them, the open hills. Like the summer condition of the place around her,
 she was an embodiment of the phrase "a populous solitude"--apparently so
 listless, void, and quiet, she was really busy and full.
 
 To be loved to madness--such was her great desire. Love was to her the
 one cordial which could drive away the eating loneliness of her days.
 And she seemed to long for the abstraction called passionate love more
 than for any particular lover.
 
 She could show a most reproachful look at times, but it was directed
 less against human beings than against certain creatures of her mind,
 the chief of these being Destiny, through whose interference she dimly
 fancied it arose that love alighted only on gliding youth--that any love
 she might win would sink simultaneously with the sand in the glass.
 She thought of it with an ever-growing consciousness of cruelty, which
 tended to breed actions of reckless unconventionality, framed to snatch
 a year's, a week's, even an hour's passion from anywhere while it could
 be won. Through want of it she had sung without being merry, possessed
--**--**--
 almost holding his breath.
 
 The man took a piece of rag from a satchel containing sewing materials,
 tore off a strip, which, like everything else, was tinged red, and
 proceeded to bind up the wound.
 
 "My eyes have got foggy-like--please may I sit down, master?" said the
 boy.
 
 "To be sure, poor chap. 'Tis enough to make you feel fainty. Sit on that
 bundle."
 
 The man finished tying up the gash, and the boy said, "I think I'll go
 home now, master."
 
 "You are rather afraid of me. Do you know what I be?"
 
 The child surveyed his vermilion figure up and down with much misgiving
 and finally said, "Yes."
 
 "Well, what?"
 
 "The reddleman!" he faltered.
 
 "Yes, that's what I be. Though there's more than one. You little
 children think there's only one cuckoo, one fox, one giant, one devil,
 and one reddleman, when there's lots of us all."
 
 "Is there? You won't carry me off in your bags, will ye, master? 'Tis
 said that the reddleman will sometimes."
 
 "Nonsense. All that reddlemen do is sell reddle. You see all these bags
 at the back of my cart? They are not full of little boys--only full of
 red stuff."
 
 "Was you born a reddleman?"
 
 "No, I took to it. I should be as white as you if I were to give up the
 trade--that is, I should be white in time--perhaps six months; not at
 first, because 'tis grow'd into my skin and won't wash out. Now, you'll
 never be afraid of a reddleman again, will ye?"
 
 "No, never. Willy Orchard said he seed a red ghost here t'other
 day--perhaps that was you?"
 
 "I was here t'other day."
 
 "Were you making that dusty light I saw by now?"
 
 "Oh yes, I was beating out some bags. And have you had a good bonfire up
--**--**--
 "Ay, to be sure you may. I'll go a bit of ways with you."
 
 He conducted the boy out of the gravel pit and into the path leading
 to his mother's cottage. When the little figure had vanished in the
 darkness the reddleman returned, resumed his seat by the fire, and
 proceeded to darn again.
 
 
 
 
 9--Love Leads a Shrewd Man into Strategy
 
 
 Reddlemen of the old school are now but seldom seen. Since the
 introduction of railways Wessex farmers have managed to do without these
 Mephistophelian visitants, and the bright pigment so largely used by
 shepherds in preparing sheep for the fair is obtained by other routes.
 Even those who yet survive are losing the poetry of existence which
 characterized them when the pursuit of the trade meant periodical
 journeys to the pit whence the material was dug, a regular camping out
 from month to month, except in the depth of winter, a peregrination
 among farms which could be counted by the hundred, and in spite of this
 Arab existence the preservation of that respectability which is insured
 by the never-failing production of a well-lined purse.
 
 Reddle spreads its lively hues over everything it lights on, and stamps
 unmistakably, as with the mark of Cain, any person who has handled it
 half an hour.
 
 A child's first sight of a reddleman was an epoch in his life. That
 blood-coloured figure was a sublimation of all the horrid dreams
 which had afflicted the juvenile spirit since imagination began. "The
 reddleman is coming for you!" had been the formulated threat of Wessex
 mothers for many generations. He was successfully supplanted for a
 while, at the beginning of the present century, by Buonaparte; but as
 process of time rendered the latter personage stale and ineffective the
 older phrase resumed its early prominence. And now the reddleman has
--**--**--
 
 THOMASIN YEOBRIGHT.
 
 To MR. VENN, Dairy-farmer.
 
 
 Since the arrival of that letter, on a certain autumn morning long ago,
 the reddleman and Thomasin had not met till today. During the interval
 he had shifted his position even further from hers than it had
 originally been, by adopting the reddle trade; though he was really in
 very good circumstances still. Indeed, seeing that his expenditure was
 only one-fourth of his income, he might have been called a prosperous
 man.
 
 Rejected suitors take to roaming as naturally as unhived bees; and the
 business to which he had cynically devoted himself was in many ways
 congenial to Venn. But his wanderings, by mere stress of old emotions,
 had frequently taken an Egdon direction, though he never intruded upon
 her who attracted him thither. To be in Thomasin's heath, and near her,
 yet unseen, was the one ewe-lamb of pleasure left to him.
 
 Then came the incident of that day, and the reddleman, still loving
 her well, was excited by this accidental service to her at a critical
 juncture to vow an active devotion to her cause, instead of, as
 hitherto, sighing and holding aloof. After what had happened it was
 impossible that he should not doubt the honesty of Wildeve's intentions.
 But her hope was apparently centred upon him; and dismissing his regrets
 Venn determined to aid her to be happy in her own chosen way. That this
 way was, of all others, the most distressing to himself, was awkward
 enough; but the reddleman's love was generous.
 
 His first active step in watching over Thomasin's interests was taken
 about seven o'clock the next evening and was dictated by the news which
 he had learnt from the sad boy. That Eustacia was somehow the cause
 of Wildeve's carelessness in relation to the marriage had at once been
--**--**--
 
 Wildeve walked a pace or two among the heather without replying. The
 pause was filled up by the intonation of a pollard thorn a little way to
 windward, the breezes filtering through its unyielding twigs as through
 a strainer. It was as if the night sang dirges with clenched teeth.
 
 She continued, half sorrowfully, "Since meeting you last, it has
 occurred to me once or twice that perhaps it was not for love of me you
 did not marry her. Tell me, Damon--I'll try to bear it. Had I nothing
 whatever to do with the matter?"
 
 "Do you press me to tell?"
 
 "Yes, I must know. I see I have been too ready to believe in my own
 power."
 
 "Well, the immediate reason was that the license would not do for the
 place, and before I could get another she ran away. Up to that point
 you had nothing to do with it. Since then her aunt has spoken to me in a
 tone which I don't at all like."
 
 "Yes, yes! I am nothing in it--I am nothing in it. You only trifle with
 me. Heaven, what can I, Eustacia Vye, be made of to think so much of
 you!"
 
 "Nonsense; do not be so passionate....Eustacia, how we roved among these
 bushes last year, when the hot days had got cool, and the shades of the
 hills kept us almost invisible in the hollows!"
 
 She remained in moody silence till she said, "Yes; and how I used to
 laugh at you for daring to look up to me! But you have well made me
 suffer for that since."
 
 "Yes, you served me cruelly enough until I thought I had found someone
 fairer than you. A blessed find for me, Eustacia."
 
 "Do you still think you found somebody fairer?"
--**--**--
 inquiring if he might have a conversation with her she replied, "Yes,
 walk beside me," and continued to move on.
 
 Before they had gone far it occurred to the perspicacious reddleman that
 he would have acted more wisely by appearing less unimpressionable, and
 he resolved to correct the error as soon as he could find opportunity.
 
 "I have made so bold, miss, as to step across and tell you some strange
 news which has come to my ears about that man."
 
 "Ah! what man?"
 
 He jerked his elbow to the southeast--the direction of the Quiet Woman.
 
 Eustacia turned quickly to him. "Do you mean Mr. Wildeve?"
 
 "Yes, there is trouble in a household on account of him, and I have come
 to let you know of it, because I believe you might have power to drive
 it away."
 
 "I? What is the trouble?"
 
 "It is quite a secret. It is that he may refuse to marry Thomasin
 Yeobright after all."
 
 Eustacia, though set inwardly pulsing by his words, was equal to her
 part in such a drama as this. She replied coldly, "I do not wish to
 listen to this, and you must not expect me to interfere."
 
 "But, miss, you will hear one word?"
 
 "I cannot. I am not interested in the marriage, and even if I were I
 could not compel Mr. Wildeve to do my bidding."
 
 "As the only lady on the heath I think you might," said Venn with subtle
 indirectness. "This is how the case stands. Mr. Wildeve would marry
 Thomasin at once, and make all matters smooth, if so be there were not
 another woman in the case. This other woman is some person he has picked
 up with, and meets on the heath occasionally, I believe. He will never
 marry her, and yet through her he may never marry the woman who loves
--**--**--
 as his own to Eustacia.
 
 She did not conceal the fact. "Then," said the reddleman, "you may as
 well leave it alone, Mrs. Yeobright."
 
 "I half think so myself," she said. "But nothing else remains to be done
 besides pressing the question upon him."
 
 "I should like to say a word first," said Venn firmly. "Mr. Wildeve is
 not the only man who has asked Thomasin to marry him; and why should not
 another have a chance? Mrs. Yeobright, I should be glad to marry your
 niece and would have done it any time these last two years. There, now
 it is out, and I have never told anybody before but herself."
 
 Mrs. Yeobright was not demonstrative, but her eyes involuntarily glanced
 towards his singular though shapely figure.
 
 "Looks are not everything," said the reddleman, noticing the glance.
 "There's many a calling that don't bring in so much as mine, if it comes
 to money; and perhaps I am not so much worse off than Wildeve. There is
 nobody so poor as these professional fellows who have failed; and if you
 shouldn't like my redness--well, I am not red by birth, you know; I only
 took to this business for a freak; and I might turn my hand to something
 else in good time."
 
 "I am much obliged to you for your interest in my niece; but I fear
 there would be objections. More than that, she is devoted to this man."
 
 "True; or I shouldn't have done what I have this morning."
 
 "Otherwise there would be no pain in the case, and you would not see me
 going to his house now. What was Thomasin's answer when you told her of
 your feelings?"
 
 "She wrote that you would object to me; and other things."
 
 "She was in a measure right. You must not take this unkindly--I merely
--**--**--
 "Ah, I knew she had something to do with it! Come, I don't like
 reserve."
 
 "No--she has nothing. She only says she wishes me to give up Thomasin
 because another man is anxious to marry her. The woman, now she no
 longer needs me, actually shows off!" Wildeve's vexation has escaped him
 in spite of himself.
 
 Eustacia was silent a long while. "You are in the awkward position of an
 official who is no longer wanted," she said in a changed tone.
 
 "It seems so. But I have not yet seen Thomasin."
 
 "And that irritates you. Don't deny it, Damon. You are actually nettled
 by this slight from an unexpected quarter."
 
 "Well?"
 
 "And you come to get me because you cannot get her. This is certainly a
 new position altogether. I am to be a stop-gap."
 
 "Please remember that I proposed the same thing the other day."
 
 Eustacia again remained in a sort of stupefied silence. What curious
 feeling was this coming over her? Was it really possible that her
 interest in Wildeve had been so entirely the result of antagonism that
 the glory and the dream departed from the man with the first sound that
 he was no longer coveted by her rival? She was, then, secure of him at
 last. Thomasin no longer required him. What a humiliating victory!
 He loved her best, she thought; and yet--dared she to murmur such
 treacherous criticism ever so softly?--what was the man worth whom a
 woman inferior to herself did not value? The sentiment which lurks more
 or less in all animate nature--that of not desiring the undesired of
 others--was lively as a passion in the supersubtle, epicurean heart of
 Eustacia. Her social superiority over him, which hitherto had scarcely
 ever impressed her, became unpleasantly insistent, and for the first
--**--**--
 
 "Strange notions, has he?" said the old man. "Ah, there's too much of
 that sending to school in these days! It only does harm. Every gatepost
 and barn's door you come to is sure to have some bad word or other
 chalked upon it by the young rascals--a woman can hardly pass for shame
 sometimes. If they'd never been taught how to write they wouldn't have
 been able to scribble such villainy. Their fathers couldn't do it, and
 the country was all the better for it."
 
 "Now, I should think, Cap'n, that Miss Eustacia had about as much in her
 head that comes from books as anybody about here?"
 
 "Perhaps if Miss Eustacia, too, had less romantic nonsense in her head
 it would be better for her," said the captain shortly; after which he
 walked away.
 
 "I say, Sam," observed Humphrey when the old man was gone, "she and Clym
 Yeobright would make a very pretty pigeon-pair--hey? If they wouldn't
 I'll be dazed! Both of one mind about niceties for certain, and learned
 in print, and always thinking about high doctrine--there couldn't be a
 better couple if they were made o' purpose. Clym's family is as good as
 hers. His father was a farmer, that's true; but his mother was a sort
 of lady, as we know. Nothing would please me better than to see them two
 man and wife."
 
 "They'd look very natty, arm-in-crook together, and their best clothes
 on, whether or no, if he's at all the well-favoured fellow he used to
 be."
 
 "They would, Humphrey. Well, I should like to see the chap terrible much
 after so many years. If I knew for certain when he was coming I'd stroll
 out three or four miles to meet him and help carry anything for'n;
 though I suppose he's altered from the boy he was. They say he can talk
--**--**--
 your secrecy."
 
 "Yes, he will, when he knows it was because I wished to spare him, and
 that I did not expect him home so soon. And you must not let me stand in
 the way of your Christmas party. Putting it off would only make matters
 worse."
 
 "Of course I shall not. I do not wish to show myself beaten before all
 Egdon, and the sport of a man like Wildeve. We have enough berries now,
 I think, and we had better take them home. By the time we have decked
 the house with this and hung up the mistletoe, we must think of starting
 to meet him."
 
 Thomasin came out of the tree, shook from her hair and dress the loose
 berries which had fallen thereon, and went down the hill with her aunt,
 each woman bearing half the gathered boughs. It was now nearly four
 o'clock, and the sunlight was leaving the vales. When the west grew red
 the two relatives came again from the house and plunged into the heath
 in a different direction from the first, towards a point in the distant
 highway along which the expected man was to return.
 
 
 
 
 3--How a Little Sound Produced a Great Dream
 
 
 Eustacia stood just within the heath, straining her eyes in the
 direction of Mrs. Yeobright's house and premises. No light, sound, or
 movement was perceptible there. The evening was chilly; the spot was
 dark and lonely. She inferred that the guest had not yet come; and after
 lingering ten or fifteen minutes she turned again towards home.
 
 She had not far retraced her steps when sounds in front of her betokened
 the approach of persons in conversation along the same path. Soon their
 heads became visible against the sky. They were walking slowly; and
 though it was too dark for much discovery of character from aspect, the
--**--**--
 themselves were not afflicted with any such feeling for their art,
 though at the same time they were not enthusiastic. A traditional
 pastime is to be distinguished from a mere revival in no more striking
 feature than in this, that while in the revival all is excitement and
 fervour, the survival is carried on with a stolidity and absence of
 stir which sets one wondering why a thing that is done so perfunctorily
 should be kept up at all. Like Balaam and other unwilling prophets, the
 agents seem moved by an inner compulsion to say and do their allotted
 parts whether they will or no. This unweeting manner of performance is
 the true ring by which, in this refurbishing age, a fossilized survival
 may be known from a spurious reproduction.
 
 The piece was the well-known play of Saint George, and all who were
 behind the scenes assisted in the preparations, including the women of
 each household. Without the co-operation of sisters and sweethearts the
 dresses were likely to be a failure; but on the other hand, this class
 of assistance was not without its drawbacks. The girls could never be
 brought to respect tradition in designing and decorating the armour;
 they insisted on attaching loops and bows of silk and velvet in any
 situation pleasing to their taste. Gorget, gusset, basinet, cuirass,
 gauntlet, sleeve, all alike in the view of these feminine eyes were
 practicable spaces whereon to sew scraps of fluttering colour.
 
 It might be that Joe, who fought on the side of Christendom, had a
 sweetheart, and that Jim, who fought on the side of the Moslem, had
 one likewise. During the making of the costumes it would come to the
 knowledge of Joe's sweetheart that Jim's was putting brilliant silk
 scallops at the bottom of her lover's surcoat, in addition to the
--**--**--
 
 "Is yours a long part?"
 
 "Nine speeches, about."
 
 "Can you repeat them to me? If so I should like to hear them."
 
 The lad smiled into the glowing turf and began--
 
      "Here come I, a Turkish Knight,
      Who learnt in Turkish land to fight,"
 
 continuing the discourse throughout the scenes to the concluding
 catastrophe of his fall by the hand of Saint George.
 
 Eustacia had occasionally heard the part recited before. When the lad
 ended she began, precisely in the same words, and ranted on without
 hitch or divergence till she too reached the end. It was the same thing,
 yet how different. Like in form, it had the added softness and finish
 of a Raffaelle after Perugino, which, while faithfully reproducing the
 original subject, entirely distances the original art.
 
 Charley's eyes rounded with surprise. "Well, you be a clever lady!" he
 said, in admiration. "I've been three weeks learning mine."
 
 "I have heard it before," she quietly observed. "Now, would you do
 anything to please me, Charley?"
 
 "I'd do a good deal, miss."
 
 "Would you let me play your part for one night?"
 
 "Oh, miss! But your woman's gown--you couldn't."
 
 "I can get boy's clothes--at least all that would be wanted besides the
 mumming dress. What should I have to give you to lend me your things,
 to let me take your place for an hour or two on Monday night, and on no
 account to say a word about who or what I am? You would, of course, have
 to excuse yourself from playing that night, and to say that somebody--a
 cousin of Miss Vye's--would act for you. The other mummers have never
 spoken to me in their lives so that it would be safe enough; and if it
 were not, I should not mind. Now, what must I give you to agree to this?
--**--**--
 decided that the best plan will be for you to be sent somewhere by me,
 to make a real thing of the excuse. Our two heath-croppers are in the
 habit of straying into the meads, and tomorrow evening you can go and
 see if they are gone there. I'll manage the rest. Now you may leave me."
 
 "Yes, miss. But I think I'll have one minute more of what I am owed, if
 you don't mind."
 
 Eustacia gave him her hand as before.
 
 "One minute," she said, and counted on till she reached seven or eight
 minutes. Hand and person she then withdrew to a distance of several
 feet, and recovered some of her old dignity. The contract completed, she
 raised between them a barrier impenetrable as a wall.
 
 "There, 'tis all gone; and I didn't mean quite all," he said, with a
 sigh.
 
 "You had good measure," said she, turning away.
 
 "Yes, miss. Well, 'tis over, and now I'll get home-along."
 
 
 
 
 5--Through the Moonlight
 
 
 The next evening the mummers were assembled in the same spot, awaiting
 the entrance of the Turkish Knight.
 
 "Twenty minutes after eight by the Quiet Woman, and Charley not come."
 
 "Ten minutes past by Blooms-End."
 
 "It wants ten minutes to, by Grandfer Cantle's watch."
 
 "And 'tis five minutes past by the captain's clock."
 
 On Egdon there was no absolute hour of the day. The time at any moment
 was a number of varying doctrines professed by the different hamlets,
 some of them having originally grown up from a common root, and then
 become divided by secession, some having been alien from the beginning.
 West Egdon believed in Blooms-End time, East Egdon in the time of the
 Quiet Woman Inn. Grandfer Cantle's watch had numbered many followers in
 years gone by, but since he had grown older faiths were shaken. Thus,
--**--**--
 middle of them and stop the dance, and that would be unmannerly."
 
 "He thinks himself somebody because he has had a bit more schooling than
 we," said the Doctor.
 
 "You may go to the deuce!" said Eustacia.
 
 There was a whispered conversation between three or four of them, and
 one turned to her.
 
 "Will you tell us one thing?" he said, not without gentleness. "Be you
 Miss Vye? We think you must be."
 
 "You may think what you like," said Eustacia slowly. "But honourable
 lads will not tell tales upon a lady."
 
 "We'll say nothing, miss. That's upon our honour."
 
 "Thank you," she replied.
 
 At this moment the fiddles finished off with a screech, and the
 serpent emitted a last note that nearly lifted the roof. When, from the
 comparative quiet within, the mummers judged that the dancers had taken
 their seats, Father Christmas advanced, lifted the latch, and put his
 head inside the door.
 
 "Ah, the mummers, the mummers!" cried several guests at once. "Clear a
 space for the mummers."
 
 Humpbacked Father Christmas then made a complete entry, swinging his
 huge club, and in a general way clearing the stage for the actors
 proper, while he informed the company in smart verse that he was come,
 welcome or welcome not; concluding his speech with
 
           "Make room, make room, my gallant boys,
             And give us space to rhyme;
            We've come to show Saint George's play,
              Upon this Christmas time."
 
 The guests were now arranging themselves at one end of the room, the
 fiddler was mending a string, the serpent-player was emptying his
 mouthpiece, and the play began. First of those outside the Valiant
 Soldier entered, in the interest of Saint George--
 
      "Here come I, the Valiant Soldier;
             Slasher is my name";
 
 and so on. This speech concluded with a challenge to the infidel, at the
--**--**--
 "Really, there would have been nobody here who could have stood as
 decent second to him, or even third, if I hadn't been a soldier in the
 Bang-up Locals (as we was called for our smartness)," said Grandfer
 Cantle. "And even as 'tis we all look a little scammish beside him. But
 in the year four 'twas said there wasn't a finer figure in the whole
 South Wessex than I, as I looked when dashing past the shop-winders with
 the rest of our company on the day we ran out o' Budmouth because it was
 thoughted that Boney had landed round the point. There was I, straight
 as a young poplar, wi' my firelock, and my bagnet, and my spatterdashes,
 and my stock sawing my jaws off, and my accoutrements sheening like
 the seven stars! Yes, neighbours, I was a pretty sight in my soldiering
 days. You ought to have seen me in four!"
 
 "'Tis his mother's side where Master Clym's figure comes from, bless
 ye," said Timothy. "I know'd her brothers well. Longer coffins were
 never made in the whole country of South Wessex, and 'tis said that poor
 George's knees were crumpled up a little e'en as 'twas."
 
 "Coffins, where?" inquired Christian, drawing nearer. "Have the ghost of
 one appeared to anybody, Master Fairway?"
 
 "No, no. Don't let your mind so mislead your ears, Christian; and be a
 man," said Timothy reproachfully.
 
 "I will." said Christian. "But now I think o't my shadder last night
 seemed just the shape of a coffin. What is it a sign of when your
 shade's like a coffin, neighbours? It can't be nothing to be afeared of,
 I suppose?"
 
 "Afeared, no!" said the Grandfer. "Faith, I was never afeard of nothing
 except Boney, or I shouldn't ha' been the soldier I was. Yes, 'tis a
--**--**--
 Yeobright returned to the room without his cousin. When within two or
 three feet of Eustacia he stopped, as if again arrested by a thought.
 He was gazing at her. She looked another way, disconcerted, and wondered
 how long this purgatory was to last. After lingering a few seconds he
 passed on again.
 
 To court their own discomfiture by love is a common instinct with
 certain perfervid women. Conflicting sensations of love, fear, and shame
 reduced Eustacia to a state of the utmost uneasiness. To escape was her
 great and immediate desire. The other mummers appeared to be in no
 hurry to leave; and murmuring to the lad who sat next to her that she
 preferred waiting for them outside the house, she moved to the door as
 imperceptibly as possible, opened it, and slipped out.
 
 The calm, lone scene reassured her. She went forward to the palings and
 leant over them, looking at the moon. She had stood thus but a little
 time when the door again opened. Expecting to see the remainder of the
 band Eustacia turned; but no--Clym Yeobright came out as softly as she
 had done, and closed the door behind him.
 
 He advanced and stood beside her. "I have an odd opinion," he said, "and
 should like to ask you a question. Are you a woman--or am I wrong?"
 
 "I am a woman."
 
 His eyes lingered on her with great interest. "Do girls often play as
 mummers now? They never used to."
 
 "They don't now."
 
 "Why did you?"
 
 "To get excitement and shake off depression," she said in low tones.
 
 "What depressed you?"
 
 "Life."
 
 "That's a cause of depression a good many have to put up with."
 
 "Yes."
 
 A long silence. "And do you find excitement?" asked Clym at last.
 
 "At this moment, perhaps."
--**--**--
 to be found lay some to the north, some to the west of Egdon, his
 reason for camping about there like Israel in Zin was not apparent. The
 position was central and occasionally desirable. But the sale of reddle
 was not Diggory's primary object in remaining on the heath, particularly
 at so late a period of the year, when most travellers of his class had
 gone into winter quarters.
 
 Eustacia looked at the lonely man. Wildeve had told her at their last
 meeting that Venn had been thrust forward by Mrs. Yeobright as one ready
 and anxious to take his place as Thomasin's betrothed. His figure
 was perfect, his face young and well outlined, his eye bright, his
 intelligence keen, and his position one which he could readily better if
 he chose. But in spite of possibilities it was not likely that Thomasin
 would accept this Ishmaelitish creature while she had a cousin like
 Yeobright at her elbow, and Wildeve at the same time not absolutely
 indifferent. Eustacia was not long in guessing that poor Mrs. Yeobright,
 in her anxiety for her niece's future, had mentioned this lover to
 stimulate the zeal of the other. Eustacia was on the side of the
 Yeobrights now, and entered into the spirit of the aunt's desire.
 
 "Good morning, miss," said the reddleman, taking off his cap of
 hareskin, and apparently bearing her no ill-will from recollection of
 their last meeting.
 
 "Good morning, reddleman," she said, hardly troubling to lift her
 heavily shaded eyes to his. "I did not know you were so near. Is your
 van here too?"
 
 Venn moved his elbow towards a hollow in which a dense brake of
 purple-stemmed brambles had grown to such vast dimensions as almost to
 form a dell. Brambles, though churlish when handled, are kindly shelter
--**--**--
 Mrs. Yeobright says you are to marry her. 'Tisn't true, then?"
 
 "Good Lord! I heard of this before, but didn't believe it. When did she
 say so?"
 
 Wildeve began humming as the reddleman had done.
 
 "I don't believe it now," cried Venn.
 
 "Ru-um-tum-tum," sang Wildeve.
 
 "O Lord--how we can imitate!" said Venn contemptuously. "I'll have this
 out. I'll go straight to her."
 
 Diggory withdrew with an emphatic step, Wildeve's eye passing over his
 form in withering derision, as if he were no more than a heath-cropper.
 When the reddleman's figure could no longer be seen, Wildeve himself
 descended and plunged into the rayless hollow of the vale.
 
 To lose the two women--he who had been the well-beloved of both--was too
 ironical an issue to be endured. He could only decently save himself
 by Thomasin; and once he became her husband, Eustacia's repentance, he
 thought, would set in for a long and bitter term. It was no wonder that
 Wildeve, ignorant of the new man at the back of the scene, should have
 supposed Eustacia to be playing a part. To believe that the letter was
 not the result of some momentary pique, to infer that she really gave
 him up to Thomasin, would have required previous knowledge of her
 transfiguration by that man's influence. Who was to know that she had
 grown generous in the greediness of a new passion, that in coveting one
 cousin she was dealing liberally with another, that in her eagerness to
 appropriate she gave way?
 
 Full of this resolve to marry in haste, and wring the heart of the proud
 girl, Wildeve went his way.
 
 Meanwhile Diggory Venn had returned to his van, where he stood looking
 thoughtfully into the stove. A new vista was opened up to him. But,
 however promising Mrs. Yeobright's views of him might be as a candidate
--**--**--
 the plan to its end, and tell the whole story when the sky was clear."
 
 "You are a practical little woman," said Mrs. Yeobright, smiling. "I
 wish you and he--no, I don't wish anything. There, it is nine o'clock,"
 she interrupted, hearing a whizz and a dinging downstairs.
 
 "I told Damon I would leave at nine," said Thomasin, hastening out of
 the room.
 
 Her aunt followed. When Thomasin was going up the little walk from the
 door to the wicket-gate, Mrs. Yeobright looked reluctantly at her, and
 said, "It is a shame to let you go alone."
 
 "It is necessary," said Thomasin.
 
 "At any rate," added her aunt with forced cheerfulness, "I shall
 call upon you this afternoon, and bring the cake with me. If Clym has
 returned by that time he will perhaps come too. I wish to show Mr.
 Wildeve that I bear him no ill-will. Let the past be forgotten. Well,
 God bless you! There, I don't believe in old superstitions, but I'll
 do it." She threw a slipper at the retreating figure of the girl, who
 turned, smiled, and went on again.
 
 A few steps further, and she looked back. "Did you call me, Aunt?" she
 tremulously inquired. "Good-bye!"
 
 Moved by an uncontrollable feeling as she looked upon Mrs. Yeobright's
 worn, wet face, she ran back, when her aunt came forward, and they met
 again. "O--Tamsie," said the elder, weeping, "I don't like to let you
 go."
 
 "I--I am--" Thomasin began, giving way likewise. But, quelling her
 grief, she said "Good-bye!" again and went on.
 
 Then Mrs. Yeobright saw a little figure wending its way between the
 scratching furze-bushes, and diminishing far up the valley--a pale-blue
 spot in a vast field of neutral brown, solitary and undefended except by
 the power of her own hope.
--**--**--
 herself, or done anything to deserve that. It is bad enough that the
 wedding should be so hurried and unceremonious, without our keeping away
 from it in addition. Upon my soul, 'tis almost a shame. I'll go."
 
 "It is over by this time," said his mother with a sigh; "unless they
 were late, or he--"
 
 "Then I shall be soon enough to see them come out. I don't quite like
 your keeping me in ignorance, Mother, after all. Really, I half hope he
 has failed to meet her!"
 
 "And ruined her character?"
 
 "Nonsense--that wouldn't ruin Thomasin."
 
 He took up his hat and hastily left the house. Mrs. Yeobright looked
 rather unhappy, and sat still, deep in thought. But she was not long
 left alone. A few minutes later Clym came back again, and in his company
 came Diggory Venn.
 
 "I find there isn't time for me to get there," said Clym.
 
 "Is she married?" Mrs. Yeobright inquired, turning to the reddleman a
 face in which a strange strife of wishes, for and against, was apparent.
 
 Venn bowed. "She is, ma'am."
 
 "How strange it sounds," murmured Clym.
 
 "And he didn't disappoint her this time?" said Mrs. Yeobright.
 
 "He did not. And there is now no slight on her name. I was hastening
 ath'art to tell you at once, as I saw you were not there."
 
 "How came you to be there? How did you know it?" she asked.
 
 "I have been in that neighbourhood for some time, and I saw them go in,"
 said the reddleman. "Wildeve came up to the door, punctual as the clock.
 I didn't expect it of him." He did not add, as he might have added, that
 how he came to be in that neighbourhood was not by accident; that,
 since Wildeve's resumption of his right to Thomasin, Venn, with the
--**--**--
 the especial symbols of self-indulgence and vainglory.
 
 The details of this choice of a business for him it is not necessary
 to give. At the death of his father a neighbouring gentleman had kindly
 undertaken to give the boy a start, and this assumed the form of sending
 him to Budmouth. Yeobright did not wish to go there, but it was the only
 feasible opening. Thence he went to London; and thence, shortly after,
 to Paris, where he had remained till now.
 
 Something being expected of him, he had not been at home many days
 before a great curiosity as to why he stayed on so long began to arise
 in the heath. The natural term of a holiday had passed, yet he still
 remained. On the Sunday morning following the week of Thomasin's
 marriage a discussion on this subject was in progress at a hair-cutting
 before Fairway's house. Here the local barbering was always done at
 this hour on this day, to be followed by the great Sunday wash of the
 inhabitants at noon, which in its turn was followed by the great Sunday
 dressing an hour later. On Egdon Heath Sunday proper did not begin till
 dinner-time, and even then it was a somewhat battered specimen of the
 day.
 
 These Sunday-morning hair-cuttings were performed by Fairway; the victim
 sitting on a chopping-block in front of the house, without a coat, and
 the neighbours gossiping around, idly observing the locks of hair as
 they rose upon the wind after the snip, and flew away out of sight to
 the four quarters of the heavens. Summer and winter the scene was the
 same, unless the wind were more than usually blusterous, when the stool
 was shifted a few feet round the corner. To complain of cold in sitting
 out of doors, hatless and coatless, while Fairway told true stories
--**--**--
 
 2--The New Course Causes Disappointment
 
 
 Yeobright loved his kind. He had a conviction that the want of most men
 was knowledge of a sort which brings wisdom rather than affluence. He
 wished to raise the class at the expense of individuals rather than
 individuals at the expense of the class. What was more, he was ready at
 once to be the first unit sacrificed.
 
 In passing from the bucolic to the intellectual life the intermediate
 stages are usually two at least, frequently many more; and one of those
 stages is almost sure to be worldly advanced. We can hardly imagine
 bucolic placidity quickening to intellectual aims without imagining
 social aims as the transitional phase. Yeobright's local peculiarity was
 that in striving at high thinking he still cleaved to plain living--nay,
 wild and meagre living in many respects, and brotherliness with clowns.
 
 He was a John the Baptist who took ennoblement rather than repentance
 for his text. Mentally he was in a provincial future, that is, he was in
 many points abreast with the central town thinkers of his date. Much of
 this development he may have owed to his studious life in Paris, where
 he had become acquainted with ethical systems popular at the time.
 
 In consequence of this relatively advanced position, Yeobright might
 have been called unfortunate. The rural world was not ripe for him. A
 man should be only partially before his time--to be completely to the
 vanward in aspirations is fatal to fame. Had Philip's warlike son been
 intellectually so far ahead as to have attempted civilization without
 bloodshed, he would have been twice the godlike hero that he seemed, but
 nobody would have heard of an Alexander.
 
 In the interests of renown the forwardness should lie chiefly in the
 capacity to handle things. Successful propagandists have succeeded
--**--**--
 watered on a plan so rectangular that on a fine day they looked like
 silver gridirons? The farmer, in his ride, who could smile at artificial
 grasses, look with solicitude at the coming corn, and sigh with sadness
 at the fly-eaten turnips, bestowed upon the distant upland of heath
 nothing better than a frown. But as for Yeobright, when he looked
 from the heights on his way he could not help indulging in a barbarous
 satisfaction at observing that, in some of the attempts at reclamation
 from the waste, tillage, after holding on for a year or two, had receded
 again in despair, the ferns and furze-tufts stubbornly reasserting
 themselves.
 
 He descended into the valley, and soon reached his home at Blooms-End.
 His mother was snipping dead leaves from the window-plants. She looked
 up at him as if she did not understand the meaning of his long stay with
 her; her face had worn that look for several days. He could perceive
 that the curiosity which had been shown by the hair-cutting group
 amounted in his mother to concern. But she had asked no question with
 her lips, even when the arrival of his trunk suggested that he was not
 going to leave her soon. Her silence besought an explanation of him more
 loudly than words.
 
 "I am not going back to Paris again, Mother," he said. "At least, in my
 old capacity. I have given up the business."
 
 Mrs. Yeobright turned in pained surprise. "I thought something was
 amiss, because of the boxes. I wonder you did not tell me sooner."
 
 "I ought to have done it. But I have been in doubt whether you would be
 pleased with my plan. I was not quite clear on a few points myself. I am
 going to take an entirely new course."
--**--**--
 "'Twas a graceless trick--such a handsome girl, too. You ought to see
 her, Mr. Yeobright, being a young man come from far, and with a little
 more to show for your years than most of us."
 
 "Do you think she would like to teach children?" said Clym.
 
 Sam shook his head. "Quite a different sort of body from that, I
 reckon."
 
 "O, it was merely something which occurred to me. It would of course be
 necessary to see her and talk it over--not an easy thing, by the way,
 for my family and hers are not very friendly."
 
 "I'll tell you how you mid see her, Mr. Yeobright," said Sam. "We are
 going to grapple for the bucket at six o'clock tonight at her house, and
 you could lend a hand. There's five or six coming, but the well is deep,
 and another might be useful, if you don't mind appearing in that shape.
 She's sure to be walking round."
 
 "I'll think of it," said Yeobright; and they parted.
 
 He thought of it a good deal; but nothing more was said about Eustacia
 inside the house at that time. Whether this romantic martyr to
 superstition and the melancholy mummer he had conversed with under the
 full moon were one and the same person remained as yet a problem.
 
 
 
 
 3--The First Act in a Timeworn Drama
 
 
 The afternoon was fine, and Yeobright walked on the heath for an hour
 with his mother. When they reached the lofty ridge which divided the
 valley of Blooms-End from the adjoining valley they stood still and
 looked round. The Quiet Woman Inn was visible on the low margin of the
 heath in one direction, and afar on the other hand rose Mistover Knap.
 
 "You mean to call on Thomasin?" he inquired.
 
 "Yes. But you need not come this time," said his mother.
--**--**--
 "Haul!" said Fairway; and the men who held the rope began to gather it
 over the wheel.
 
 "I think we've got sommat," said one of the haulers-in.
 
 "Then pull steady," said Fairway.
 
 They gathered up more and more, till a regular dripping into the well
 could be heard below. It grew smarter with the increasing height of the
 bucket, and presently a hundred and fifty feet of rope had been pulled
 in.
 
 Fairway then lit a lantern, tied it to another cord, and began lowering
 it into the well beside the first: Clym came forward and looked down.
 Strange humid leaves, which knew nothing of the seasons of the year,
 and quaint-natured mosses were revealed on the wellside as the lantern
 descended; till its rays fell upon a confused mass of rope and bucket
 dangling in the dank, dark air.
 
 "We've only got en by the edge of the hoop--steady, for God's sake!"
 said Fairway.
 
 They pulled with the greatest gentleness, till the wet bucket appeared
 about two yards below them, like a dead friend come to earth again.
 Three or four hands were stretched out, then jerk went the rope, whizz
 went the wheel, the two foremost haulers fell backward, the beating of
 a falling body was heard, receding down the sides of the well, and a
 thunderous uproar arose at the bottom. The bucket was gone again.
 
 "Damn the bucket!" said Fairway.
 
 "Lower again," said Sam.
 
 "I'm as stiff as a ram's horn stooping so long," said Fairway, standing
 up and stretching himself till his joints creaked.
 
 "Rest a few minutes, Timothy," said Yeobright. "I'll take your place."
 
 The grapnel was again lowered. Its smart impact upon the distant water
 reached their ears like a kiss, whereupon Yeobright knelt down, and
 leaning over the well began dragging the grapnel round and round as
--**--**--
 
 "Yes," she replied.
 
 "Very much?"
 
 "No; I think not." She opened her hands. One of them was bleeding; the
 rope had dragged off the skin. Eustacia wrapped it in her handkerchief.
 
 "You should have let go," said Yeobright. "Why didn't you?"
 
 "You said I was to hold on....This is the second time I have been
 wounded today."
 
 "Ah, yes; I have heard of it. I blush for my native Egdon. Was it a
 serious injury you received in church, Miss Vye?"
 
 There was such an abundance of sympathy in Clym's tone that Eustacia
 slowly drew up her sleeve and disclosed her round white arm. A bright
 red spot appeared on its smooth surface, like a ruby on Parian marble.
 
 "There it is," she said, putting her finger against the spot.
 
 "It was dastardly of the woman," said Clym. "Will not Captain Vye get
 her punished?"
 
 "He is gone from home on that very business. I did not know that I had
 such a magic reputation."
 
 "And you fainted?" said Clym, looking at the scarlet little puncture as
 if he would like to kiss it and make it well.
 
 "Yes, it frightened me. I had not been to church for a long time. And
 now I shall not go again for ever so long--perhaps never. I cannot face
 their eyes after this. Don't you think it dreadfully humiliating? I
 wished I was dead for hours after, but I don't mind now."
 
 "I have come to clean away these cobwebs," said Yeobright. "Would you
 like to help me--by high-class teaching? We might benefit them much."
 
 "I don't quite feel anxious to. I have not much love for my
 fellow-creatures. Sometimes I quite hate them."
 
 "Still I think that if you were to hear my scheme you might take an
 interest in it. There is no use in hating people--if you hate anything,
--**--**--
 when he was a part of her--when their discourses were as if carried on
 between the right and the left hands of the same body? He had despaired
 of reaching her by argument; and it was almost as a discovery to him
 that he could reach her by a magnetism which was as superior to words as
 words are to yells.
 
 Strangely enough he began to feel now that it would not be so hard
 to persuade her who was his best friend that comparative poverty was
 essentially the higher course for him, as to reconcile to his feelings
 the act of persuading her. From every provident point of view his mother
 was so undoubtedly right, that he was not without a sickness of heart in
 finding he could shake her.
 
 She had a singular insight into life, considering that she had never
 mixed with it. There are instances of persons who, without clear ideas
 of the things they criticize have yet had clear ideas of the relations
 of those things. Blacklock, a poet blind from his birth, could describe
 visual objects with accuracy; Professor Sanderson, who was also blind,
 gave excellent lectures on colour, and taught others the theory of ideas
 which they had and he had not. In the social sphere these gifted ones
 are mostly women; they can watch a world which they never saw, and
 estimate forces of which they have only heard. We call it intuition.
 
 What was the great world to Mrs. Yeobright? A multitude whose tendencies
 could be perceived, though not its essences. Communities were seen by
 her as from a distance; she saw them as we see the throngs which cover
 the canvases of Sallaert, Van Alsloot, and others of that school--vast
 masses of beings, jostling, zigzagging, and processioning in definite
--**--**--
 words unsaid. Yeobright walked once or twice across the room, and then
 suddenly went out of the house. It was eleven o'clock when he came in,
 though he had not been further than the precincts of the garden. His
 mother was gone to bed. A light was left burning on the table, and
 supper was spread. Without stopping for any food he secured the doors
 and went upstairs.
 
 
 
 
 4--An Hour of Bliss and Many Hours of Sadness
 
 
 The next day was gloomy enough at Blooms-End. Yeobright remained in
 his study, sitting over the open books; but the work of those hours was
 miserably scant. Determined that there should be nothing in his conduct
 towards his mother resembling sullenness, he had occasionally spoken to
 her on passing matters, and would take no notice of the brevity of her
 replies. With the same resolve to keep up a show of conversation he
 said, about seven o'clock in the evening, "There's an eclipse of the
 moon tonight. I am going out to see it." And, putting on his overcoat,
 he left her.
 
 The low moon was not as yet visible from the front of the house, and
 Yeobright climbed out of the valley until he stood in the full flood
 of her light. But even now he walked on, and his steps were in the
 direction of Rainbarrow.
 
 In half an hour he stood at the top. The sky was clear from verge to
 verge, and the moon flung her rays over the whole heath, but without
 sensibly lighting it, except where paths and water-courses had laid bare
 the white flints and glistening quartz sand, which made streaks upon the
 general shade. After standing awhile he stooped and felt the heather. It
 was dry, and he flung himself down upon the barrow, his face towards the
--**--**--
 
 "It is very beautiful. But will you be mine?"
 
 "I will be nobody else's in the world--does that satisfy you?"
 
 "Yes, for the present."
 
 "Now tell me of the Tuileries, and the Louvre," she continued evasively.
 
 "I hate talking of Paris! Well, I remember one sunny room in the
 Louvre which would make a fitting place for you to live in--the Galerie
 d'Apollon. Its windows are mainly east; and in the early morning,
 when the sun is bright, the whole apartment is in a perfect blaze of
 splendour. The rays bristle and dart from the encrustations of gilding
 to the magnificent inlaid coffers, from the coffers to the gold and
 silver plate, from the plate to the jewels and precious stones, from
 these to the enamels, till there is a perfect network of light which
 quite dazzles the eye. But now, about our marriage----"
 
 "And Versailles--the King's Gallery is some such gorgeous room, is it
 not?"
 
 "Yes. But what's the use of talking of gorgeous rooms? By the way, the
 Little Trianon would suit us beautifully to live in, and you might
 walk in the gardens in the moonlight and think you were in some English
 shrubbery; It is laid out in English fashion."
 
 "I should hate to think that!"
 
 "Then you could keep to the lawn in front of the Grand Palace. All about
 there you would doubtless feel in a world of historical romance."
 
 He went on, since it was all new to her, and described Fontainebleau,
 St. Cloud, the Bois, and many other familiar haunts of the Parisians;
 till she said--
 
 "When used you to go to these places?"
 
 "On Sundays."
 
 "Ah, yes. I dislike English Sundays. How I should chime in with their
 manners over there! Dear Clym, you'll go back again?"
 
 Clym shook his head, and looked at the eclipse.
--**--**--
 
 "I might have believed you if you had kept yourself free from
 entanglements; but this woman--if she had been a good girl it would have
 been bad enough; but being----"
 
 "She is a good girl."
 
 "So you think. A Corfu bandmaster's daughter! What has her life been?
 Her surname even is not her true one."
 
 "She is Captain Vye's granddaughter, and her father merely took her
 mother's name. And she is a lady by instinct."
 
 "They call him 'captain,' but anybody is captain."
 
 "He was in the Royal Navy!"
 
 "No doubt he has been to sea in some tub or other. Why doesn't he look
 after her? No lady would rove about the heath at all hours of the day
 and night as she does. But that's not all of it. There was something
 queer between her and Thomasin's husband at one time--I am as sure of it
 as that I stand here."
 
 "Eustacia has told me. He did pay her a little attention a year ago; but
 there's no harm in that. I like her all the better."
 
 "Clym," said his mother with firmness, "I have no proofs against her,
 unfortunately. But if she makes you a good wife, there has never been a
 bad one."
 
 "Believe me, you are almost exasperating," said Yeobright vehemently.
 "And this very day I had intended to arrange a meeting between you. But
 you give me no peace; you try to thwart my wishes in everything."
 
 "I hate the thought of any son of mine marrying badly! I wish I had
 never lived to see this; it is too much for me--it is more than I
 dreamt!" She turned to the window. Her breath was coming quickly, and
 her lips were pale, parted, and trembling.
 
 "Mother," said Clym, "whatever you do, you will always be dear to
--**--**--
 a purple haze, against which groups of wailing gnats shone out, rising
 upwards and dancing about like sparks of fire.
 
 "O! this leaving you is too hard to bear!" exclaimed Eustacia in a
 sudden whisper of anguish. "Your mother will influence you too much;
 I shall not be judged fairly, it will get afloat that I am not a good
 girl, and the witch story will be added to make me blacker!"
 
 "They cannot. Nobody dares to speak disrespectfully of you or of me."
 
 "Oh how I wish I was sure of never losing you--that you could not be
 able to desert me anyhow!"
 
 Clym stood silent a moment. His feelings were high, the moment was
 passionate, and he cut the knot.
 
 "You shall be sure of me, darling," he said, folding her in his arms.
 "We will be married at once."
 
 "O Clym!"
 
 "Do you agree to it?"
 
 "If--if we can."
 
 "We certainly can, both being of full age. And I have not followed my
 occupation all these years without having accumulated money; and if you
 will agree to live in a tiny cottage somewhere on the heath, until I
 take a house in Budmouth for the school, we can do it at a very little
 expense."
 
 "How long shall we have to live in the tiny cottage, Clym?"
 
 "About six months. At the end of that time I shall have finished my
 reading--yes, we will do it, and this heart-aching will be over. We
 shall, of course, live in absolute seclusion, and our married life will
 only begin to outward view when we take the house in Budmouth, where I
 have already addressed a letter on the matter. Would your grandfather
 allow you?"
 
 "I think he would--on the understanding that it should not last longer
 than six months."
--**--**--
 "I thought you were, by your packing," replied Mrs. Yeobright in a voice
 from which every particle of emotion was painfully excluded.
 
 "And you will part friends with me?"
 
 "Certainly, Clym."
 
 "I am going to be married on the twenty-fifth."
 
 "I thought you were going to be married."
 
 "And then--and then you must come and see us. You will understand me
 better after that, and our situation will not be so wretched as it is
 now."
 
 "I do not think it likely I shall come to see you."
 
 "Then it will not be my fault or Eustacia's, Mother. Good-bye!"
 
 He kissed her cheek, and departed in great misery, which was several
 hours in lessening itself to a controllable level. The position had
 been such that nothing more could be said without, in the first place,
 breaking down a barrier; and that was not to be done.
 
 No sooner had Yeobright gone from his mother's house than her face
 changed its rigid aspect for one of blank despair. After a while she
 wept, and her tears brought some relief. During the rest of the day she
 did nothing but walk up and down the garden path in a state bordering
 on stupefaction. Night came, and with it but little rest. The next day,
 with an instinct to do something which should reduce prostration
 to mournfulness, she went to her son's room, and with her own hands
 arranged it in order, for an imaginary time when he should return
 again. She gave some attention to her flowers, but it was perfunctorily
 bestowed, for they no longer charmed her.
 
 It was a great relief when, early in the afternoon, Thomasin paid her an
 unexpected visit. This was not the first meeting between the relatives
 since Thomasin's marriage; and past blunders having been in a rough way
--**--**--
 "You come from Mistover?" said Wildeve.
 
 "Yes. They are taking in good things up there. Going to be a wedding."
 And the driver buried his face in his mug.
 
 Wildeve had not received an inkling of the fact before, and a sudden
 expression of pain overspread his face. He turned for a moment into the
 passage to hide it. Then he came back again.
 
 "Do you mean Miss Vye?" he said. "How is it--that she can be married so
 soon?"
 
 "By the will of God and a ready young man, I suppose."
 
 "You don't mean Mr. Yeobright?"
 
 "Yes. He has been creeping about with her all the spring."
 
 "I suppose--she was immensely taken with him?"
 
 "She is crazy about him, so their general servant of all work tells me.
 And that lad Charley that looks after the horse is all in a daze about
 it. The stun-poll has got fond-like of her."
 
 "Is she lively--is she glad? Going to be married so soon--well!"
 
 "It isn't so very soon."
 
 "No; not so very soon."
 
 Wildeve went indoors to the empty room, a curious heartache within him.
 He rested his elbow upon the mantelpiece and his face upon his hand.
 When Thomasin entered the room he did not tell her of what he had heard.
 The old longing for Eustacia had reappeared in his soul--and it was
 mainly because he had discovered that it was another man's intention to
 possess her.
 
 To be yearning for the difficult, to be weary of that offered; to care
 for the remote, to dislike the near; it was Wildeve's nature always.
 This is the true mark of the man of sentiment. Though Wildeve's fevered
 feeling had not been elaborated to real poetical compass, it was of the
 standard sort. His might have been called the Rousseau of Egdon.
--**--**--
 why.
 
 "I could not," said Wildeve, reddening slightly. "We could not both
 leave the house; it was rather a busy morning, on account of Anglebury
 Great Market. I believe you have something to give to Thomasin? If you
 like, I will take it."
 
 Mrs. Yeobright hesitated, and wondered if Wildeve knew what the
 something was. "Did she tell you of this?" she inquired.
 
 "Not particularly. She casually dropped a remark about having arranged
 to fetch some article or other."
 
 "It is hardly necessary to send it. She can have it whenever she chooses
 to come."
 
 "That won't be yet. In the present state of her health she must not go
 on walking so much as she has done." He added, with a faint twang of
 sarcasm, "What wonderful thing is it that I cannot be trusted to take?"
 
 "Nothing worth troubling you with."
 
 "One would think you doubted my honesty," he said, with a laugh, though
 his colour rose in a quick resentfulness frequent with him.
 
 "You need think no such thing," said she drily. "It is simply that I,
 in common with the rest of the world, feel that there are certain things
 which had better be done by certain people than by others."
 
 "As you like, as you like," said Wildeve laconically. "It is not worth
 arguing about. Well, I think I must turn homeward again, as the inn must
 not be left long in charge of the lad and the maid only."
 
 He went his way, his farewell being scarcely so courteous as his
 greeting. But Mrs. Yeobright knew him thoroughly by this time, and took
 little notice of his manner, good or bad.
 
 When Wildeve was gone Mrs. Yeobright stood and considered what would be
 the best course to adopt with regard to the guineas, which she had not
--**--**--
 Blooms-End, some fancy nick-nack which only interested the two women
 themselves. Mrs. Yeobright's refusal implied that his honour was not
 considered to be of sufficiently good quality to make him a safer bearer
 of his wife's property.
 
 "How very warm it is tonight, Christian!" he said, panting, when they
 were nearly under Rainbarrow. "Let us sit down for a few minutes, for
 Heaven's sake."
 
 Wildeve flung himself down on the soft ferns; and Christian, placing the
 lantern and parcel on the ground, perched himself in a cramped position
 hard by, his knees almost touching his chin. He presently thrust one
 hand into his coat-pocket and began shaking it about.
 
 "What are you rattling in there?" said Wildeve.
 
 "Only the dice, sir," said Christian, quickly withdrawing his hand.
 "What magical machines these little things be, Mr. Wildeve! 'Tis a
 game I should never get tired of. Would you mind my taking 'em out and
 looking at 'em for a minute, to see how they are made? I didn't like
 to look close before the other men, for fear they should think it bad
 manners in me." Christian took them out and examined them in the hollow
 of his hand by the lantern light. "That these little things should carry
 such luck, and such charm, and such a spell, and such power in 'em,
 passes all I ever heard or zeed," he went on, with a fascinated gaze at
 the dice, which, as is frequently the case in country places, were made
 of wood, the points being burnt upon each face with the end of a wire.
 
 "They are a great deal in a small compass, You think?"
 
 "Yes. Do ye suppose they really be the devil's playthings, Mr. Wildeve?
 If so, 'tis no good sign that I be such a lucky man."
--**--**--
 "A man sharper than my neighbour."
 
 "Yes, a man sharper than my neighbour; a regular sharper!"
 
 "Poor chips-in-porridge, you are very unmannerly."
 
 "I don't know about that! And I say you be unmannerly! You've got money
 that isn't your own. Half the guineas are poor Mr. Clym's."
 
 "How's that?"
 
 "Because I had to gie fifty of 'em to him. Mrs. Yeobright said so."
 
 "Oh?... Well, 'twould have been more graceful of her to have given them
 to his wife Eustacia. But they are in my hands now."
 
 Christian pulled on his boots, and with heavy breathings, which could be
 heard to some distance, dragged his limbs together, arose, and tottered
 away out of sight. Wildeve set about shutting the lantern to return to
 the house, for he deemed it too late to go to Mistover to meet his wife,
 who was to be driven home in the captain's four-wheel. While he was
 closing the little horn door a figure rose from behind a neighbouring
 bush and came forward into the lantern light. It was the reddleman
 approaching.
 
 
 
 
 8--A New Force Disturbs the Current
 
 
 Wildeve stared. Venn looked coolly towards Wildeve, and, without a word
 being spoken, he deliberately sat himself down where Christian had been
 seated, thrust his hand into his pocket, drew out a sovereign, and laid
 it on the stone.
 
 "You have been watching us from behind that bush?" said Wildeve.
 
 The reddleman nodded. "Down with your stake," he said. "Or haven't you
 pluck enough to go on?"
 
 Now, gambling is a species of amusement which is much more easily begun
 with full pockets than left off with the same; and though Wildeve in
 a cooler temper might have prudently declined this invitation, the
 excitement of his recent success carried him completely away. He placed
 one of the guineas on a slab beside the reddleman's sovereign. "Mine is
--**--**--
 
 The die smacked the stone a second time. It was ace again. Venn looked
 gloomy, threw--the die was seen to be lying in two pieces, the cleft
 sides uppermost.
 
 "I've thrown nothing at all," he said.
 
 "Serves me right--I split the die with my teeth. Here--take your money.
 Blank is less than one."
 
 "I don't wish it."
 
 "Take it, I say--you've won it!" And Wildeve threw the stakes against
 the reddleman's chest. Venn gathered them up, arose, and withdrew from
 the hollow, Wildeve sitting stupefied.
 
 When he had come to himself he also arose, and, with the extinguished
 lantern in his hand, went towards the highroad. On reaching it he stood
 still. The silence of night pervaded the whole heath except in one
 direction; and that was towards Mistover. There he could hear the noise
 of light wheels, and presently saw two carriagelamps descending the
 hill. Wildeve screened himself under a bush and waited.
 
 The vehicle came on and passed before him. It was a hired carriage,
 and behind the coachman were two persons whom he knew well. There sat
 Eustacia and Yeobright, the arm of the latter being round her waist.
 They turned the sharp corner at the bottom towards the temporary home
 which Clym had hired and furnished, about five miles to the eastward.
 
 Wildeve forgot the loss of the money at the sight of his lost love,
 whose preciousness in his eyes was increasing in geometrical progression
 with each new incident that reminded him of their hopeless division.
 Brimming with the subtilized misery that he was capable of feeling, he
 followed the opposite way towards the inn.
 
 About the same moment that Wildeve stepped into the highway Venn also
 had reached it at a point a hundred yards further on; and he, hearing
 the same wheels, likewise waited till the carriage should come up. When
--**--**--
 
 "I hope and trust not!" moaned Christian. "He's a good man, and perhaps
 will do right things. He said you ought to have gied Mr. Clym's share to
 Eustacia, and that's perhaps what he'll do himself."
 
 To Mrs. Yeobright, as soon as she could calmly reflect, there was much
 likelihood in this, for she could hardly believe that Wildeve would
 really appropriate money belonging to her son. The intermediate course
 of giving it to Eustacia was the sort of thing to please Wildeve's
 fancy. But it filled the mother with anger none the less. That Wildeve
 should have got command of the guineas after all, and should rearrange
 the disposal of them, placing Clym's share in Clym's wife's hands,
 because she had been his own sweetheart, and might be so still, was as
 irritating a pain as any that Mrs. Yeobright had ever borne.
 
 She instantly dismissed the wretched Christian from her employ for his
 conduct in the affair; but, feeling quite helpless and unable to do
 without him, told him afterwards that he might stay a little longer
 if he chose. Then she hastened off to Eustacia, moved by a much less
 promising emotion towards her daughter-in-law than she had felt half an
 hour earlier, when planning her journey. At that time it was to inquire
 in a friendly spirit if there had been any accidental loss; now it was
 to ask plainly if Wildeve had privately given her money which had been
 intended as a sacred gift to Clym.
 
 She started at two o'clock, and her meeting with Eustacia was hastened
 by the appearance of the young lady beside the pool and bank which
 bordered her grandfather's premises, where she stood surveying the
 scene, and perhaps thinking of the romantic enactments it had witnessed
 in past days. When Mrs. Yeobright approached, Eustacia surveyed her with
--**--**--
 
 "You injured me before my marriage, and you have now suspected me of
 secretly favouring another man for money!"
 
 "I could not help what I thought. But I have never spoken of you outside
 my house."
 
 "You spoke of me within it, to Clym, and you could not do worse."
 
 "I did my duty."
 
 "And I'll do mine."
 
 "A part of which will possibly be to set him against his mother. It is
 always so. But why should I not bear it as others have borne it before
 me!"
 
 "I understand you," said Eustacia, breathless with emotion. "You
 think me capable of every bad thing. Who can be worse than a wife who
 encourages a lover, and poisons her husband's mind against his relative?
 Yet that is now the character given to me. Will you not come and drag
 him out of my hands?"
 
 Mrs. Yeobright gave back heat for heat.
 
 "Don't rage at me, madam! It ill becomes your beauty, and I am not worth
 the injury you may do it on my account, I assure you. I am only a poor
 old woman who has lost a son."
 
 "If you had treated me honourably you would have had him still."
 Eustacia said, while scalding tears trickled from her eyes. "You have
 brought yourself to folly; you have caused a division which can never be
 healed!"
 
 "I have done nothing. This audacity from a young woman is more than I
 can bear."
 
 "It was asked for; you have suspected me, and you have made me speak of
 my husband in a way I would not have done. You will let him know that I
 have spoken thus, and it will cause misery between us. Will you go away
 from me? You are no friend!"
 
 "I will go when I have spoken a word. If anyone says I have come here to
--**--**--
 
 During the whole of Yeobright's walk home to Alderworth he was lost in
 reflections which were not of an unpleasant kind. On his coming up to
 the house Eustacia spoke to him from the open window, and he went across
 to her.
 
 "Darling," he said, "I am much happier. And if my mother were reconciled
 to me and to you I should, I think, be happy quite."
 
 "I fear that will never be," she said, looking afar with her beautiful
 stormy eyes. "How CAN you say 'I am happier,' and nothing changed?"
 
 "It arises from my having at last discovered something I can do, and get
 a living at, in this time of misfortune."
 
 "Yes?"
 
 "I am going to be a furze- and turf-cutter."
 
 "No, Clym!" she said, the slight hopefulness previously apparent in her
 face going off again, and leaving her worse than before.
 
 "Surely I shall. Is it not very unwise in us to go on spending the
 little money we've got when I can keep down expenditures by an honest
 occupation? The outdoor exercise will do me good, and who knows but that
 in a few months I shall be able to go on with my reading again?"
 
 "But my grandfather offers to assist us, if we require assistance."
 
 "We don't require it. If I go furze-cutting we shall be fairly well
 off."
 
 "In comparison with slaves, and the Israelites in Egypt, and such
 people!" A bitter tear rolled down Eustacia's face, which he did not
 see. There had been nonchalance in his tone, showing her that he felt no
 absolute grief at a consummation which to her was a positive horror.
 
 The very next day Yeobright went to Humphrey's cottage, and borrowed of
 him leggings, gloves, a whetstone, and a hook, to use till he should be
--**--**--
 "Now, you don't like my going alone! Clym, you are not jealous?"
 
 "No. But I would come with you if it could give you any pleasure;
 though, as things stand, perhaps you have too much of me already. Still,
 I somehow wish that you did not want to go. Yes, perhaps I am jealous;
 and who could be jealous with more reason than I, a half-blind man, over
 such a woman as you?"
 
 "Don't think like it. Let me go, and don't take all my spirits away!"
 
 "I would rather lose all my own, my sweet wife. Go and do whatever you
 like. Who can forbid your indulgence in any whim? You have all my heart
 yet, I believe; and because you bear with me, who am in truth a drag
 upon you, I owe you thanks. Yes, go alone and shine. As for me, I will
 stick to my doom. At that kind of meeting people would shun me. My hook
 and gloves are like the St. Lazarus rattle of the leper, warning the
 world to get out of the way of a sight that would sadden them." He
 kissed her, put on his leggings, and went out.
 
 When he was gone she rested her head upon her hands and said to herself,
 "Two wasted lives--his and mine. And I am come to this! Will it drive me
 out of my mind?"
 
 She cast about for any possible course which offered the least
 improvement on the existing state of things, and could find none. She
 imagined how all those Budmouth ones who should learn what had become
 of her would say, "Look at the girl for whom nobody was good enough!"
 To Eustacia the situation seemed such a mockery of her hopes that death
 appeared the only door of relief if the satire of Heaven should go much
--**--**--
 "It is true. What do you think of me as a furze-cutter's wife?"
 
 "I think the same as ever of you, Eustacia. Nothing of that sort can
 degrade you--you ennoble the occupation of your husband."
 
 "I wish I could feel it."
 
 "Is there any chance of Mr. Yeobright getting better?"
 
 "He thinks so. I doubt it."
 
 "I was quite surprised to hear that he had taken a cottage. I thought,
 in common with other people, that he would have taken you off to a home
 in Paris immediately after you had married him. 'What a gay, bright
 future she has before her!' I thought. He will, I suppose, return there
 with you, if his sight gets strong again?"
 
 Observing that she did not reply he regarded her more closely. She was
 almost weeping. Images of a future never to be enjoyed, the revived
 sense of her bitter disappointment, the picture of the neighbour's
 suspended ridicule which was raised by Wildeve's words, had been too
 much for proud Eustacia's equanimity.
 
 Wildeve could hardly control his own too forward feelings when he saw
 her silent perturbation. But he affected not to notice this, and she
 soon recovered her calmness.
 
 "You do not intend to walk home by yourself?" he asked.
 
 "O yes," said Eustacia. "What could hurt me on this heath, who have
 nothing?"
 
 "By diverging a little I can make my way home the same as yours. I
 shall be glad to keep you company as far as Throope Corner." Seeing that
 Eustacia sat on in hesitation he added, "Perhaps you think it unwise to
 be seen in the same road with me after the events of last summer?"
 
 "Indeed I think no such thing," she said haughtily. "I shall accept
 whose company I choose, for all that may be said by the miserable
--**--**--
 "Husbands will play the truant, you know. I wish you could tell me of
 some secret plan that would help me to keep him home at my will in the
 evenings."
 
 "I will consider if I know of one," replied Venn in that same light
 tone which meant no lightness. And then he bowed in a manner of his own
 invention and moved to go. Thomasin offered him her hand; and without a
 sigh, though with food for many, the reddleman went out.
 
 When Wildeve returned, a quarter of an hour later Thomasin said simply,
 and in the abashed manner usual with her now, "Where is the horse,
 Damon?"
 
 "O, I have not bought it, after all. The man asks too much."
 
 "But somebody saw you at Throope Corner leading it home--a beauty, with
 a white face and a mane as black as night."
 
 "Ah!" said Wildeve, fixing his eyes upon her; "who told you that?"
 
 "Venn the reddleman."
 
 The expression of Wildeve's face became curiously condensed. "That is
 a mistake--it must have been someone else," he said slowly and testily,
 for he perceived that Venn's countermoves had begun again.
 
 
 
 
 4--Rough Coercion Is Employed
 
 
 Those words of Thomasin, which seemed so little, but meant so much,
 remained in the ears of Diggory Venn: "Help me to keep him home in the
 evenings."
 
 On this occasion Venn had arrived on Egdon Heath only to cross to the
 other side--he had no further connection with the interests of the
 Yeobright family, and he had a business of his own to attend to. Yet
 he suddenly began to feel himself drifting into the old track of
 manoeuvring on Thomasin's account.
 
 He sat in his van and considered. From Thomasin's words and manner
 he had plainly gathered that Wildeve neglected her. For whom could
--**--**--
 Mrs. Yeobright tried to speak severely; but the account of her son's
 state had moved her more than she cared to show.
 
 "Your visits would make Wildeve walk straighter than he is inclined to
 do, and might prevent unhappiness down the heath."
 
 "What do you mean?"
 
 "I saw something tonight out there which I didn't like at all. I wish
 your son's house and Mr. Wildeve's were a hundred miles apart instead of
 four or five."
 
 "Then there WAS an understanding between him and Clym's wife when he
 made a fool of Thomasin!"
 
 "We'll hope there's no understanding now."
 
 "And our hope will probably be very vain. O Clym! O Thomasin!"
 
 "There's no harm done yet. In fact, I've persuaded Wildeve to mind his
 own business."
 
 "How?"
 
 "O, not by talking--by a plan of mine called the silent system."
 
 "I hope you'll succeed."
 
 "I shall if you help me by calling and making friends with your son.
 You'll have a chance then of using your eyes."
 
 "Well, since it has come to this," said Mrs. Yeobright sadly, "I will
 own to you, reddleman, that I thought of going. I should be much happier
 if we were reconciled. The marriage is unalterable, my life may be cut
 short, and I should wish to die in peace. He is my only son; and since
 sons are made of such stuff I am not sorry I have no other. As for
 Thomasin, I never expected much from her; and she has not disappointed
 me. But I forgave her long ago; and I forgive him now. I'll go."
 
 At this very time of the reddleman's conversation with Mrs. Yeobright
 at Blooms-End another conversation on the same subject was languidly
 proceeding at Alderworth.
 
 All the day Clym had borne himself as if his mind were too full of its
--**--**--
 house. When he had looked round the premises in the manner she had
 noticed he went and knocked at the door. There was a few minutes'
 interval, and then the key turned in the lock, the door opened, and
 Eustacia herself confronted him.
 
 Nobody could have imagined from her bearing now that here stood the
 woman who had joined with him in the impassioned dance of the week
 before, unless indeed he could have penetrated below the surface and
 gauged the real depth of that still stream.
 
 "I hope you reached home safely?" said Wildeve.
 
 "O yes," she carelessly returned.
 
 "And were you not tired the next day? I feared you might be."
 
 "I was rather. You need not speak low--nobody will over-hear us. My
 small servant is gone on an errand to the village."
 
 "Then Clym is not at home?"
 
 "Yes, he is."
 
 "O! I thought that perhaps you had locked the door because you were
 alone and were afraid of tramps."
 
 "No--here is my husband."
 
 They had been standing in the entry. Closing the front door and turning
 the key, as before, she threw open the door of the adjoining room and
 asked him to walk in. Wildeve entered, the room appearing to be empty;
 but as soon as he had advanced a few steps he started. On the hearthrug
 lay Clym asleep. Beside him were the leggings, thick boots, leather
 gloves, and sleeve-waistcoat in which he worked.
 
 "You may go in; you will not disturb him," she said, following behind.
 "My reason for fastening the door is that he may not be intruded upon
 by any chance comer while lying here, if I should be in the garden or
 upstairs."
 
 "Why is he sleeping there?" said Wildeve in low tones.
 
 "He is very weary. He went out at half-past four this morning, and has
--**--**--
 
 "Once when I went to Throope Great Pond to catch effets I seed myself
 looking up at myself, and I was frightened and jumped back like
 anything."
 
 ..."If they had only shown signs of meeting my advances halfway how well
 it might have been done! But there is no chance. Shut out! She must have
 set him against me. Can there be beautiful bodies without hearts inside?
 I think so. I would not have done it against a neighbour's cat on such a
 fiery day as this!"
 
 "What is it you say?"
 
 "Never again--never! Not even if they send for me!"
 
 "You must be a very curious woman to talk like that."
 
 "O no, not at all," she said, returning to the boy's prattle. "Most
 people who grow up and have children talk as I do. When you grow up your
 mother will talk as I do too."
 
 "I hope she won't; because 'tis very bad to talk nonsense."
 
 "Yes, child; it is nonsense, I suppose. Are you not nearly spent with
 the heat?"
 
 "Yes. But not so much as you be."
 
 "How do you know?"
 
 "Your face is white and wet, and your head is hanging-down-like."
 
 "Ah, I am exhausted from inside."
 
 "Why do you, every time you take a step, go like this?" The child in
 speaking gave to his motion the jerk and limp of an invalid.
 
 "Because I have a burden which is more than I can bear."
 
 The little boy remained silently pondering, and they tottered on side
 by side until more than a quarter of an hour had elapsed, when Mrs.
 Yeobright, whose weakness plainly increased, said to him, "I must sit
 down here to rest."
 
 When she had seated herself he looked long in her face and said, "How
 funny you draw your breath--like a lamb when you drive him till he's
--**--**--
 advanced a mile on his way all the heath purples, browns, and greens
 had merged in a uniform dress without airiness or graduation, and broken
 only by touches of white where the little heaps of clean quartz sand
 showed the entrance to a rabbit burrow, or where the white flints of a
 footpath lay like a thread over the slopes. In almost every one of
 the isolated and stunted thorns which grew here and there a nighthawk
 revealed his presence by whirring like the clack of a mill as long as he
 could hold his breath, then stopping, flapping his wings, wheeling round
 the bush, alighting, and after a silent interval of listening beginning
 to whirr again. At each brushing of Clym's feet white millermoths
 flew into the air just high enough to catch upon their dusty wings the
 mellowed light from the west, which now shone across the depressions and
 levels of the ground without falling thereon to light them up.
 
 Yeobright walked on amid this quiet scene with a hope that all would
 soon be well. Three miles on he came to a spot where a soft perfume was
 wafted across his path, and he stood still for a moment to inhale the
 familiar scent. It was the place at which, four hours earlier,
 his mother had sat down exhausted on the knoll covered with
 shepherd's-thyme. While he stood a sound between a breathing and a moan
 suddenly reached his ears.
 
 He looked to where the sound came from; but nothing appeared there save
 the verge of the hillock stretching against the sky in an unbroken line.
 He moved a few steps in that direction, and now he perceived a recumbent
 figure almost close to his feet.
 
 Among the different possibilities as to the person's individuality there
--**--**--
 "It is a good thing for his cousin what-d'ye-call-her? By George, you
 ought to have been in that galley, my girl! Now I must drive on. Do you
 want any assistance? What's mine is yours, you know."
 
 "Thank you, Grandfather, we are not in want at present," she said
 coldly. "Clym cuts furze, but he does it mostly as a useful pastime,
 because he can do nothing else."
 
 "He is paid for his pastime, isn't he? Three shillings a hundred, I
 heard."
 
 "Clym has money," she said, colouring, "but he likes to earn a little."
 
 "Very well; good night." And the captain drove on.
 
 When her grandfather was gone Eustacia went on her way mechanically;
 but her thoughts were no longer concerning her mother-in-law and Clym.
 Wildeve, notwithstanding his complaints against his fate, had been
 seized upon by destiny and placed in the sunshine once more. Eleven
 thousand pounds! From every Egdon point of view he was a rich man. In
 Eustacia's eyes, too, it was an ample sum--one sufficient to supply
 those wants of hers which had been stigmatized by Clym in his more
 austere moods as vain and luxurious. Though she was no lover of money
 she loved what money could bring; and the new accessories she
 imagined around him clothed Wildeve with a great deal of interest. She
 recollected now how quietly well-dressed he had been that morning--he
 had probably put on his newest suit, regardless of damage by briars and
 thorns. And then she thought of his manner towards herself.
 
 "O I see it, I see it," she said. "How much he wishes he had me now,
 that he might give me all I desire!"
 
 In recalling the details of his glances and words--at the time scarcely
 regarded--it became plain to her how greatly they had been dictated
--**--**--
 
 At this Eustacia said, with slumbering mischievousness, "What, would you
 exchange with him--your fortune for me?"
 
 "I certainly would," said Wildeve.
 
 "As we are imagining what is impossible and absurd, suppose we change
 the subject?"
 
 "Very well; and I will tell you of my plans for the future, if you care
 to hear them. I shall permanently invest nine thousand pounds, keep one
 thousand as ready money, and with the remaining thousand travel for a
 year or so."
 
 "Travel? What a bright idea! Where will you go to?"
 
 "From here to Paris, where I shall pass the winter and spring. Then I
 shall go to Italy, Greece, Egypt, and Palestine, before the hot weather
 comes on. In the summer I shall go to America; and then, by a plan not
 yet settled, I shall go to Australia and round to India. By that time
 I shall have begun to have had enough of it. Then I shall probably come
 back to Paris again, and there I shall stay as long as I can afford to."
 
 "Back to Paris again," she murmured in a voice that was nearly a sigh.
 She had never once told Wildeve of the Parisian desires which Clym's
 description had sown in her; yet here was he involuntarily in a position
 to gratify them. "You think a good deal of Paris?" she added.
 
 "Yes. In my opinion it is the central beauty-spot of the world."
 
 "And in mine! And Thomasin will go with you?"
 
 "Yes, if she cares to. She may prefer to stay at home."
 
 "So you will be going about, and I shall be staying here!"
 
 "I suppose you will. But we know whose fault that is."
 
 "I am not blaming you," she said quickly.
 
 "Oh, I thought you were. If ever you SHOULD be inclined to blame me,
--**--**--
 
 She had not long been there when a man came up the road and with some
 hesitation said to her, "How is he tonight, ma'am, if you please?"
 
 "He is better, though still very unwell, Humphrey," replied Eustacia.
 
 "Is he light-headed, ma'am?"
 
 "No. He is quite sensible now."
 
 "Do he rave about his mother just the same, poor fellow?" continued
 Humphrey.
 
 "Just as much, though not quite so wildly," she said in a low voice.
 
 "It was very unfortunate, ma'am, that the boy Johnny should ever ha'
 told him his mother's dying words, about her being broken-hearted and
 cast off by her son. 'Twas enough to upset any man alive."
 
 Eustacia made no reply beyond that of a slight catch in her breath, as
 of one who fain would speak but could not; and Humphrey, declining her
 invitation to come in, went away.
 
 Eustacia turned, entered the house, and ascended to the front bedroom,
 where a shaded light was burning. In the bed lay Clym, pale, haggard,
 wide awake, tossing to one side and to the other, his eyes lit by a hot
 light, as if the fire in their pupils were burning up their substance.
 
 "Is it you, Eustacia?" he said as she sat down.
 
 "Yes, Clym. I have been down to the gate. The moon is shining
 beautifully, and there is not a leaf stirring."
 
 "Shining, is it? What's the moon to a man like me? Let it shine--let
 anything be, so that I never see another day!... Eustacia, I don't know
 where to look--my thoughts go through me like swords. O, if any man
 wants to make himself immortal by painting a picture of wretchedness,
 let him come here!"
 
 "Why do you say so?"
 
 "I cannot help feeling that I did my best to kill her."
--**--**--
 "And then I became calm."
 
 "Yes, for four days."
 
 "And now I have left off being calm."
 
 "But try to be quiet--please do, and you will soon be strong. If you
 could remove that impression from your mind--"
 
 "Yes, yes," he said impatiently. "But I don't want to get strong. What's
 the use of my getting well? It would be better for me if I die, and it
 would certainly be better for Eustacia. Is Eustacia there?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "It would be better for you, Eustacia, if I were to die?"
 
 "Don't press such a question, dear Clym."
 
 "Well, it really is but a shadowy supposition; for unfortunately I am
 going to live. I feel myself getting better. Thomasin, how long are
 you going to stay at the inn, now that all this money has come to your
 husband?"
 
 "Another month or two, probably; until my illness is over. We cannot get
 off till then. I think it will be a month or more."
 
 "Yes, yes. Of course. Ah, Cousin Tamsie, you will get over your
 trouble--one little month will take you through it, and bring something
 to console you; but I shall never get over mine, and no consolation will
 come!"
 
 "Clym, you are unjust to yourself. Depend upon it, Aunt thought kindly
 of you. I know that, if she had lived, you would have been reconciled
 with her."
 
 "But she didn't come to see me, though I asked her, before I married, if
 she would come. Had she come, or had I gone there, she would never have
 died saying, 'I am a broken-hearted woman, cast off by my son.' My door
 has always been open to her--a welcome here has always awaited her. But
 that she never came to see."
 
 "You had better not talk any more now, Clym," said Eustacia faintly from
--**--**--
 superciliousness. Looking towards the village, he continued, "There is
 something going on here, however, is there not?"
 
 "Ay. 'Tis Fair Day. Though what you hear now is little more than the
 clatter and scurry of getting away the money o' children and fools, for
 the real business is done earlier than this. I've been working within
 sound o't all day, but I didn't go up--not I. 'Twas no business of
 mine."
 
 The trusser and his family proceeded on their way, and soon entered the
 Fair-field, which showed standing-places and pens where many hundreds of
 horses and sheep had been exhibited and sold in the forenoon, but
 were now in great part taken away. At present, as their informant had
 observed, but little real business remained on hand, the chief being the
 sale by auction of a few inferior animals, that could not otherwise
 be disposed of, and had been absolutely refused by the better class
 of traders, who came and went early. Yet the crowd was denser now
 than during the morning hours, the frivolous contingent of visitors,
 including journeymen out for a holiday, a stray soldier or two come on
 furlough, village shopkeepers, and the like, having latterly flocked in;
 persons whose activities found a congenial field among the peep-shows,
 toy-stands, waxworks, inspired monsters, disinterested medical men who
 travelled for the public good, thimble-riggers, nick-nack vendors, and
 readers of Fate.
 
 Neither of our pedestrians had much heart for these things, and they
 looked around for a refreshment tent among the many which dotted the
 down. Two, which stood nearest to them in the ochreous haze of expiring
 sunlight, seemed almost equally inviting. One was formed of new,
 milk-hued canvas, and bore red flags on its summit; it announced "Good
 Home-brewed Beer, Ale, and Cyder." The other was less new; a little iron
--**--**--
 
 Nobody answered; and the female dealer in staylaces interposed.
 
 "Behave yerself moral, good man, for Heaven's love! Ah, what a cruelty
 is the poor soul married to! Bed and board is dear at some figures 'pon
 my 'vation 'tis!"
 
 "Set it higher, auctioneer," said the trusser.
 
 "Two guineas!" said the auctioneer; and no one replied.
 
 "If they don't take her for that, in ten seconds they'll have to give
 more," said the husband. "Very well. Now auctioneer, add another."
 
 "Three guineas--going for three guineas!" said the rheumy man.
 
 "No bid?" said the husband. "Good Lord, why she's cost me fifty times
 the money, if a penny. Go on."
 
 "Four guineas!" cried the auctioneer.
 
 "I'll tell ye what--I won't sell her for less than five," said the
 husband, bringing down his fist so that the basins danced. "I'll sell
 her for five guineas to any man that will pay me the money, and treat
 her well; and he shall have her for ever, and never hear aught o' me.
 But she shan't go for less. Now then--five guineas--and she's yours.
 Susan, you agree?"
 
 She bowed her head with absolute indifference.
 
 "Five guineas," said the auctioneer, "or she'll be withdrawn. Do anybody
 give it? The last time. Yes or no?"
 
 "Yes," said a loud voice from the doorway.
 
 All eyes were turned. Standing in the triangular opening which formed
 the door of the tent was a sailor, who, unobserved by the rest, had
 arrived there within the last two or three minutes. A dead silence
 followed his affirmation.
 
 "You say you do?" asked the husband, staring at him.
 
 "I say so," replied the sailor.
 
 "Saying is one thing, and paying is another. Where's the money?"
 
 The sailor hesitated a moment, looked anew at the woman, came in,
 unfolded five crisp pieces of paper, and threw them down upon the
--**--**--
 for 'em. She'd no business to take the maid--'tis my maid; and if it
 were the doing again she shouldn't have her!"
 
 Perhaps from some little sense of having countenanced an indefensible
 proceeding, perhaps because it was late, the customers thinned away
 from the tent shortly after this episode. The man stretched his elbows
 forward on the table leant his face upon his arms, and soon began to
 snore. The furmity seller decided to close for the night, and after
 seeing the rum-bottles, milk, corn, raisins, etc., that remained on
 hand, loaded into the cart, came to where the man reclined. She shook
 him, but could not wake him. As the tent was not to be struck that
 night, the fair continuing for two or three days, she decided to let the
 sleeper, who was obviously no tramp, stay where he was, and his basket
 with him. Extinguishing the last candle, and lowering the flap of the
 tent, she left it, and drove away.
 
 
 
 
 2.
 
 
 The morning sun was streaming through the crevices of the canvas when
 the man awoke. A warm glow pervaded the whole atmosphere of the marquee,
 and a single big blue fly buzzed musically round and round it. Besides
 the buzz of the fly there was not a sound. He looked about--at the
 benches--at the table supported by trestles--at his basket of tools--at
 the stove where the furmity had been boiled--at the empty basins--at
 some shed grains of wheat--at the corks which dotted the grassy floor.
 Among the odds and ends he discerned a little shining object, and picked
 it up. It was his wife's ring.
 
 A confused picture of the events of the previous evening seemed to come
 back to him, and he thrust his hand into his breast-pocket. A rustling
 revealed the sailor's bank-notes thrust carelessly in.
--**--**--
 bitterest temper!"
 
 When he was calmer he turned to his original conviction that he must
 somehow find her and his little Elizabeth-Jane, and put up with the
 shame as best he could. It was of his own making, and he ought to bear
 it. But first he resolved to register an oath, a greater oath than he
 had ever sworn before: and to do it properly he required a fit place and
 imagery; for there was something fetichistic in this man's beliefs.
 
 He shouldered his basket and moved on, casting his eyes inquisitively
 round upon the landscape as he walked, and at the distance of three or
 four miles perceived the roofs of a village and the tower of a church.
 He instantly made towards the latter object. The village was quite
 still, it being that motionless hour of rustic daily life which fills
 the interval between the departure of the field-labourers to their work,
 and the rising of their wives and daughters to prepare the breakfast for
 their return. Hence he reached the church without observation, and the
 door being only latched he entered. The hay-trusser deposited his basket
 by the font, went up the nave till he reached the altar-rails, and
 opening the gate entered the sacrarium, where he seemed to feel a
 sense of the strangeness for a moment; then he knelt upon the
 footpace. Dropping his head upon the clamped book which lay on the
 Communion-table, he said aloud--
 
 "I, Michael Henchard, on this morning of the sixteenth of September, do
 take an oath before God here in this solemn place that I will avoid all
 strong liquors for the space of twenty-one years to come, being a year
 for every year that I have lived. And this I swear upon the book before
 me; and may I be strook dumb, blind, and helpless, if I break this my
--**--**--
 basins of commonest clay.
 
 "She was here at that time," resumed Mrs. Newson, making a step as if to
 draw nearer.
 
 "Don't speak to her--it isn't respectable!" urged the other.
 
 "I will just say a word--you, Elizabeth-Jane, can stay here."
 
 The girl was not loth, and turned to some stalls of coloured prints
 while her mother went forward. The old woman begged for the latter's
 custom as soon as she saw her, and responded to Mrs. Henchard-Newson's
 request for a pennyworth with more alacrity than she had shown in
 selling six-pennyworths in her younger days. When the soi-disant widow
 had taken the basin of thin poor slop that stood for the rich concoction
 of the former time, the hag opened a little basket behind the fire, and
 looking up slily, whispered, "Just a thought o' rum in it?--smuggled,
 you know--say two penn'orth--'twill make it slip down like cordial!"
 
 Her customer smiled bitterly at this survival of the old trick, and
 shook her head with a meaning the old woman was far from translating.
 She pretended to eat a little of the furmity with the leaden spoon
 offered, and as she did so said blandly to the hag, "You've seen better
 days?"
 
 "Ah, ma'am--well ye may say it!" responded the old woman, opening the
 sluices of her heart forthwith. "I've stood in this fair-ground, maid,
 wife, and widow, these nine-and-thirty years, and in that time have
 known what it was to do business with the richest stomachs in the
 land! Ma'am you'd hardly believe that I was once the owner of a great
 pavilion-tent that was the attraction of the fair. Nobody could come,
 nobody could go, without having a dish of Mrs. Goodenough's furmity.
 I knew the clergy's taste, the dandy gent's taste; I knew the town's
 taste, the country's taste. I even knowed the taste of the coarse
--**--**--
 difficulties. A hundred times she had been upon the point of telling her
 daughter Elizabeth-Jane the true story of her life, the tragical crisis
 of which had been the transaction at Weydon Fair, when she was not much
 older than the girl now beside her. But she had refrained. An innocent
 maiden had thus grown up in the belief that the relations between the
 genial sailor and her mother were the ordinary ones that they had always
 appeared to be. The risk of endangering a child's strong affection by
 disturbing ideas which had grown with her growth was to Mrs. Henchard
 too fearful a thing to contemplate. It had seemed, indeed folly to think
 of making Elizabeth-Jane wise.
 
 But Susan Henchard's fear of losing her dearly loved daughter's heart by
 a revelation had little to do with any sense of wrong-doing on her own
 part. Her simplicity--the original ground of Henchard's contempt for
 her--had allowed her to live on in the conviction that Newson
 had acquired a morally real and justifiable right to her by his
 purchase--though the exact bearings and legal limits of that right were
 vague. It may seem strange to sophisticated minds that a sane young
 matron could believe in the seriousness of such a transfer; and were
 there not numerous other instances of the same belief the thing might
 scarcely be credited. But she was by no means the first or last peasant
 woman who had religiously adhered to her purchaser, as too many rural
 records show.
 
 The history of Susan Henchard's adventures in the interim can be told
 in two or three sentences. Absolutely helpless she had been taken off
 to Canada where they had lived several years without any great worldly
 success, though she worked as hard as any woman could to keep their
--**--**--
 down and concave field. The mass became gradually dissected by the
 vision into towers, gables, chimneys, and casements, the highest
 glazings shining bleared and bloodshot with the coppery fire they caught
 from the belt of sunlit cloud in the west.
 
 From the centre of each side of this tree-bound square ran avenues
 east, west, and south into the wide expanse of cornland and coomb to
 the distance of a mile or so. It was by one of these avenues that the
 pedestrians were about to enter. Before they had risen to proceed two
 men passed outside the hedge, engaged in argumentative conversation.
 
 "Why, surely," said Elizabeth, as they receded, "those men mentioned the
 name of Henchard in their talk--the name of our relative?"
 
 "I thought so too," said Mrs. Newson.
 
 "That seems a hint to us that he is still here."
 
 "Yes."
 
 "Shall I run after them, and ask them about him----"
 
 "No, no, no! Not for the world just yet. He may be in the workhouse, or
 in the stocks, for all we know."
 
 "Dear me--why should you think that, mother?"
 
 "'Twas just something to say--that's all! But we must make private
 inquiries."
 
 Having sufficiently rested they proceeded on their way at evenfall. The
 dense trees of the avenue rendered the road dark as a tunnel, though the
 open land on each side was still under a faint daylight, in other words,
 they passed down a midnight between two gloamings. The features of the
 town had a keen interest for Elizabeth's mother, now that the human side
 came to the fore. As soon as they had wandered about they could see that
 the stockade of gnarled trees which framed in Casterbridge was itself
 an avenue, standing on a low green bank or escarpment, with a ditch
 yet visible without. Within the avenue and bank was a wall more or
--**--**--
 you feel so afraid of him? I am not at all; I'll call upon him--he can
 but say he don't own such remote kin."
 
 "I don't know at all--I can't tell what to set about. I feel so down."
 
 "Don't be that, mother, now we have got here and all! Rest there where
 you be a little while--I will look on and find out more about him."
 
 "I don't think I can ever meet Mr. Henchard. He is not how I thought he
 would be--he overpowers me! I don't wish to see him any more."
 
 "But wait a little time and consider."
 
 Elizabeth-Jane had never been so much interested in anything in her life
 as in their present position, partly from the natural elation she felt
 at discovering herself akin to a coach; and she gazed again at the
 scene. The younger guests were talking and eating with animation; their
 elders were searching for titbits, and sniffing and grunting over their
 plates like sows nuzzling for acorns. Three drinks seemed to be sacred
 to the company--port, sherry, and rum; outside which old-established
 trinity few or no palates ranged.
 
 A row of ancient rummers with ground figures on their sides, and each
 primed with a spoon, was now placed down the table, and these were
 promptly filled with grog at such high temperatures as to raise
 serious considerations for the articles exposed to its vapours. But
 Elizabeth-Jane noticed that, though this filling went on with great
 promptness up and down the table, nobody filled the Mayor's glass, who
 still drank large quantities of water from the tumbler behind the clump
 of crystal vessels intended for wine and spirits.
 
 "They don't fill Mr. Henchard's wine-glasses," she ventured to say to
 her elbow acquaintance, the old man.
 
 "Ah, no; don't ye know him to be the celebrated abstaining worthy of
--**--**--
 inharmonious man outside the window.
 
 Henchard's face darkened. There was temper under the thin bland
 surface--the temper which, artificially intensified, had banished a wife
 nearly a score of years before.
 
 "You must make allowances for the accidents of a large business," he
 said. "You must bear in mind that the weather just at the harvest of
 that corn was worse than we have known it for years. However, I have
 mended my arrangements on account o't. Since I have found my business
 too large to be well looked after by myself alone, I have advertised for
 a thorough good man as manager of the corn department. When I've got
 him you will find these mistakes will no longer occur--matters will be
 better looked into."
 
 "But what are you going to do to repay us for the past?" inquired the
 man who had before spoken, and who seemed to be a baker or miller. "Will
 you replace the grown flour we've still got by sound grain?"
 
 Henchard's face had become still more stern at these interruptions, and
 he drank from his tumbler of water as if to calm himself or gain time.
 Instead of vouchsafing a direct reply, he stiffly observed--
 
 "If anybody will tell me how to turn grown wheat into wholesome wheat
 I'll take it back with pleasure. But it can't be done."
 
 Henchard was not to be drawn again. Having said this, he sat down.
 
 
 
 
 6.
 
 
 Now the group outside the window had within the last few minutes been
 reinforced by new arrivals, some of them respectable shopkeepers and
 their assistants, who had come out for a whiff of air after putting up
 the shutters for the night; some of them of a lower class. Distinct from
 either there appeared a stranger--a young man of remarkably pleasant
--**--**--
 
 "A young man, sir--a sort of traveller. He was a Scotchman seemingly."
 
 "Did he say how he had got it?"
 
 "He wrote it himself, sir, as he stood outside the window."
 
 "Oh--wrote it himself....Is the young man in the hotel?"
 
 "No, sir. He went to the Three Mariners, I believe."
 
 The mayor walked up and down the vestibule of the hotel with his hands
 under his coat tails, as if he were merely seeking a cooler atmosphere
 than that of the room he had quitted. But there could be no doubt that
 he was in reality still possessed to the full by the new idea, whatever
 that might be. At length he went back to the door of the dining-room,
 paused, and found that the songs, toasts, and conversation were
 proceeding quite satisfactorily without his presence. The Corporation,
 private residents, and major and minor tradesmen had, in fact, gone
 in for comforting beverages to such an extent that they had quite
 forgotten, not only the Mayor, but all those vast, political, religious,
 and social differences which they felt necessary to maintain in the
 daytime, and which separated them like iron grills. Seeing this the
 Mayor took his hat, and when the waiter had helped him on with a thin
 holland overcoat, went out and stood under the portico.
 
 Very few persons were now in the street; and his eyes, by a sort of
 attraction, turned and dwelt upon a spot about a hundred yards further
 down. It was the house to which the writer of the note had gone--the
 Three Mariners--whose two prominent Elizabethan gables, bow-window, and
 passage-light could be seen from where he stood. Having kept his eyes on
 it for a while he strolled in that direction.
 
 This ancient house of accommodation for man and beast, now,
--**--**--
 other? My name is Henchard, ha'n't you replied to an advertisement for a
 corn-factor's manager that I put into the paper--ha'n't you come here to
 see me about it?"
 
 "No," said the Scotchman, with some surprise.
 
 "Surely you are the man," went on Henchard insistingly, "who arranged to
 come and see me? Joshua, Joshua, Jipp--Jopp--what was his name?"
 
 "You're wrong!" said the young man. "My name is Donald Farfrae. It is
 true I am in the corren trade--but I have replied to no advertisement,
 and arranged to see no one. I am on my way to Bristol--from there to the
 other side of the warrld, to try my fortune in the great wheat-growing
 districts of the West! I have some inventions useful to the trade, and
 there is no scope for developing them heere."
 
 "To America--well, well," said Henchard, in a tone of disappointment, so
 strong as to make itself felt like a damp atmosphere. "And yet I could
 have sworn you were the man!"
 
 The Scotchman murmured another negative, and there was a silence, till
 Henchard resumed: "Then I am truly and sincerely obliged to you for the
 few words you wrote on that paper."
 
 "It was nothing, sir."
 
 "Well, it has a great importance for me just now. This row about my
 grown wheat, which I declare to Heaven I didn't know to be bad till the
 people came complaining, has put me to my wits' end. I've some hundreds
 of quarters of it on hand; and if your renovating process will make it
 wholesome, why, you can see what a quag 'twould get me out of. I saw
 in a moment there might be truth in it. But I should like to have it
 proved; and of course you don't care to tell the steps of the process
--**--**--
 some of those personages who had stood outside the windows of the King's
 Arms.
 
 Behind their backs was a small window, with a wheel ventilator in one
 of the panes, which would suddenly start off spinning with a jingling
 sound, as suddenly stop, and as suddenly start again.
 
 While thus furtively making her survey the opening words of a song
 greeted her ears from the front of the settle, in a melody and accent
 of peculiar charm. There had been some singing before she came down; and
 now the Scotchman had made himself so soon at home that, at the request
 of some of the master-tradesmen, he, too, was favouring the room with a
 ditty.
 
 Elizabeth-Jane was fond of music; she could not help pausing to listen;
 and the longer she listened the more she was enraptured. She had never
 heard any singing like this and it was evident that the majority of the
 audience had not heard such frequently, for they were attentive to a
 much greater degree than usual. They neither whispered, nor drank, nor
 dipped their pipe-stems in their ale to moisten them, nor pushed the mug
 to their neighbours. The singer himself grew emotional, till she could
 imagine a tear in his eye as the words went on:--
 
      "It's hame, and it's hame, hame fain would I be,
      O hame, hame, hame to my ain countree!
      There's an eye that ever weeps, and a fair face will be fain,
      As I pass through Annan Water with my bonnie bands again;
      When the flower is in the bud, and the leaf upon the tree,
      The lark shall sing me hame to my ain countree!"
 
 There was a burst of applause, and a deep silence which was even more
 eloquent than the applause. It was of such a kind that the snapping of a
--**--**--
 "But, no!" said Donald Farfrae, gazing round into their faces with
 earnest concern; "the best of ye hardly honest--not that surely? None of
 ye has been stealing what didn't belong to him?"
 
 "Lord! no, no!" said Solomon Longways, smiling grimly. "That's only his
 random way o' speaking. 'A was always such a man of underthoughts." (And
 reprovingly towards Christopher): "Don't ye be so over-familiar with a
 gentleman that ye know nothing of--and that's travelled a'most from the
 North Pole."
 
 Christopher Coney was silenced, and as he could get no public sympathy,
 he mumbled his feelings to himself: "Be dazed, if I loved my country
 half as well as the young feller do, I'd live by claning my neighbour's
 pigsties afore I'd go away! For my part I've no more love for my country
 than I have for Botany Bay!"
 
 "Come," said Longways; "let the young man draw onward with his ballet,
 or we shall be here all night."
 
 "That's all of it," said the singer apologetically.
 
 "Soul of my body, then we'll have another!" said the general dealer.
 
 "Can you turn a strain to the ladies, sir?" inquired a fat woman with
 a figured purple apron, the waiststring of which was overhung so far by
 her sides as to be invisible.
 
 "Let him breathe--let him breathe, Mother Cuxsom. He hain't got his
 second wind yet," said the master glazier.
 
 "Oh yes, but I have!" exclaimed the young man; and he at once rendered
 "O Nannie" with faultless modulations, and another or two of the like
 sentiment, winding up at their earnest request with "Auld Lang Syne."
 
 By this time he had completely taken possession of the hearts of the
 Three Mariners' inmates, including even old Coney. Notwithstanding an
 occasional odd gravity which awoke their sense of the ludicrous for the
--**--**--
 and innumerable tawny and yellow leaves skimmed along the pavement, and
 stole through people's doorways into their passages with a hesitating
 scratch on the floor, like the skirts of timid visitors.
 
 Hearing voices, one of which was close at hand, she withdrew her head
 and glanced from behind the window-curtains. Mr. Henchard--now habited
 no longer as a great personage, but as a thriving man of business--was
 pausing on his way up the middle of the street, and the Scotchman was
 looking from the window adjoining her own. Henchard it appeared, had
 gone a little way past the inn before he had noticed his acquaintance of
 the previous evening. He came back a few steps, Donald Farfrae opening
 the window further.
 
 "And you are off soon, I suppose?" said Henchard upwards.
 
 "Yes--almost this moment, sir," said the other. "Maybe I'll walk on till
 the coach makes up on me."
 
 "Which way?"
 
 "The way ye are going."
 
 "Then shall we walk together to the top o' town?"
 
 "If ye'll wait a minute," said the Scotchman.
 
 In a few minutes the latter emerged, bag in hand. Henchard looked at the
 bag as at an enemy. It showed there was no mistake about the young man's
 departure. "Ah, my lad," he said, "you should have been a wise man, and
 have stayed with me."
 
 "Yes, yes--it might have been wiser," said Donald, looking
 microscopically at the houses that were furthest off. "It is only
 telling ye the truth when I say my plans are vague."
 
 They had by this time passed on from the precincts of the inn,
 and Elizabeth-Jane heard no more. She saw that they continued
 in conversation, Henchard turning to the other occasionally, and
 emphasizing some remark with a gesture. Thus they passed the King's Arms
 Hotel, the Market House, St. Peter's churchyard wall, ascending to the
--**--**--
 but a tortuous defile for carriages down the centre of the street, which
 afforded fine opportunities for skill with the reins. Over the pavement
 on the sunny side of the way hung shopblinds so constructed as to give
 the passenger's hat a smart buffet off his head, as from the unseen
 hands of Cranstoun's Goblin Page, celebrated in romantic lore.
 
 Horses for sale were tied in rows, their forelegs on the pavement, their
 hind legs in the street, in which position they occasionally nipped
 little boys by the shoulder who were passing to school. And any inviting
 recess in front of a house that had been modestly kept back from the
 general line was utilized by pig-dealers as a pen for their stock.
 
 The yeomen, farmers, dairymen, and townsfolk, who came to transact
 business in these ancient streets, spoke in other ways than by
 articulation. Not to hear the words of your interlocutor in metropolitan
 centres is to know nothing of his meaning. Here the face, the arms, the
 hat, the stick, the body throughout spoke equally with the tongue. To
 express satisfaction the Casterbridge market-man added to his utterance
 a broadening of the cheeks, a crevicing of the eyes, a throwing back of
 the shoulders, which was intelligible from the other end of the street.
 If he wondered, though all Henchard's carts and waggons were rattling
 past him, you knew it from perceiving the inside of his crimson mouth,
 and a target-like circling of his eyes. Deliberation caused sundry
 attacks on the moss of adjoining walls with the end of his stick,
 a change of his hat from the horizontal to the less so; a sense of
 tediousness announced itself in a lowering of the person by spreading
 the knees to a lozenge-shaped aperture and contorting the arms.
--**--**--
 "Oh--Susan is--still alive?" he asked with difficulty.
 
 "Yes, sir."
 
 "Are you her daughter?"
 
 "Yes, sir--her only daughter."
 
 "What--do you call yourself--your Christian name?"
 
 "Elizabeth-Jane, sir."
 
 "Newson?"
 
 "Elizabeth-Jane Newson."
 
 This at once suggested to Henchard that the transaction of his early
 married life at Weydon Fair was unrecorded in the family history. It was
 more than he could have expected. His wife had behaved kindly to him
 in return for his unkindness, and had never proclaimed her wrong to her
 child or to the world.
 
 "I am--a good deal interested in your news," he said. "And as this is
 not a matter of business, but pleasure, suppose we go indoors."
 
 It was with a gentle delicacy of manner, surprising to Elizabeth, that
 he showed her out of the office and through the outer room, where Donald
 Farfrae was overhauling bins and samples with the inquiring inspection
 of a beginner in charge. Henchard preceded her through the door in the
 wall to the suddenly changed scene of the garden and flowers, and
 onward into the house. The dining-room to which he introduced her still
 exhibited the remnants of the lavish breakfast laid for Farfrae. It
 was furnished to profusion with heavy mahogany furniture of the deepest
 red-Spanish hues. Pembroke tables, with leaves hanging so low that they
 well-nigh touched the floor, stood against the walls on legs and feet
 shaped like those of an elephant, and on one lay three huge folio
 volumes--a Family Bible, a "Josephus," and a "Whole Duty of Man." In the
 chimney corner was a fire-grate with a fluted semicircular back, having
 urns and festoons cast in relief thereon, and the chairs were of
 the kind which, since that day, has cast lustre upon the names of
 Chippendale and Sheraton, though, in point of fact, their patterns may
--**--**--
 excited voices, that the scene would remain but a moment, like a
 lightning flash, and then disappear.
 
 It was related that there still remained under the south entrance
 excavated cells for the reception of the wild animals and athletes who
 took part in the games. The arena was still smooth and circular, as if
 used for its original purpose not so very long ago. The sloping pathways
 by which spectators had ascended to their seats were pathways yet. But
 the whole was grown over with grass, which now, at the end of summer,
 was bearded with withered bents that formed waves under the brush of the
 wind, returning to the attentive ear aeolian modulations, and detaining
 for moments the flying globes of thistledown.
 
 Henchard had chosen this spot as being the safest from observation which
 he could think of for meeting his long-lost wife, and at the same time
 as one easily to be found by a stranger after nightfall. As Mayor of the
 town, with a reputation to keep up, he could not invite her to come to
 his house till some definite course had been decided on.
 
 Just before eight he approached the deserted earth-work and entered by
 the south path which descended over the debris of the former dens. In
 a few moments he could discern a female figure creeping in by the great
 north gap, or public gateway. They met in the middle of the arena.
 Neither spoke just at first--there was no necessity for speech--and the
 poor woman leant against Henchard, who supported her in his arms.
 
 "I don't drink," he said in a low, halting, apologetic voice. "You hear,
 Susan?--I don't drink now--I haven't since that night." Those were his
 first words.
 
 He felt her bow her head in acknowledgment that she understood. After a
--**--**--
 
 "I'll be glad to hear it, if I can be of any service," said Donald,
 allowing his eyes to travel over the intricate wood-carvings of the
 chimney-piece, representing garlanded lyres, shields, and quivers, on
 either side of a draped ox-skull, and flanked by heads of Apollo and
 Diana in low relief.
 
 "I've not been always what I am now," continued Henchard, his firm deep
 voice being ever so little shaken. He was plainly under that strange
 influence which sometimes prompts men to confide to the new-found
 friend what they will not tell to the old. "I began life as a working
 hay-trusser, and when I was eighteen I married on the strength o' my
 calling. Would you think me a married man?"
 
 "I heard in the town that you were a widower."
 
 "Ah, yes--you would naturally have heard that. Well, I lost my wife
 nineteen years ago or so--by my own fault....This is how it came about.
 One summer evening I was travelling for employment, and she was walking
 at my side, carrying the baby, our only child. We came to a booth in a
 country fair. I was a drinking man at that time."
 
 Henchard paused a moment, threw himself back so that his elbow rested
 on the table, his forehead being shaded by his hand, which, however, did
 not hide the marks of introspective inflexibility on his features as
 he narrated in fullest detail the incidents of the transaction with the
 sailor. The tinge of indifference which had at first been visible in the
 Scotchman now disappeared.
 
 Henchard went on to describe his attempts to find his wife; the oath he
 swore; the solitary life he led during the years which followed. "I have
 kept my oath for nineteen years," he went on; "I have risen to what you
--**--**--
 has grown up in the belief that the sailor to whom I made over her
 mother, and who is now dead, was her father, and her mother's husband.
 What her mother has always felt, she and I together feel now--that we
 can't proclaim our disgrace to the girl by letting her know the truth.
 Now what would you do?--I want your advice."
 
 "I think I'd run the risk, and tell her the truth. She'll forgive ye
 both."
 
 "Never!" said Henchard. "I am not going to let her know the truth. Her
 mother and I be going to marry again; and it will not only help us to
 keep our child's respect, but it will be more proper. Susan looks upon
 herself as the sailor's widow, and won't think o' living with me as
 formerly without another religious ceremony--and she's right."
 
 Farfrae thereupon said no more. The letter to the young Jersey woman was
 carefully framed by him, and the interview ended, Henchard saying, as
 the Scotchman left, "I feel it a great relief, Farfrae, to tell some
 friend o' this! You see now that the Mayor of Casterbridge is not so
 thriving in his mind as it seems he might be from the state of his
 pocket."
 
 "I do. And I'm sorry for ye!" said Farfrae.
 
 When he was gone Henchard copied the letter, and, enclosing a cheque,
 took it to the post-office, from which he walked back thoughtfully.
 
 "Can it be that it will go off so easily!" he said. "Poor thing--God
 knows! Now then, to make amends to Susan!"
 
 
 
 
 13.
 
 
 The cottage which Michael Henchard hired for his wife Susan under her
 name of Newson--in pursuance of their plan--was in the upper or western
 part of the town, near the Roman wall, and the avenue which overshadowed
--**--**--
 
 "I don't know but that I may as well go with 'ee, Solomon," said
 Christopher; "I'm as clammy as a cockle-snail."
 
 
 
 
 14.
 
 
 A Martinmas summer of Mrs. Henchard's life set in with her entry into
 her husband's large house and respectable social orbit; and it was as
 bright as such summers well can be. Lest she should pine for deeper
 affection than he could give he made a point of showing some semblance
 of it in external action. Among other things he had the iron railings,
 that had smiled sadly in dull rust for the last eighty years, painted
 a bright green, and the heavy-barred, small-paned Georgian sash windows
 enlivened with three coats of white. He was as kind to her as a man,
 mayor, and churchwarden could possibly be. The house was large, the
 rooms lofty, and the landings wide; and the two unassuming women
 scarcely made a perceptible addition to its contents.
 
 To Elizabeth-Jane the time was a most triumphant one. The freedom she
 experienced, the indulgence with which she was treated, went beyond her
 expectations. The reposeful, easy, affluent life to which her mother's
 marriage had introduced her was, in truth, the beginning of a great
 change in Elizabeth. She found she could have nice personal possessions
 and ornaments for the asking, and, as the mediaeval saying puts it,
 "Take, have, and keep, are pleasant words." With peace of mind came
 development, and with development beauty. Knowledge--the result of great
 natural insight--she did not lack; learning, accomplishment--those,
 alas, she had not; but as the winter and spring passed by her thin
 face and figure filled out in rounder and softer curves; the lines and
 contractions upon her young brow went away; the muddiness of skin which
 she had looked upon as her lot by nature departed with a change to
--**--**--
 his slight frame bent under the weight. Occasionally she would hear
 a perfect cannonade of laughter from Henchard, arising from something
 Donald had said, the latter looking quite innocent and not laughing at
 all. In Henchard's somewhat lonely life he evidently found the young
 man as desirable for comradeship as he was useful for consultations.
 Donald's brightness of intellect maintained in the corn-factor the
 admiration it had won at the first hour of their meeting. The poor
 opinion, and but ill-concealed, that he entertained of the
 slim Farfrae's physical girth, strength, and dash was more than
 counterbalanced by the immense respect he had for his brains.
 
 Her quiet eye discerned that Henchard's tigerish affection for the
 younger man, his constant liking to have Farfrae near him, now and then
 resulted in a tendency to domineer, which, however, was checked in a
 moment when Donald exhibited marks of real offence. One day, looking
 down on their figures from on high, she heard the latter remark, as they
 stood in the doorway between the garden and yard, that their habit of
 walking and driving about together rather neutralized Farfrae's value
 as a second pair of eyes, which should be used in places where the
 principal was not. "'Od damn it," cried Henchard, "what's all the world!
 I like a fellow to talk to. Now come along and hae some supper, and
 don't take too much thought about things, or ye'll drive me crazy."
 
 When she walked with her mother, on the other hand, she often beheld the
 Scotchman looking at them with a curious interest. The fact that he had
 met her at the Three Mariners was insufficient to account for it, since
 on the occasions on which she had entered his room he had never raised
 his eyes. Besides, it was at her mother more particularly than
--**--**--
 "I wished to see you? O no--at least, that is, I am afraid there may be
 a mistake."
 
 "Didn't you ask me to come here? Didn't you write this?" Elizabeth held
 out her note.
 
 "No. Indeed, at no hand would I have thought of it! And for you--didn't
 you ask me? This is not your writing?" And he held up his.
 
 "By no means."
 
 "And is that really so! Then it's somebody wanting to see us both.
 Perhaps we would do well to wait a little longer."
 
 Acting on this consideration they lingered, Elizabeth-Jane's face being
 arranged to an expression of preternatural composure, and the young
 Scot, at every footstep in the street without, looking from under the
 granary to see if the passer were about to enter and declare himself
 their summoner. They watched individual drops of rain creeping down the
 thatch of the opposite rick--straw after straw--till they reached the
 bottom; but nobody came, and the granary roof began to drip.
 
 "The person is not likely to be coming," said Farfrae. "It's a trick
 perhaps, and if so, it's a great pity to waste our time like this, and
 so much to be done."
 
 "'Tis a great liberty," said Elizabeth.
 
 "It's true, Miss Newson. We'll hear news of this some day depend on't,
 and who it was that did it. I wouldn't stand for it hindering myself;
 but you, Miss Newson----"
 
 "I don't mind--much,' she replied.
 
 "Neither do I."
 
 They lapsed again into silence. "You are anxious to get back to
 Scotland, I suppose, Mr. Farfrae?" she inquired.
 
 "O no, Miss Newson. Why would I be?"
 
 "I only supposed you might be from the song you sang at the Three
 Mariners--about Scotland and home, I mean--which you seemed to feel so
 deep down in your heart; so that we all felt for you."
--**--**--
 She looked from the window and saw Henchard and Farfrae in the hay-yard
 talking, with that impetuous cordiality on the Mayor's part, and genial
 modesty on the younger man's, that was now so generally observable
 in their intercourse. Friendship between man and man; what a rugged
 strength there was in it, as evinced by these two. And yet the seed that
 was to lift the foundation of this friendship was at that moment taking
 root in a chink of its structure.
 
 It was about six o'clock; the men were dropping off homeward one by one.
 The last to leave was a round-shouldered, blinking young man of nineteen
 or twenty, whose mouth fell ajar on the slightest provocation, seemingly
 because there was no chin to support it. Henchard called aloud to him as
 he went out of the gate, "Here--Abel Whittle!"
 
 Whittle turned, and ran back a few steps. "Yes, sir," he said, in
 breathless deprecation, as if he knew what was coming next.
 
 "Once more--be in time to-morrow morning. You see what's to be done, and
 you hear what I say, and you know I'm not going to be trifled with any
 longer."
 
 "Yes, sir." Then Abel Whittle left, and Henchard and Farfrae; and
 Elizabeth saw no more of them.
 
 Now there was good reason for this command on Henchard's part. Poor
 Abel, as he was called, had an inveterate habit of over-sleeping himself
 and coming late to his work. His anxious will was to be among the
 earliest; but if his comrades omitted to pull the string that he always
 tied round his great toe and left hanging out the window for that
 purpose, his will was as wind. He did not arrive in time.
 
 As he was often second hand at the hay-weighing, or at the crane which
--**--**--
 "They'll talk any nonsense," Henchard replied with covered gloom. "Well,
 you can go now. And I am coming to value the hay, d'ye hear?--I." The
 boy departed, and Henchard murmured, "Wish he were master here, do
 they?"
 
 He went towards Durnover. On his way he overtook Farfrae. They walked on
 together, Henchard looking mostly on the ground.
 
 "You're no yoursel' the day?" Donald inquired.
 
 "Yes, I am very well," said Henchard.
 
 "But ye are a bit down--surely ye are down? Why, there's nothing to be
 angry about! 'Tis splendid stuff that we've got from Blackmoor Vale. By
 the by, the people in Durnover want their hay valued."
 
 "Yes. I am going there."
 
 "I'll go with ye."
 
 As Henchard did not reply Donald practised a piece of music sotto voce,
 till, getting near the bereaved people's door, he stopped himself with--
 
 "Ah, as their father is dead I won't go on with such as that. How could
 I forget?"
 
 "Do you care so very much about hurting folks' feelings?" observed
 Henchard with a half sneer. "You do, I know--especially mine!"
 
 "I am sorry if I have hurt yours, sir," replied Donald, standing still,
 with a second expression of the same sentiment in the regretfulness of
 his face. "Why should you say it--think it?"
 
 The cloud lifted from Henchard's brow, and as Donald finished the
 corn-merchant turned to him, regarding his breast rather than his face.
 
 "I have been hearing things that vexed me," he said. "'Twas that made me
 short in my manner--made me overlook what you really are. Now, I don't
 want to go in here about this hay--Farfrae, you can do it better than I.
 They sent for 'ee, too. I have to attend a meeting of the Town Council
 at eleven, and 'tis drawing on for't."
 
 They parted thus in renewed friendship, Donald forbearing to ask
--**--**--
 
 Henchard returned to his house, had tea with his wife and daughter, and
 then walked out. It was now dusk. He soon saw that the tendency of all
 promenaders was towards a particular spot in the Walks, and eventually
 proceeded thither himself. The notes of a stringed band came from the
 enclosure that Farfrae had erected--the pavilion as he called it--and
 when the Mayor reached it he perceived that a gigantic tent had been
 ingeniously constructed without poles or ropes. The densest point of the
 avenue of sycamores had been selected, where the boughs made a closely
 interlaced vault overhead; to these boughs the canvas had been hung, and
 a barrel roof was the result. The end towards the wind was enclosed, the
 other end was open. Henchard went round and saw the interior.
 
 In form it was like the nave of a cathedral with one gable removed, but
 the scene within was anything but devotional. A reel or fling of some
 sort was in progress; and the usually sedate Farfrae was in the midst of
 the other dancers in the costume of a wild Highlander, flinging himself
 about and spinning to the tune. For a moment Henchard could not help
 laughing. Then he perceived the immense admiration for the Scotchman
 that revealed itself in the women's faces; and when this exhibition was
 over, and a new dance proposed, and Donald had disappeared for a time to
 return in his natural garments, he had an unlimited choice of partners,
 every girl being in a coming-on disposition towards one who so
 thoroughly understood the poetry of motion as he.
 
 All the town crowded to the Walk, such a delightful idea of a ballroom
 never having occurred to the inhabitants before. Among the rest of the
 onlookers were Elizabeth and her mother--the former thoughtful yet
--**--**--
 herself, had gone away, leaving her daughter to return at her own
 pleasure. The latter moved on into the dark dense old avenues, or rather
 vaults of living woodwork, which ran along the town boundary, and stood
 reflecting.
 
 A man followed in a few minutes, and her face being to-wards the shine
 from the tent he recognized her. It was Farfrae--just come from the
 dialogue with Henchard which had signified his dismissal.
 
 "And it's you, Miss Newson?--and I've been looking for ye everywhere!"
 he said, overcoming a sadness imparted by the estrangement with the
 corn-merchant. "May I walk on with you as far as your street-corner?"
 
 She thought there might be something wrong in this, but did not utter
 any objection. So together they went on, first down the West Walk, and
 then into the Bowling Walk, till Farfrae said, "It's like that I'm going
 to leave you soon."
 
 She faltered, "Why?"
 
 "Oh--as a mere matter of business--nothing more. But we'll not concern
 ourselves about it--it is for the best. I hoped to have another dance
 with you."
 
 She said she could not dance--in any proper way.
 
 "Nay, but you do! It's the feeling for it rather than the learning of
 steps that makes pleasant dancers....I fear I offended your father by
 getting up this! And now, perhaps, I'll have to go to another part o'
 the warrld altogether!"
 
 This seemed such a melancholy prospect that Elizabeth-Jane breathed
 a sigh--letting it off in fragments that he might not hear her.
 But darkness makes people truthful, and the Scotchman went on
 impulsively--perhaps he had heard her after all:
 
 "I wish I was richer, Miss Newson; and your stepfather had not been
 offended, I would ask you something in a short time--yes, I would ask
 you to-night. But that's not for me!"
--**--**--
 He called Elizabeth-Jane. Seeing how he looked when she entered she
 appeared alarmed.
 
 "Nothing to find fault with," he said, observing her concern. "Only I
 want to caution you, my dear. That man, Farfrae--it is about him. I've
 seen him talking to you two or three times--he danced with 'ee at the
 rejoicings, and came home with 'ee. Now, now, no blame to you. But just
 harken: Have you made him any foolish promise? Gone the least bit beyond
 sniff and snaff at all?"
 
 "No. I have promised him nothing."
 
 "Good. All's well that ends well. I particularly wish you not to see him
 again."
 
 "Very well, sir."
 
 "You promise?"
 
 She hesitated for a moment, and then said--
 
 "Yes, if you much wish it."
 
 "I do. He's an enemy to our house!"
 
 When she had gone he sat down, and wrote in a heavy hand to Farfrae
 thus:--
 
 
 SIR,--I make request that henceforth you and my stepdaughter be as
 strangers to each other. She on her part has promised to welcome no
 more addresses from you; and I trust, therefore, you will not attempt to
 force them upon her.
 
 M. HENCHARD.
 
 
 One would almost have supposed Henchard to have had policy to see
 that no better modus vivendi could be arrived at with Farfrae than by
 encouraging him to become his son-in-law. But such a scheme for buying
 over a rival had nothing to recommend it to the Mayor's headstrong
 faculties. With all domestic finesse of that kind he was hopelessly at
 variance. Loving a man or hating him, his diplomacy was as wrongheaded
 as a buffalo's; and his wife had not ventured to suggest the course
 which she, for many reasons, would have welcomed gladly.
 
 Meanwhile Donald Farfrae had opened the gates of commerce on his own
 account at a spot on Durnover Hill--as far as possible from Henchard's
--**--**--
 she was awake, yet she was asleep.
 
 A word from her mother roused her. Without preface, and as the
 continuation of a scene already progressing in her mind, Mrs. Henchard
 said: "You remember the note sent to you and Mr. Farfrae--asking you to
 meet some one in Durnover Barton--and that you thought it was a trick to
 make fools of you?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "It was not to make fools of you--it was done to bring you together.
 'Twas I did it."
 
 "Why?" said Elizabeth, with a start.
 
 "I--wanted you to marry Mr. Farfrae."
 
 "O mother!" Elizabeth-Jane bent down her head so much that she looked
 quite into her own lap. But as her mother did not go on, she said, "What
 reason?"
 
 "Well, I had a reason. 'Twill out one day. I wish it could have been in
 my time! But there--nothing is as you wish it! Henchard hates him."
 
 "Perhaps they'll be friends again," murmured the girl.
 
 "I don't know--I don't know." After this her mother was silent, and
 dozed; and she spoke on the subject no more.
 
 Some little time later on Farfrae was passing Henchard's house on a
 Sunday morning, when he observed that the blinds were all down. He rang
 the bell so softly that it only sounded a single full note and a
 small one; and then he was informed that Mrs. Henchard was dead--just
 dead--that very hour.
 
 At the town-pump there were gathered when he passed a few old
 inhabitants, who came there for water whenever they had, as at present,
 spare time to fetch it, because it was purer from that original fount
 than from their own wells. Mrs. Cuxsom, who had been standing there for
 an indefinite time with her pitcher, was describing the incidents of
 Mrs. Henchard's death, as she had learnt them from the nurse.
--**--**--
 Henchard had no reason to suppose the restriction one of serious weight,
 and his feeling for his late wife had not been of the nature of deep
 respect. "Some trifling fancy or other of poor Susan's, I suppose," he
 said; and without curiosity he allowed his eyes to scan the letter:--
 
 
 MY DEAR MICHAEL,--For the good of all three of us I have kept one thing
 a secret from you till now. I hope you will understand why; I think you
 will; though perhaps you may not forgive me. But, dear Michael, I have
 done it for the best. I shall be in my grave when you read this, and
 Elizabeth-Jane will have a home. Don't curse me Mike--think of how I was
 situated. I can hardly write it, but here it is. Elizabeth-Jane is not
 your Elizabeth-Jane--the child who was in my arms when you sold me.
 No; she died three months after that, and this living one is my other
 husband's. I christened her by the same name we had given to the first,
 and she filled up the ache I felt at the other's loss. Michael, I
 am dying, and I might have held my tongue; but I could not. Tell her
 husband of this or not, as you may judge; and forgive, if you can, a
 woman you once deeply wronged, as she forgives you.
 
 SUSAN HENCHARD
 
 
 Her husband regarded the paper as if it were a window-pane through
 which he saw for miles. His lips twitched, and he seemed to compress his
 frame, as if to bear better. His usual habit was not to consider whether
 destiny were hard upon him or not--the shape of his ideals in cases of
 affliction being simply a moody "I am to suffer, I perceive." "This
 much scourging, then, it is for me." But now through his passionate head
--**--**--
 Henchard, being uncultivated himself, was the bitterest critic the fair
 girl could possibly have had of her own lapses--really slight now, for
 she read omnivorously. A gratuitous ordeal was in store for her in the
 matter of her handwriting. She was passing the dining-room door one
 evening, and had occasion to go in for something. It was not till she
 had opened the door that she knew the Mayor was there in the company of
 a man with whom he transacted business.
 
 "Here, Elizabeth-Jane," he said, looking round at her, "just write down
 what I tell you--a few words of an agreement for me and this gentleman
 to sign. I am a poor tool with a pen."
 
 "Be jowned, and so be I," said the gentleman.
 
 She brought forward blotting-book, paper, and ink, and sat down.
 
 "Now then--'An agreement entered into this sixteenth day of
 October'--write that first."
 
 She started the pen in an elephantine march across the sheet. It was a
 splendid round, bold hand of her own conception, a style that would have
 stamped a woman as Minerva's own in more recent days. But other ideas
 reigned then: Henchard's creed was that proper young girls wrote
 ladies'-hand--nay, he believed that bristling characters were as innate
 and inseparable a part of refined womanhood as sex itself. Hence when,
 instead of scribbling, like the Princess Ida,--
 
      "In such a hand as when a field of corn
      Bows all its ears before the roaring East,"
 
 Elizabeth-Jane produced a line of chain-shot and sand-bags, he reddened
 in angry shame for her, and, peremptorily saying, "Never mind--I'll
 finish it," dismissed her there and then.
 
 Her considerate disposition became a pitfall to her now. She was, it
 must be admitted, sometimes provokingly and unnecessarily willing to
 saddle herself with manual labours. She would go to the kitchen instead
--**--**--
 a flexuousness about it, which seemed to avoid angularity. It was a
 revelation to Elizabeth that human beings could reach this stage of
 external development--she had never suspected it. She felt all the
 freshness and grace to be stolen from herself on the instant by the
 neighbourhood of such a stranger. And this was in face of the fact that
 Elizabeth could now have been writ handsome, while the young lady was
 simply pretty.
 
 Had she been envious she might have hated the woman; but she did not
 do that--she allowed herself the pleasure of feeling fascinated. She
 wondered where the lady had come from. The stumpy and practical walk of
 honest homeliness which mostly prevailed there, the two styles of dress
 thereabout, the simple and the mistaken, equally avouched that
 this figure was no Casterbridge woman's, even if a book in her hand
 resembling a guide-book had not also suggested it.
 
 The stranger presently moved from the tombstone of Mrs. Henchard, and
 vanished behind the corner of the wall. Elizabeth went to the tomb
 herself; beside it were two footprints distinct in the soil, signifying
 that the lady had stood there a long time. She returned homeward,
 musing on what she had seen, as she might have mused on a rainbow or the
 Northern Lights, a rare butterfly or a cameo.
 
 Interesting as things had been out of doors, at home it turned out to
 be one of her bad days. Henchard, whose two years' mayoralty was ending,
 had been made aware that he was not to be chosen to fill a vacancy in
 the list of aldermen; and that Farfrae was likely to become one of the
 Council. This caused the unfortunate discovery that she had played the
 waiting-maid in the town of which he was Mayor to rankle in his mind yet
--**--**--
 "Well, no."
 
 "What, not necessary to write ladies'-hand?" cried the joyous Elizabeth.
 
 "Not at all."
 
 "But where do you live?"
 
 "In Casterbridge, or rather I shall be living here after twelve o'clock
 to-day."
 
 Elizabeth expressed her astonishment.
 
 "I have been staying at Budmouth for a few days while my house
 was getting ready. The house I am going into is that one they call
 High-Place Hall--the old stone one looking down the lane to the market.
 Two or three rooms are fit for occupation, though not all: I sleep there
 to-night for the first time. Now will you think over my proposal, and
 meet me here the first fine day next week, and say if you are still in
 the same mind?"
 
 Elizabeth, her eyes shining at this prospect of a change from an
 unbearable position, joyfully assented; and the two parted at the gate
 of the churchyard.
 
 
 
 
 21.
 
 
 As a maxim glibly repeated from childhood remains practically unmarked
 till some mature experience enforces it, so did this High-Place Hall now
 for the first time really show itself to Elizabeth-Jane, though her ears
 had heard its name on a hundred occasions.
 
 Her mind dwelt upon nothing else but the stranger, and the house,
 and her own chance of living there, all the rest of the day. In the
 afternoon she had occasion to pay a few bills in the town and do a
 little shopping when she learnt that what was a new discovery to
 herself had become a common topic about the streets. High-Place Hall
 was undergoing repair; a lady was coming there to live shortly; all the
 shop-people knew it, and had already discounted the chance of her being
 a customer.
 
 Elizabeth-Jane could, however, add a capping touch to information so new
 to her in the bulk. The lady, she said, had arrived that day.
--**--**--
 The day and the hour came; but a drizzling rain fell. Elizabeth-Jane
 having now changed her orbit from one of gay independence to laborious
 self-help, thought the weather good enough for such declined glory as
 hers, if her friend would only face it--a matter of doubt. She went to
 the boot-room where her pattens had hung ever since her apotheosis; took
 them down, had their mildewed leathers blacked, and put them on as she
 had done in old times. Thus mounted, and with cloak and umbrella, she
 went off to the place of appointment--intending, if the lady were not
 there, to call at the house.
 
 One side of the churchyard--the side towards the weather--was sheltered
 by an ancient thatched mud wall whose eaves overhung as much as one or
 two feet. At the back of the wall was a corn-yard with its granary and
 barns--the place wherein she had met Farfrae many months earlier. Under
 the projection of the thatch she saw a figure. The young lady had come.
 
 Her presence so exceptionally substantiated the girl's utmost hopes that
 she almost feared her good fortune. Fancies find rooms in the strongest
 minds. Here, in a churchyard old as civilization, in the worst of
 weathers, was a strange woman of curious fascinations never seen
 elsewhere: there might be some devilry about her presence. However,
 Elizabeth went on to the church tower, on whose summit the rope of a
 flagstaff rattled in the wind; and thus she came to the wall.
 
 The lady had such a cheerful aspect in the drizzle that Elizabeth forgot
 her fancy. "Well," said the lady, a little of the whiteness of her teeth
 appearing with the word through the black fleece that protected her
 face, "have you decided?"
 
 "Yes, quite," said the other eagerly.
 
 "Your father is willing?"
--**--**--
 Henchard thought it over. "Lucetta is related to her, I suppose,"
 he said to himself. "Yes, I must put her in her proper position,
 undoubtedly."
 
 It was by no means with the oppression that would once have accompanied
 the thought that he regarded the moral necessity now; it was, indeed,
 with interest, if not warmth. His bitter disappointment at finding
 Elizabeth-Jane to be none of his, and himself a childless man, had left
 an emotional void in Henchard that he unconsciously craved to fill. In
 this frame of mind, though without strong feeling, he had strolled up
 the alley and into High-Place Hall by the postern at which Elizabeth
 had so nearly encountered him. He had gone on thence into the court, and
 inquired of a man whom he saw unpacking china from a crate if Miss Le
 Sueur was living there. Miss Le Sueur had been the name under which he
 had known Lucetta--or "Lucette," as she had called herself at that time.
 
 The man replied in the negative; that Miss Templeman only had come.
 Henchard went away, concluding that Lucetta had not as yet settled in.
 
 He was in this interested stage of the inquiry when he witnessed
 Elizabeth-Jane's departure the next day. On hearing her announce the
 address there suddenly took possession of him the strange thought that
 Lucetta and Miss Templeman were one and the same person, for he could
 recall that in her season of intimacy with him the name of the rich
 relative whom he had deemed somewhat a mythical personage had been given
 as Templeman. Though he was not a fortune-hunter, the possibility
 that Lucetta had been sublimed into a lady of means by some munificent
 testament on the part of this relative lent a charm to her image which
 it might not otherwise have acquired. He was getting on towards the dead
--**--**--
 
 The room disclosed was prettily furnished as a boudoir or small
 drawing-room, and on a sofa with two cylindrical pillows reclined a
 dark-haired, large-eyed, pretty woman, of unmistakably French extraction
 on one side or the other. She was probably some years older than
 Elizabeth, and had a sparkling light in her eye. In front of the sofa
 was a small table, with a pack of cards scattered upon it faces upward.
 
 The attitude had been so full of abandonment that she bounded up like a
 spring on hearing the door open.
 
 Perceiving that it was Elizabeth she lapsed into ease, and came across
 to her with a reckless skip that innate grace only prevented from being
 boisterous.
 
 "Why, you are late," she said, taking hold of Elizabeth-Jane's hands.
 
 "There were so many little things to put up."
 
 "And you seem dead-alive and tired. Let me try to enliven you by some
 wonderful tricks I have learnt, to kill time. Sit there and don't move."
 She gathered up the pack of cards, pulled the table in front of her, and
 began to deal them rapidly, telling Elizabeth to choose some.
 
 "Well, have you chosen?" she asked flinging down the last card.
 
 "No," stammered Elizabeth, arousing herself from a reverie. "I forgot, I
 was thinking of--you, and me--and how strange it is that I am here."
 
 Miss Templeman looked at Elizabeth-Jane with interest, and laid down the
 cards. "Ah! never mind," she said. "I'll lie here while you sit by me;
 and we'll talk."
 
 Elizabeth drew up silently to the head of the sofa, but with obvious
 pleasure. It could be seen that though in years she was younger than her
 entertainer in manner and general vision she seemed more of the sage.
 Miss Templeman deposited herself on the sofa in her former flexuous
--**--**--
 Elizabeth-Jane sighed.
 
 "Are you particularly interested in anybody out there?" said Lucetta.
 
 "O, no," said her companion, a quick red shooting over her face.
 
 Luckily Farfrae's figure was immediately covered by the apple-tree.
 
 Lucetta looked hard at her. "Quite sure?" she said.
 
 "O yes," said Elizabeth-Jane.
 
 Again Lucetta looked out. "They are all farmers, I suppose?" she said.
 
 "No. There's Mr. Bulge--he's a wine merchant; there's Benjamin
 Brownlet--a horse dealer; and Kitson, the pig breeder; and Yopper, the
 auctioneer; besides maltsters, and millers--and so on." Farfrae stood
 out quite distinctly now; but she did not mention him.
 
 The Saturday afternoon slipped on thus desultorily. The market changed
 from the sample-showing hour to the idle hour before starting homewards,
 when tales were told. Henchard had not called on Lucetta though he had
 stood so near. He must have been too busy, she thought. He would come on
 Sunday or Monday.
 
 The days came but not the visitor, though Lucetta repeated her dressing
 with scrupulous care. She got disheartened. It may at once be declared
 that Lucetta no longer bore towards Henchard all that warm allegiance
 which had characterized her in their first acquaintance, the then
 unfortunate issue of things had chilled pure love considerably. But
 there remained a conscientious wish to bring about her union with him,
 now that there was nothing to hinder it--to right her position--which
 in itself was a happiness to sigh for. With strong social reasons on
 her side why their marriage should take place there had ceased to be
 any worldly reason on his why it should be postponed, since she had
 succeeded to fortune.
 
 Tuesday was the great Candlemas fair. At breakfast she said to
 Elizabeth-Jane quite coolly: "I imagine your father may call to see you
 to-day. I suppose he stands close by in the market-place with the rest
--**--**--
 sundry shops, which would occupy Elizabeth's time for the next hour or
 two, at least.
 
 "And have you ever seen the Museum?"
 
 Elizabeth-Jane had not.
 
 "Then you should do so at once. You can finish the morning by going
 there. It is an old house in a back street--I forget where--but you'll
 find out--and there are crowds of interesting things--skeletons, teeth,
 old pots and pans, ancient boots and shoes, birds' eggs--all charmingly
 instructive. You'll be sure to stay till you get quite hungry."
 
 Elizabeth hastily put on her things and departed. "I wonder why she
 wants to get rid of me to-day!" she said sorrowfully as she went. That
 her absence, rather than her services or instruction, was in request,
 had been readily apparent to Elizabeth-Jane, simple as she seemed, and
 difficult as it was to attribute a motive for the desire.
 
 She had not been gone ten minutes when one of Lucetta's servants was
 sent to Henchard's with a note. The contents were briefly:--
 
 
 DEAR MICHAEL,--You will be standing in view of my house to-day for two
 or three hours in the course of your business, so do please call and
 see me. I am sadly disappointed that you have not come before, for can I
 help anxiety about my own equivocal relation to you?--especially now
 my aunt's fortune has brought me more prominently before society? Your
 daughter's presence here may be the cause of your neglect; and I have
 therefore sent her away for the morning. Say you come on business--I
 shall be quite alone.
 
 LUCETTA.
 
 
 When the messenger returned her mistress gave directions that if a
 gentleman called he was to be admitted at once, and sat down to await
 results.
 
 Sentimentally she did not much care to see him--his delays had wearied
 her, but it was necessary; and with a sigh she arranged herself
--**--**--
 He therefore forgave the Mayor his curtness; and this morning on his
 way to the fair he had called at her house, where he learnt that she
 was staying at Miss Templeman's. A little stimulated at not finding her
 ready and waiting--so fanciful are men!--he hastened on to High-Place
 Hall to encounter no Elizabeth but its mistress herself.
 
 "The fair to-day seems a large one," she said when, by natural
 deviation, their eyes sought the busy scene without. "Your numerous
 fairs and markets keep me interested. How many things I think of while I
 watch from here!"
 
 He seemed in doubt how to answer, and the babble without reached them
 as they sat--voices as of wavelets on a looping sea, one ever and anon
 rising above the rest. "Do you look out often?" he asked.
 
 "Yes--very often."
 
 "Do you look for any one you know?"
 
 Why should she have answered as she did?
 
 "I look as at a picture merely. But," she went on, turning pleasantly to
 him, "I may do so now--I may look for you. You are always there, are
 you not? Ah--I don't mean it seriously! But it is amusing to look for
 somebody one knows in a crowd, even if one does not want him. It takes
 off the terrible oppressiveness of being surrounded by a throng, and
 having no point of junction with it through a single individual."
 
 "Ay! Maybe you'll be very lonely, ma'am?"
 
 "Nobody knows how lonely."
 
 "But you are rich, they say?"
 
 "If so, I don't know how to enjoy my riches. I came to Casterbridge
 thinking I should like to live here. But I wonder if I shall."
 
 "Where did ye come from, ma'am?"
 
 "The neighbourhood of Bath."
 
 "And I from near Edinboro'," he murmured. "It's better to stay at home,
--**--**--
 "So do I--as far as I can. But it was an old house where I was born, and
 they pulled it down for improvements, so I seem hardly to have any home
 to think of now."
 
 Lucetta did not add, as she might have done, that the house was in St.
 Helier, and not in Bath.
 
 "But the mountains, and the mists and the rocks, they are there! And
 don't they seem like home?"
 
 She shook her head.
 
 "They do to me--they do to me," he murmured. And his mind could be seen
 flying away northwards. Whether its origin were national or personal, it
 was quite true what Lucetta had said, that the curious double strands
 in Farfrae's thread of life--the commercial and the romantic--were very
 distinct at times. Like the colours in a variegated cord those contrasts
 could be seen intertwisted, yet not mingling.
 
 "You are wishing you were back again," she said.
 
 "Ah, no, ma'am," said Farfrae, suddenly recalling himself.
 
 The fair without the windows was now raging thick and loud. It was the
 chief hiring fair of the year, and differed quite from the market of a
 few days earlier. In substance it was a whitey-brown crowd flecked with
 white--this being the body of labourers waiting for places. The long
 bonnets of the women, like waggon-tilts, their cotton gowns and checked
 shawls, mixed with the carters' smockfrocks; for they, too, entered into
 the hiring. Among the rest, at the corner of the pavement, stood an
 old shepherd, who attracted the eyes of Lucetta and Farfrae by his
 stillness. He was evidently a chastened man. The battle of life had been
 a sharp one with him, for, to begin with, he was a man of small frame.
 He was now so bowed by hard work and years that, approaching from
--**--**--
 "Something to think over when we are alone, it's like to be?"
 
 "Oh, I don't know that. It is commonplace after all."
 
 "No, I'll not say that. O no!"
 
 "Well, whatever it has been, it is now over; and the market calls you to
 be gone."
 
 "Yes, yes. Market--business! I wish there were no business in the
 warrld."
 
 Lucetta almost laughed--she would quite have laughed--but that there was
 a little emotion going in her at the time. "How you change!" she said.
 "You should not change like this.
 
 "I have never wished such things before," said the Scotchman, with a
 simple, shamed, apologetic look for his weakness. "It is only since
 coming here and seeing you!"
 
 "If that's the case, you had better not look at me any longer. Dear me,
 I feel I have quite demoralized you!"
 
 "But look or look not, I will see you in my thoughts. Well, I'll
 go--thank you for the pleasure of this visit."
 
 "Thank you for staying."
 
 "Maybe I'll get into my market-mind when I've been out a few minutes,"
 he murmured. "But I don't know--I don't know!"
 
 As he went she said eagerly, "You may hear them speak of me in
 Casterbridge as time goes on. If they tell you I'm a coquette, which
 some may, because of the incidents of my life, don't believe it, for I
 am not."
 
 "I swear I will not!" he said fervidly.
 
 Thus the two. She had enkindled the young man's enthusiasm till he was
 quite brimming with sentiment; while he from merely affording her a new
 form of idleness, had gone on to wake her serious solicitude. Why was
 this? They could not have told.
 
 Lucetta as a young girl would hardly have looked at a tradesman. But her
 ups and downs, capped by her indiscretions with Henchard had made her
--**--**--
 "We are looking at the wonderful new drill," Miss Templeman said. "But
 practically it is a stupid thing--is it not?" she added, on the strength
 of Henchard's information.
 
 "Stupid? O no!" said Farfrae gravely. "It will revolutionize sowing
 heerabout! No more sowers flinging their seed about broadcast, so that
 some falls by the wayside and some among thorns, and all that.
 Each grain will go straight to its intended place, and nowhere else
 whatever!"
 
 "Then the romance of the sower is gone for good," observed
 Elizabeth-Jane, who felt herself at one with Farfrae in Bible-reading
 at least. "'He that observeth the wind shall not sow,' so the Preacher
 said; but his words will not be to the point any more. How things
 change!"
 
 "Ay; ay....It must be so!" Donald admitted, his gaze fixing itself on a
 blank point far away. "But the machines are already very common in the
 East and North of England," he added apologetically.
 
 Lucetta seemed to be outside this train of sentiment, her acquaintance
 with the Scriptures being somewhat limited. "Is the machine yours?" she
 asked of Farfrae.
 
 "O no, madam," said he, becoming embarrassed and deferential at the
 sound of her voice, though with Elizabeth Jane he was quite at his ease.
 "No, no--I merely recommended that it should be got."
 
 In the silence which followed Farfrae appeared only conscious of her;
 to have passed from perception of Elizabeth into a brighter sphere of
 existence than she appertained to. Lucetta, discerning that he was much
 mixed that day, partly in his mercantile mood and partly in his romantic
 one, said gaily to him--
 
 "Well, don't forsake the machine for us," and went indoors with her
 companion.
 
 The latter felt that she had been in the way, though why was
 unaccountable to her. Lucetta explained the matter somewhat by saying
--**--**--
 circle would not touch.
 
 Susan Henchard's daughter bore up against the frosty ache of the
 treatment, as she had borne up under worse things, and contrived as soon
 as possible to get out of the inharmonious room without being missed.
 The Scotchman seemed hardly the same Farfrae who had danced with her and
 walked with her in a delicate poise between love and friendship--that
 period in the history of a love when alone it can be said to be
 unalloyed with pain.
 
 She stoically looked from her bedroom window, and contemplated her fate
 as if it were written on the top of the church-tower hard by. "Yes," she
 said at last, bringing down her palm upon the sill with a pat: "HE is
 the second man of that story she told me!"
 
 All this time Henchard's smouldering sentiments towards Lucetta had been
 fanned into higher and higher inflammation by the circumstances of the
 case. He was discovering that the young woman for whom he once felt a
 pitying warmth which had been almost chilled out of him by reflection,
 was, when now qualified with a slight inaccessibility and a more matured
 beauty, the very being to make him satisfied with life. Day after day
 proved to him, by her silence, that it was no use to think of bringing
 her round by holding aloof; so he gave in, and called upon her again,
 Elizabeth-Jane being absent.
 
 He crossed the room to her with a heavy tread of some awkwardness, his
 strong, warm gaze upon her--like the sun beside the moon in comparison
 with Farfrae's modest look--and with something of a hail-fellow bearing,
 as, indeed, was not unnatural. But she seemed so transubstantiated
 by her change of position, and held out her hand to him in such cool
 friendship, that he became deferential, and sat down with a perceptible
--**--**--
 independent now, surely the privilege is due to me!"
 
 "Yes, it is," he said. "But it is not by what is, in this life, but by
 what appears, that you are judged; and I therefore think you ought to
 accept me--for your own good name's sake. What is known in your native
 Jersey may get known here."
 
 "How you keep on about Jersey! I am English!"
 
 "Yes, yes. Well, what do you say to my proposal?"
 
 For the first time in their acquaintance Lucetta had the move; and yet
 she was backward. "For the present let things be," she said with some
 embarrassment. "Treat me as an acquaintance, and I'll treat you as
 one. Time will--" She stopped; and he said nothing to fill the gap for
 awhile, there being no pressure of half acquaintance to drive them into
 speech if they were not minded for it.
 
 "That's the way the wind blows, is it?" he said at last grimly, nodding
 an affirmative to his own thoughts.
 
 A yellow flood of reflected sunlight filled the room for a few instants.
 It was produced by the passing of a load of newly trussed hay from the
 country, in a waggon marked with Farfrae's name. Beside it rode Farfrae
 himself on horseback. Lucetta's face became--as a woman's face becomes
 when the man she loves rises upon her gaze like an apparition.
 
 A turn of the eye by Henchard, a glance from the window, and the
 secret of her inaccessibility would have been revealed. But Henchard in
 estimating her tone was looking down so plumb-straight that he did not
 note the warm consciousness upon Lucetta's face.
 
 "I shouldn't have thought it--I shouldn't have thought it of women!" he
 said emphatically by-and-by, rising and shaking himself into activity;
 while Lucetta was so anxious to divert him from any suspicion of the
--**--**--
 third and haloed figure, was opposite them; Elizabeth-Jane, being out
 of the game, and out of the group, could observe all from afar, like
 the evangelist who had to write it down: that there were long spaces of
 taciturnity, when all exterior circumstances were subdued to the touch
 of spoons and china, the click of a heel on the pavement under the
 window, the passing of a wheelbarrow or cart, the whistling of the
 carter, the gush of water into householders' buckets at the town-pump
 opposite, the exchange of greetings among their neighbours, and the
 rattle of the yokes by which they carried off their evening supply.
 
 "More bread-and-butter?" said Lucetta to Henchard and Farfrae equally,
 holding out between them a plateful of long slices. Henchard took a
 slice by one end and Donald by the other; each feeling certain he was
 the man meant; neither let go, and the slice came in two.
 
 "Oh--I am so sorry!" cried Lucetta, with a nervous titter. Farfrae tried
 to laugh; but he was too much in love to see the incident in any but a
 tragic light.
 
 "How ridiculous of all three of them!" said Elizabeth to herself.
 
 Henchard left the house with a ton of conjecture, though without a grain
 of proof, that the counterattraction was Farfrae; and therefore he
 would not make up his mind. Yet to Elizabeth-Jane it was plain as the
 town-pump that Donald and Lucetta were incipient lovers. More than once,
 in spite of her care, Lucetta had been unable to restrain her glance
 from flitting across into Farfrae's eyes like a bird to its nest. But
 Henchard was constructed upon too large a scale to discern such minutiae
 as these by an evening light, which to him were as the notes of an
 insect that lie above the compass of the human ear.
--**--**--
 
 "At this hour and moment, sir," said Jopp, who, standing hands-pocketed
 at the street corner till the sun had faded the shoulders of his coat
 to scarecrow green, had regularly watched Henchard in the market-place,
 measured him, and learnt him, by virtue of the power which the still
 man has in his stillness of knowing the busy one better than he knows
 himself. Jopp too, had had a convenient experience; he was the only one
 in Casterbridge besides Henchard and the close-lipped Elizabeth who knew
 that Lucetta came truly from Jersey, and but proximately from Bath. "I
 know Jersey too, sir," he said. "Was living there when you used to do
 business that way. O yes--have often seen ye there."
 
 "Indeed! Very good. Then the thing is settled. The testimonials you
 showed me when you first tried for't are sufficient."
 
 That characters deteriorated in time of need possibly did not occur
 to Henchard. Jopp said, "Thank you," and stood more firmly, in the
 consciousness that at last he officially belonged to that spot.
 
 "Now," said Henchard, digging his strong eyes into Jopp's face, "one
 thing is necessary to me, as the biggest corn-and-hay dealer in these
 parts. The Scotchman, who's taking the town trade so bold into
 his hands, must be cut out. D'ye hear? We two can't live side by
 side--that's clear and certain."
 
 "I've seen it all," said Jopp.
 
 "By fair competition I mean, of course," Henchard continued. "But as
 hard, keen, and unflinching as fair--rather more so. By such a desperate
 bid against him for the farmers' custom as will grind him into the
 ground--starve him out. I've capital, mind ye, and I can do it."
 
 "I'm all that way of thinking," said the new foreman. Jopp's dislike of
 Farfrae as the man who had once ursurped his place, while it made him
--**--**--
 "O no, no," said Henchard. "I don't altogether believe in forecasts,
 come to second thoughts on such. But I--"
 
 "You don't--you don't--'tis quite understood," said Wide-oh, without a
 sound of scorn. "You have given me a crown because you've one too many.
 But won't you join me at supper, now 'tis waiting and all?"
 
 Henchard would gladly have joined; for the savour of the stew
 had floated from the cottage into the porch with such appetizing
 distinctness that the meat, the onions, the pepper, and the herbs could
 be severally recognized by his nose. But as sitting down to
 hob-and-nob there would have seemed to mark him too implicitly as the
 weather-caster's apostle, he declined, and went his way.
 
 The next Saturday Henchard bought grain to such an enormous extent that
 there was quite a talk about his purchases among his neighbours the
 lawyer, the wine merchant, and the doctor; also on the next, and on
 all available days. When his granaries were full to choking all the
 weather-cocks of Casterbridge creaked and set their faces in another
 direction, as if tired of the south-west. The weather changed; the
 sunlight, which had been like tin for weeks, assumed the hues of
 topaz. The temperament of the welkin passed from the phlegmatic to
 the sanguine; an excellent harvest was almost a certainty; and as a
 consequence prices rushed down.
 
 All these transformations, lovely to the outsider, to the wrong-headed
 corn-dealer were terrible. He was reminded of what he had well known
 before, that a man might gamble upon the square green areas of fields as
 readily as upon those of a card-room.
 
 Henchard had backed bad weather, and apparently lost. He had mistaken
 the turn of the flood for the turn of the ebb. His dealings had been so
 extensive that settlement could not long be postponed, and to settle he
--**--**--
 
 "And that Mr. Farfrae is well aware of it? He's sharp in trade, but he
 wouldn't do anything so underhand as what you hint at."
 
 Whether because Lucetta heard this low dialogue, or not her white
 figure disappeared from her doorway inward, and the door was shut before
 Henchard could reach it to converse with her further. This disappointed
 him, for he had been sufficiently disturbed by what the man had said to
 wish to speak to her more closely. While pausing the old constable came
 up.
 
 "Just see that nobody drives against that hay and waggon to-night,
 Stubberd," said the corn-merchant. "It must bide till the morning, for
 all hands are in the field still. And if any coach or road-waggon wants
 to come along, tell 'em they must go round by the back street, and be
 hanged to 'em....Any case tomorrow up in Hall?"
 
 "Yes, sir. One in number, sir."
 
 "Oh, what's that?"
 
 "An old flagrant female, sir, swearing and committing a nuisance in a
 horrible profane manner against the church wall, sir, as if 'twere no
 more than a pot-house! That's all, sir."
 
 "Oh. The Mayor's out o' town, isn't he?"
 
 "He is, sir."
 
 "Very well, then I'll be there. Don't forget to keep an eye on that hay.
 Good night t' 'ee."
 
 During those moments Henchard had determined to follow up Lucetta
 notwithstanding her elusiveness, and he knocked for admission.
 
 The answer he received was an expression of Miss Templeman's sorrow at
 being unable to see him again that evening because she had an engagement
 to go out.
 
 Henchard walked away from the door to the opposite side of the street,
 and stood by his hay in a lonely reverie, the constable having strolled
 elsewhere, and the horses being removed. Though the moon was not bright
--**--**--
 
 "You are convinced, Donald, that I love nobody else," she presently
 said. "But I should wish to have my own way in some things."
 
 "In everything! What special thing did you mean?"
 
 "If I wished not to live always in Casterbridge, for instance, upon
 finding that I should not be happy here?"
 
 Henchard did not hear the reply; he might have done so and much more,
 but he did not care to play the eavesdropper. They went on towards
 the scene of activity, where the sheaves were being handed, a dozen a
 minute, upon the carts and waggons which carried them away.
 
 Lucetta insisted on parting from Farfrae when they drew near the
 workpeople. He had some business with them, and, though he entreated
 her to wait a few minutes, she was inexorable, and tripped off homeward
 alone.
 
 Henchard thereupon left the field and followed her. His state of mind
 was such that on reaching Lucetta's door he did not knock but opened it,
 and walked straight up to her sitting-room, expecting to find her
 there. But the room was empty, and he perceived that in his haste he had
 somehow passed her on the way hither. He had not to wait many minutes,
 however, for he soon heard her dress rustling in the hall, followed by a
 soft closing of the door. In a moment she appeared.
 
 The light was so low that she did not notice Henchard at first. As soon
 as she saw him she uttered a little cry, almost of terror.
 
 "How can you frighten me so?" she exclaimed, with a flushed face. "It
 is past ten o'clock, and you have no right to surprise me here at such a
 time."
 
 "I don't know that I've not the right. At any rate I have the excuse. Is
--**--**--
 
 "I would not--do anything against you at all!" stammered Elizabeth,
 keeping in all signs of emotion till she was ready to burst. "I cannot
 understand how my father can command you so; I don't sympathize with him
 in it at all. I'll go to him and ask him to release you."
 
 "No, no," said Lucetta. "Let it all be."
 
 
 
 
 28.
 
 
 The next morning Henchard went to the Town Hall below Lucetta's house,
 to attend Petty Sessions, being still a magistrate for the year by
 virtue of his late position as Mayor. In passing he looked up at her
 windows, but nothing of her was to be seen.
 
 Henchard as a Justice of the Peace may at first seem to be an even
 greater incongruity than Shallow and Silence themselves. But his rough
 and ready perceptions, his sledge-hammer directness, had often served
 him better than nice legal knowledge in despatching such simple business
 as fell to his hands in this Court. To-day Dr. Chalkfield, the Mayor for
 the year, being absent, the corn-merchant took the big chair, his eyes
 still abstractedly stretching out of the window to the ashlar front of
 High-Place Hall.
 
 There was one case only, and the offender stood before him. She was an
 old woman of mottled countenance, attired in a shawl of that nameless
 tertiary hue which comes, but cannot be made--a hue neither tawny,
 russet, hazel, nor ash; a sticky black bonnet that seemed to have been
 worn in the country of the Psalmist where the clouds drop fatness; and
 an apron that had been white in time so comparatively recent as still to
 contrast visibly with the rest of her clothes. The steeped aspect of the
 woman as a whole showed her to be no native of the country-side or even
 of a country-town.
--**--**--
 guineas, and paid the money, and led her away. And the man who sold his
 wife in that fashion is the man sitting there in the great big chair."
 The speaker concluded by nodding her head at Henchard and folding her
 arms.
 
 Everybody looked at Henchard. His face seemed strange, and in tint as if
 it had been powdered over with ashes. "We don't want to hear your life
 and adventures," said the second magistrate sharply, filling the pause
 which followed. "You've been asked if you've anything to say bearing on
 the case."
 
 "That bears on the case. It proves that he's no better than I, and has
 no right to sit there in judgment upon me."
 
 "'Tis a concocted story," said the clerk. "So hold your tongue!"
 
 "No--'tis true." The words came from Henchard. "'Tis as true as the
 light," he said slowly. "And upon my soul it does prove that I'm no
 better than she! And to keep out of any temptation to treat her hard for
 her revenge, I'll leave her to you."
 
 The sensation in the court was indescribably great. Henchard left the
 chair, and came out, passing through a group of people on the steps
 and outside that was much larger than usual; for it seemed that the old
 furmity dealer had mysteriously hinted to the denizens of the lane in
 which she had been lodging since her arrival, that she knew a queer
 thing or two about their great local man Mr. Henchard, if she chose to
 tell it. This had brought them hither.
 
 "Why are there so many idlers round the Town Hall to-day?" said Lucetta
 to her servant when the case was over. She had risen late, and had just
 looked out of the window.
 
 "Oh, please, ma'am, 'tis this larry about Mr. Henchard. A woman has
--**--**--
 
 "I'll run back," said Elizabeth-Jane. "I don't mind it at all, as I am
 not tired as you are." She thereupon hastened down again to the barn,
 the others pursuing their way.
 
 Elizabeth soon found the muff, such an article being by no means small
 at that time. Coming out she paused to look for a moment at the bull,
 now rather to be pitied with his bleeding nose, having perhaps rather
 intended a practical joke than a murder. Henchard had secured him by
 jamming the staff into the hinge of the barn-door, and wedging it
 there with a stake. At length she turned to hasten onward after her
 contemplation, when she saw a green-and-black gig approaching from the
 contrary direction, the vehicle being driven by Farfrae.
 
 His presence here seemed to explain Lucetta's walk that way. Donald saw
 her, drew up, and was hastily made acquainted with what had occurred. At
 Elizabeth-Jane mentioning how greatly Lucetta had been jeopardized, he
 exhibited an agitation different in kind no less than in intensity
 from any she had seen in him before. He became so absorbed in the
 circumstance that he scarcely had sufficient knowledge of what he was
 doing to think of helping her up beside him.
 
 "She has gone on with Mr. Henchard, you say?" he inquired at last.
 
 "Yes. He is taking her home. They are almost there by this time."
 
 "And you are sure she can get home?"
 
 Elizabeth-Jane was quite sure.
 
 "Your stepfather saved her?"
 
 "Entirely."
 
 Farfrae checked his horse's pace; she guessed why. He was thinking that
 it would be best not to intrude on the other two just now. Henchard
 had saved Lucetta, and to provoke a possible exhibition of her deeper
 affection for himself was as ungenerous as it was unwise.
 
 The immediate subject of their talk being exhausted she felt more
--**--**--
 Grower, and it is at his hands I shall suffer if at anybody's; while a
 fortnight's forbearance on his part would be enough to allow me to pull
 through. This may be got out of him in one way--that you would let it be
 known to him that you are my intended--that we are to be quietly married
 in the next fortnight.--Now stop, you haven't heard all! Let him have
 this story, without, of course, any prejudice to the fact that the
 actual engagement between us is to be a long one. Nobody else need know:
 you could go with me to Mr. Grower and just let me speak to 'ee before
 him as if we were on such terms. We'll ask him to keep it secret. He
 will willingly wait then. At the fortnight's end I shall be able to face
 him; and I can coolly tell him all is postponed between us for a year
 or two. Not a soul in the town need know how you've helped me. Since you
 wish to be of use, there's your way."
 
 It being now what the people called the "pinking in" of the day, that
 is, the quarter-hour just before dusk, he did not at first observe the
 result of his own words upon her.
 
 "If it were anything else," she began, and the dryness of her lips was
 represented in her voice.
 
 "But it is such a little thing!" he said, with a deep reproach. "Less
 than you have offered--just the beginning of what you have so lately
 promised! I could have told him as much myself, but he would not have
 believed me."
 
 "It is not because I won't--it is because I absolutely can't," she said,
 with rising distress.
 
 "You are provoking!" he burst out. "It is enough to make me force you to
--**--**--
 reached her own home unperceived.
 
 
 
 
 30.
 
 
 Farfrae's words to his landlady had referred to the removal of his boxes
 and other effects from his late lodgings to Lucetta's house. The work
 was not heavy, but it had been much hindered on account of the frequent
 pauses necessitated by exclamations of surprise at the event, of which
 the good woman had been briefly informed by letter a few hours earlier.
 
 At the last moment of leaving Port-Bredy, Farfrae, like John Gilpin,
 had been detained by important customers, whom, even in the exceptional
 circumstances, he was not the man to neglect. Moreover, there was a
 convenience in Lucetta arriving first at her house. Nobody there as yet
 knew what had happened; and she was best in a position to break the news
 to the inmates, and give directions for her husband's accommodation. He
 had, therefore, sent on his two-days' bride in a hired brougham, whilst
 he went across the country to a certain group of wheat and barley ricks
 a few miles off, telling her the hour at which he might be expected
 the same evening. This accounted for her trotting out to meet him after
 their separation of four hours.
 
 By a strenuous effort, after leaving Henchard she calmed herself in
 readiness to receive Donald at High-Place Hall when he came on from his
 lodgings. One supreme fact empowered her to this, the sense that, come
 what would, she had secured him. Half-an-hour after her arrival he
 walked in, and she met him with a relieved gladness, which a month's
 perilous absence could not have intensified.
 
 "There is one thing I have not done; and yet it is important," she said
 earnestly, when she had finished talking about the adventure with
 the bull. "That is, broken the news of our marriage to my dear
--**--**--
 talking about everywhere with keen interest. You should get out, and
 gossip about as other women do, and then you wouldn't be obliged to ask
 me a question of that kind. Well, now, I have something to tell you."
 
 Elizabeth-Jane said she was so glad, and made herself receptive.
 
 "I must go rather a long way back," said Lucetta, the difficulty of
 explaining herself satisfactorily to the pondering one beside her
 growing more apparent at each syllable. "You remember that trying case
 of conscience I told you of some time ago--about the first lover and the
 second lover?" She let out in jerky phrases a leading word or two of the
 story she had told.
 
 "O yes--I remember the story of YOUR FRIEND," said Elizabeth drily,
 regarding the irises of Lucetta's eyes as though to catch their exact
 shade. "The two lovers--the old one and the new: how she wanted to marry
 the second, but felt she ought to marry the first; so that she neglected
 the better course to follow the evil, like the poet Ovid I've just been
 construing: 'Video meliora proboque, deteriora sequor.'"
 
 "O no; she didn't follow evil exactly!" said Lucetta hastily.
 
 "But you said that she--or as I may say you"--answered Elizabeth,
 dropping the mask, "were in honour and conscience bound to marry the
 first?"
 
 Lucetta's blush at being seen through came and went again before
 she replied anxiously, "You will never breathe this, will you,
 Elizabeth-Jane?"
 
 "Certainly not, if you say not.
 
 "Then I will tell you that the case is more complicated--worse, in
 fact--than it seemed in my story. I and the first man were thrown
 together in a strange way, and felt that we ought to be united, as the
 world had talked of us. He was a widower, as he supposed. He had not
--**--**--
 
 New events combined to undo him. It had been a bad year for others
 besides himself, and the heavy failure of a debtor whom he had trusted
 generously completed the overthrow of his tottering credit. And now,
 in his desperation, he failed to preserve that strict correspondence
 between bulk and sample which is the soul of commerce in grain. For
 this, one of his men was mainly to blame; that worthy, in his great
 unwisdom, having picked over the sample of an enormous quantity of
 second-rate corn which Henchard had in hand, and removed the pinched,
 blasted, and smutted grains in great numbers. The produce if
 honestly offered would have created no scandal; but the blunder of
 misrepresentation, coming at such a moment, dragged Henchard's name into
 the ditch.
 
 The details of his failure were of the ordinary kind. One day
 Elizabeth-Jane was passing the King's Arms, when she saw people bustling
 in and out more than usual where there was no market. A bystander
 informed her, with some surprise at her ignorance, that it was a meeting
 of the Commissioners under Mr. Henchard's bankruptcy. She felt quite
 tearful, and when she heard that he was present in the hotel she wished
 to go in and see him, but was advised not to intrude that day.
 
 The room in which debtor and creditors had assembled was a front
 one, and Henchard, looking out of the window, had caught sight of
 Elizabeth-Jane through the wire blind. His examination had closed, and
 the creditors were leaving. The appearance of Elizabeth threw him into a
 reverie, till, turning his face from the window, and towering above all
 the rest, he called their attention for a moment more. His countenance
 had somewhat changed from its flush of prosperity; the black hair and
 whiskers were the same as ever, but a film of ash was over the rest.
--**--**--
 Jopp, his old foreman, now employed elsewhere, to whom, though he
 hated him, he had gone for lodgings because Jopp was the one man in
 Casterbridge whose observation and opinion the fallen corn-merchant
 despised to the point of indifference.
 
 Henchard returned him a scarcely perceptible nod, and Jopp stopped.
 
 "He and she are gone into their new house to-day," said Jopp.
 
 "Oh," said Henchard absently. "Which house is that?"
 
 "Your old one."
 
 "Gone into my house?" And starting up Henchard added, "MY house of all
 others in the town!"
 
 "Well, as somebody was sure to live there, and you couldn't, it can do
 'ee no harm that he's the man."
 
 It was quite true: he felt that it was doing him no harm. Farfrae, who
 had already taken the yards and stores, had acquired possession of the
 house for the obvious convenience of its contiguity. And yet this act
 of his taking up residence within those roomy chambers while he, their
 former tenant, lived in a cottage, galled Henchard indescribably.
 
 Jopp continued: "And you heard of that fellow who bought all the best
 furniture at your sale? He was bidding for no other than Farfrae all the
 while! It has never been moved out of the house, as he'd already got the
 lease."
 
 "My furniture too! Surely he'll buy my body and soul likewise!"
 
 "There's no saying he won't, if you be willing to sell." And having
 planted these wounds in the heart of his once imperious master Jopp went
 on his way; while Henchard stared and stared into the racing river till
 the bridge seemed moving backward with him.
 
 The low land grew blacker, and the sky a deeper grey, When the landscape
 looked like a picture blotted in with ink, another traveller approached
 the great stone bridge. He was driving a gig, his direction being also
--**--**--
 door that led to the garden, and the big house, and Lucetta.
 
 At the beginning of the winter it was rumoured about Casterbridge that
 Mr. Farfrae, already in the Town Council, was to be proposed for Mayor
 in a year or two.
 
 "Yes, she was wise, she was wise in her generation!" said Henchard to
 himself when he heard of this one day on his way to Farfrae's hay-barn.
 He thought it over as he wimbled his bonds, and the piece of news acted
 as a reviviscent breath to that old view of his--of Donald Farfrae as
 his triumphant rival who rode rough-shod over him.
 
 "A fellow of his age going to be Mayor, indeed!" he murmured with a
 corner-drawn smile on his mouth. "But 'tis her money that floats en
 upward. Ha-ha--how cust odd it is! Here be I, his former master, working
 for him as man, and he the man standing as master, with my house and my
 furniture and my what-you-may-call wife all his own."
 
 He repeated these things a hundred times a day. During the whole period
 of his acquaintance with Lucetta he had never wished to claim her as
 his own so desperately as he now regretted her loss. It was no mercenary
 hankering after her fortune that moved him, though that fortune had been
 the means of making her so much the more desired by giving her the air
 of independence and sauciness which attracts men of his composition.
 It had given her servants, house, and fine clothing--a setting that
 invested Lucetta with a startling novelty in the eyes of him who had
 known her in her narrow days.
 
 He accordingly lapsed into moodiness, and at every allusion to the
 possibility of Farfrae's near election to the municipal chair his former
 hatred of the Scotchman returned. Concurrently with this he underwent
--**--**--
 
 "I don't care a curse what the words be," said Henchard. "Hymns,
 ballets, or rantipole rubbish; the Rogue's March or the cherubim's
 warble--'tis all the same to me if 'tis good harmony, and well put out."
 
 "Well--heh, heh--it may be we can do that, and not a man among us that
 have sat in the gallery less than twenty year," said the leader of the
 band. "As 'tis Sunday, neighbours, suppose we raise the Fourth Psa'am,
 to Samuel Wakely's tune, as improved by me?"
 
 "Hang Samuel Wakely's tune, as improved by thee!" said Henchard. "Chuck
 across one of your psalters--old Wiltshire is the only tune worth
 singing--the psalm-tune that would make my blood ebb and flow like the
 sea when I was a steady chap. I'll find some words to fit en." He took
 one of the psalters and began turning over the leaves.
 
 Chancing to look out of the window at that moment he saw a flock of
 people passing by, and perceived them to be the congregation of the
 upper church, now just dismissed, their sermon having been a longer
 one than that the lower parish was favoured with. Among the rest of the
 leading inhabitants walked Mr. Councillor Farfrae with Lucetta upon his
 arm, the observed and imitated of all the smaller tradesmen's womankind.
 Henchard's mouth changed a little, and he continued to turn over the
 leaves.
 
 "Now then," he said, "Psalm the Hundred-and-Ninth, to the tune of
 Wiltshire: verses ten to fifteen. I gi'e ye the words:
 
        "His seed shall orphans be, his wife
           A widow plunged in grief;
         His vagrant children beg their bread
           Where none can give relief.
 
         His ill-got riches shall be made
          To usurers a prey;
         The fruit of all his toil shall be
           By strangers borne away.
 
         None shall be found that to his wants
--**--**--
 a little way behind. Not to interrupt them she remained on the steps
 without raising her head any higher. While waiting thus she saw--or
 fancied she saw, for she had a terror of feeling certain--her stepfather
 slowly raise his hand to a level behind Farfrae's shoulders, a curious
 expression taking possession of his face. The young man was quite
 unconscious of the action, which was so indirect that, if Farfrae had
 observed it, he might almost have regarded it as an idle outstretching
 of the arm. But it would have been possible, by a comparatively light
 touch, to push Farfrae off his balance, and send him head over heels
 into the air.
 
 Elizabeth felt quite sick at heart on thinking of what this MIGHT have
 meant. As soon as they turned she mechanically took the tea to Henchard,
 left it, and went away. Reflecting, she endeavoured to assure herself
 that the movement was an idle eccentricity, and no more. Yet, on the
 other hand, his subordinate position in an establishment where he once
 had been master might be acting on him like an irritant poison; and she
 finally resolved to caution Donald.
 
 
 
 
 34.
 
 
 Next morning, accordingly, she rose at five o'clock and went into the
 street. It was not yet light; a dense fog prevailed, and the town was
 as silent as it was dark, except that from the rectangular avenues which
 framed in the borough there came a chorus of tiny rappings, caused by
 the fall of water-drops condensed on the boughs; now it was wafted from
 the West Walk, now from the South Walk; and then from both quarters
 simultaneously. She moved on to the bottom of Corn Street, and, knowing
 his time well, waited only a few minutes before she heard the familiar
 bang of his door, and then his quick walk towards her. She met him at
--**--**--
 It grieved Farfrae much to give up this scheme. But a damp having
 been thrown over it by these and other voices in the air, he went and
 countermanded his orders. The then occupier of the shop was in it when
 Farfrae spoke to him and feeling it necessary to give some explanation
 of his withdrawal from the negotiation Donald mentioned Henchard's name,
 and stated that the intentions of the Council had been changed.
 
 The occupier was much disappointed, and straight-way informed Henchard,
 as soon as he saw him, that a scheme of the Council for setting him up
 in a shop had been knocked on the head by Farfrae. And thus out of error
 enmity grew.
 
 When Farfrae got indoors that evening the tea-kettle was singing on the
 high hob of the semi-egg-shaped grate. Lucetta, light as a sylph, ran
 forward and seized his hands, whereupon Farfrae duly kissed her.
 
 "Oh!" she cried playfully, turning to the window. "See--the blinds are
 not drawn down, and the people can look in--what a scandal!"
 
 When the candles were lighted, the curtains drawn, and the twain sat at
 tea, she noticed that he looked serious. Without directly inquiring why
 she let her eyes linger solicitously on his face.
 
 "Who has called?" he absently asked. "Any folk for me?"
 
 "No," said Lucetta. "What's the matter, Donald?"
 
 "Well--nothing worth talking of," he responded sadly.
 
 "Then, never mind it. You will get through it, Scotchmen are always
 lucky."
 
 "No--not always!" he said, shaking his head gloomily as he contemplated
 a crumb on the table. "I know many who have not been so! There was
 Sandy Macfarlane, who started to America to try his fortune, and he was
 drowned; and Archibald Leith, he was murdered! And poor Willie Dunbleeze
 and Maitland Macfreeze--they fell into bad courses, and went the way of
--**--**--
 
 He could not say--he would consider. When she was gone he recollected
 that he had left a heap of useless papers in his former dining-room
 safe--built up in the wall of his old house--now occupied by Farfrae.
 The letters might have been amongst them.
 
 A grotesque grin shaped itself on Henchard's face. Had that safe been
 opened?
 
 On the very evening which followed this there was a great ringing of
 bells in Casterbridge, and the combined brass, wood, catgut, and leather
 bands played round the town with more prodigality of percussion-notes
 than ever. Farfrae was Mayor--the two-hundredth odd of a series forming
 an elective dynasty dating back to the days of Charles I--and the
 fair Lucetta was the courted of the town....But, Ah! the worm i' the
 bud--Henchard; what he could tell!
 
 He, in the meantime, festering with indignation at some erroneous
 intelligence of Farfrae's opposition to the scheme for installing him
 in the little seed-shop, was greeted with the news of the municipal
 election (which, by reason of Farfrae's comparative youth and his
 Scottish nativity--a thing unprecedented in the case--had an interest
 far beyond the ordinary). The bell-ringing and the band-playing, loud as
 Tamerlane's trumpet, goaded the downfallen Henchard indescribably: the
 ousting now seemed to him to be complete.
 
 The next morning he went to the corn-yard as usual, and about eleven
 o'clock Donald entered through the green door, with no trace of the
 worshipful about him. The yet more emphatic change of places between
 him and Henchard which this election had established renewed a slight
 embarrassment in the manner of the modest young man; but Henchard
 showed the front of one who had overlooked all this; and Farfrae met his
 amenities half-way at once.
 
 "I was going to ask you," said Henchard, "about a packet that I
--**--**--
 
 "Ah--well you may ask that!" said Henchard, the new-moon-shaped
 grin adumbrating itself again upon his mouth. "In spite of all her
 protestations, when I came forward to do so, as in generosity bound, she
 was not the woman for me."
 
 "She had already married another--maybe?"
 
 Henchard seemed to think it would be sailing too near the wind to
 descend further into particulars, and he answered "Yes."
 
 "The young lady must have had a heart that bore transplanting very
 readily!"
 
 "She had, she had," said Henchard emphatically.
 
 He opened a third and fourth letter, and read. This time he approached
 the conclusion as if the signature were indeed coming with the rest. But
 again he stopped short. The truth was that, as may be divined, he had
 quite intended to effect a grand catastrophe at the end of this drama
 by reading out the name, he had come to the house with no other thought.
 But sitting here in cold blood he could not do it.
 
 Such a wrecking of hearts appalled even him. His quality was such
 that he could have annihilated them both in the heat of action; but to
 accomplish the deed by oral poison was beyond the nerve of his enmity.
 
 
 
 
 35.
 
 
 As Donald stated, Lucetta had retired early to her room because of
 fatigue. She had, however, not gone to rest, but sat in the bedside
 chair reading and thinking over the events of the day. At the ringing of
 the door-bell by Henchard she wondered who it should be that would call
 at that comparatively late hour. The dining-room was almost under her
 bed-room; she could hear that somebody was admitted there, and presently
 the indistinct murmur of a person reading became audible.
 
 The usual time for Donald's arrival upstairs came and passed, yet still
--**--**--
 might possibly have got over it, and married her just the same--unlikely
 as it had once seemed; but for her or any one else to tell him now would
 be fatal.
 
 The door slammed; she could hear her husband bolting it. After looking
 round in his customary way he came leisurely up the stairs. The spark in
 her eyes well-nigh went out when he appeared round the bedroom door. Her
 gaze hung doubtful for a moment, then to her joyous amazement she saw
 that he looked at her with the rallying smile of one who had just been
 relieved of a scene that was irksome. She could hold out no longer, and
 sobbed hysterically.
 
 When he had restored her Farfrae naturally enough spoke of Henchard. "Of
 all men he was the least desirable as a visitor," he said; "but it is my
 belief that he's just a bit crazed. He has been reading to me a long
 lot of letters relating to his past life; and I could do no less than
 indulge him by listening."
 
 This was sufficient. Henchard, then, had not told. Henchard's last
 words to Farfrae, in short, as he stood on the doorstep, had been these:
 "Well--I'm obliged to 'ee for listening. I may tell more about her some
 day."
 
 Finding this, she was much perplexed as to Henchard's motives in opening
 the matter at all; for in such cases we attribute to an enemy a power
 of consistent action which we never find in ourselves or in our friends;
 and forget that abortive efforts from want of heart are as possible to
 revenge as to generosity.
 
 Next morning Lucetta remained in bed, meditating how to parry this
 incipient attack. The bold stroke of telling Donald the truth, dimly
 conceived, was yet too bold; for she dreaded lest in doing so he, like
--**--**--
 
 
 36.
 
 
 Returning from her appointment Lucetta saw a man waiting by the lamp
 nearest to her own door. When she stopped to go in he came and spoke to
 her. It was Jopp.
 
 He begged her pardon for addressing her. But he had heard that Mr.
 Farfrae had been applied to by a neighbouring corn-merchant to recommend
 a working partner; if so he wished to offer himself. He could give good
 security, and had stated as much to Mr. Farfrae in a letter; but he
 would feel much obliged if Lucetta would say a word in his favour to her
 husband.
 
 "It is a thing I know nothing about," said Lucetta coldly.
 
 "But you can testify to my trustworthiness better than anybody, ma'am,"
 said Jopp. "I was in Jersey several years, and knew you there by sight."
 
 "Indeed," she replied. "But I knew nothing of you."
 
 "I think, ma'am, that a word or two from you would secure for me what I
 covet very much," he persisted.
 
 She steadily refused to have anything to do with the affair, and cutting
 him short, because of her anxiety to get indoors before her husband
 should miss her, left him on the pavement.
 
 He watched her till she had vanished, and then went home. When he got
 there he sat down in the fireless chimney corner looking at the iron
 dogs, and the wood laid across them for heating the morning kettle.
 A movement upstairs disturbed him, and Henchard came down from his
 bedroom, where he seemed to have been rummaging boxes.
 
 "I wish," said Henchard, "you would do me a service, Jopp,
 now--to-night, I mean, if you can. Leave this at Mrs. Farfrae's for her.
 I should take it myself, of course, but I don't wish to be seen there."
 
 He handed a package in brown paper, sealed. Henchard had been as good
--**--**--
 mechanics too idle to mechanize, rural servants too rebellious to serve,
 drifted or were forced into Mixen Lane.
 
 The lane and its surrounding thicket of thatched cottages stretched out
 like a spit into the moist and misty lowland. Much that was sad, much
 that was low, some things that were baneful, could be seen in
 Mixen Lane. Vice ran freely in and out certain of the doors in the
 neighbourhood; recklessness dwelt under the roof with the crooked
 chimney; shame in some bow-windows; theft (in times of privation) in the
 thatched and mud-walled houses by the sallows. Even slaughter had not
 been altogether unknown here. In a block of cottages up an alley there
 might have been erected an altar to disease in years gone by. Such was
 Mixen Lane in the times when Henchard and Farfrae were Mayors.
 
 Yet this mildewed leaf in the sturdy and flourishing Casterbridge plant
 lay close to the open country; not a hundred yards from a row of
 noble elms, and commanding a view across the moor of airy uplands and
 corn-fields, and mansions of the great. A brook divided the moor from
 the tenements, and to outward view there was no way across it--no way
 to the houses but round about by the road. But under every householder's
 stairs there was kept a mysterious plank nine inches wide; which plank
 was a secret bridge.
 
 If you, as one of those refugee householders, came in from business
 after dark--and this was the business time here--you stealthily crossed
 the moor, approached the border of the aforesaid brook, and whistled
 opposite the house to which you belonged. A shape thereupon made its
 appearance on the other side bearing the bridge on end against the sky;
 it was lowered; you crossed, and a hand helped you to land yourself,
--**--**--
 A pedestrian would be seen abstractedly passing along Mixen Lane; and
 then, in a moment, he would vanish, causing the gazer to blink like
 Ashton at the disappearance of Ravenswood. That abstracted pedestrian
 had edged into the slit by the adroit fillip of his person sideways;
 from the slit he edged into the tavern by a similar exercise of skill.
 
 The company at the Three Mariners were persons of quality in comparison
 with the company which gathered here; though it must be admitted that
 the lowest fringe of the Mariner's party touched the crest of Peter's at
 points. Waifs and strays of all sorts loitered about here. The landlady
 was a virtuous woman who years ago had been unjustly sent to gaol as
 an accessory to something or other after the fact. She underwent her
 twelvemonth, and had worn a martyr's countenance ever since, except at
 times of meeting the constable who apprehended her, when she winked her
 eye.
 
 To this house Jopp and his acquaintances had arrived. The settles on
 which they sat down were thin and tall, their tops being guyed by pieces
 of twine to hooks in the ceiling; for when the guests grew boisterous
 the settles would rock and overturn without some such security. The
 thunder of bowls echoed from the backyard; swingels hung behind the
 blower of the chimney; and ex-poachers and ex-gamekeepers, whom squires
 had persecuted without a cause, sat elbowing each other--men who in past
 times had met in fights under the moon, till lapse of sentences on the
 one part, and loss of favour and expulsion from service on the other,
 brought them here together to a common level, where they sat calmly
 discussing old times.
 
 "Dost mind how you could jerk a trout ashore with a bramble, and not
 ruffle the stream, Charl?" a deposed keeper was saying. "'Twas at that I
--**--**--
 down the bridge for me?"
 
 Without replying Charl and his comrade Joe rose, and receiving a lantern
 from her went out at the back door and down the garden-path, which ended
 abruptly at the edge of the stream already mentioned. Beyond the stream
 was the open moor, from which a clammy breeze smote upon their faces
 as they advanced. Taking up the board that had lain in readiness one
 of them lowered it across the water, and the instant its further end
 touched the ground footsteps entered upon it, and there appeared from
 the shade a stalwart man with straps round his knees, a double-barrelled
 gun under his arm and some birds slung up behind him. They asked him if
 he had had much luck.
 
 "Not much," he said indifferently. "All safe inside?"
 
 Receiving a reply in the affirmative he went on inwards, the others
 withdrawing the bridge and beginning to retreat in his rear. Before,
 however, they had entered the house a cry of "Ahoy" from the moor led
 them to pause.
 
 The cry was repeated. They pushed the lantern into an outhouse, and went
 back to the brink of the stream.
 
 "Ahoy--is this the way to Casterbridge?" said some one from the other
 side.
 
 "Not in particular," said Charl. "There's a river afore 'ee."
 
 "I don't care--here's for through it!" said the man in the moor. "I've
 had travelling enough for to-day."
 
 "Stop a minute, then," said Charl, finding that the man was no enemy.
 "Joe, bring the plank and lantern; here's somebody that's lost his
 way. You should have kept along the turnpike road, friend, and not have
 strook across here."
 
 "I should--as I see now. But I saw a light here, and says I to myself,
 that's an outlying house, depend on't."
 
 The plank was now lowered; and the stranger's form shaped itself
--**--**--
 
 "I've been trying to find a short way to Little Hintock this last
 half-hour, Mrs. Dollery," he said.  "But though I've been to Great
 Hintock and Hintock House half a dozen times I am at fault about the
 small village.  You can help me, I dare say?"
 
 She assured him that she could--that as she went to Great Hintock her
 van passed near it--that it was only up the lane that branched out of
 the lane into which she was about to turn--just ahead. "Though,"
 continued Mrs. Dollery, "'tis such a little small place that, as a town
 gentleman, you'd need have a candle and lantern to find it if ye don't
 know where 'tis.  Bedad! I wouldn't live there if they'd pay me to.
 Now at Great Hintock you do see the world a bit."
 
 He mounted and sat beside her, with his feet outside, where they were
 ever and anon brushed over by the horse's tail.
 
 This van, driven and owned by Mrs. Dollery, was rather a movable
 attachment of the roadway than an extraneous object, to those who knew
 it well.  The old horse, whose hair was of the roughness and color of
 heather, whose leg-joints, shoulders, and hoofs were distorted by
 harness and drudgery from colthood--though if all had their rights, he
 ought, symmetrical in outline, to have been picking the herbage of some
 Eastern plain instead of tugging here--had trodden this road almost
 daily for twenty years.  Even his subjection was not made congruous
 throughout, for the harness being too short, his tail was not drawn
 through the crupper, so that the breeching slipped awkwardly to one
 side.  He knew every subtle incline of the seven or eight miles of
 ground between Hintock and Sherton Abbas--the market-town to which he
 journeyed--as accurately as any surveyor could have learned it by a
--**--**--
 
 Half a dozen dwellings were passed without result.  The next, which
 stood opposite a tall tree, was in an exceptional state of radiance,
 the flickering brightness from the inside shining up the chimney and
 making a luminous mist of the emerging smoke.  The interior, as seen
 through the window, caused him to draw up with a terminative air and
 watch.  The house was rather large for a cottage, and the door, which
 opened immediately into the living-room, stood ajar, so that a ribbon
 of light fell through the opening into the dark atmosphere without.
 Every now and then a moth, decrepit from the late season, would flit
 for a moment across the out-coming rays and disappear again into the
 night.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 In the room from which this cheerful blaze proceeded, he beheld a girl
 seated on a willow chair, and busily occupied by the light of the fire,
 which was ample and of wood.  With a bill-hook in one hand and a
 leather glove, much too large for her, on the other, she was making
 spars, such as are used by thatchers, with great rapidity.  She wore a
 leather apron for this purpose, which was also much too large for her
 figure.  On her left hand lay a bundle of the straight, smooth sticks
 called spar-gads--the raw material of her manufacture; on her right, a
 heap of chips and ends--the refuse--with which the fire was maintained;
 in front, a pile of the finished articles.  To produce them she took up
 each gad, looked critically at it from end to end, cut it to length,
 split it into four, and sharpened each of the quarters with dexterous
 blows, which brought it to a triangular point precisely resembling that
 of a bayonet.
 
 Beside her, in case she might require more light, a brass candlestick
--**--**--
 "I've nothing more to say," she answered.
 
 Her companion saw from her manner that it was useless to urge her
 further by speech.  "As you are a trusty young woman," he said, "I'll
 put these sovereigns up here for ornament, that you may see how
 handsome they are.  Bring the hair to-morrow, or return the
 sovereigns." He stuck them edgewise into the frame of a small mantle
 looking-glass.  "I hope you'll bring it, for your sake and mine.  I
 should have thought she could have suited herself elsewhere; but as
 it's her fancy it must be indulged if possible. If you cut it off
 yourself, mind how you do it so as to keep all the locks one way." He
 showed her how this was to be done.
 
 "But I sha'nt," she replied, with laconic indifference.  "I value my
 looks too much to spoil 'em.  She wants my hair to get another lover
 with; though if stories are true she's broke the heart of many a noble
 gentleman already."
 
 "Lord, it's wonderful how you guess things, Marty," said the barber.
 "I've had it from them that know that there certainly is some foreign
 gentleman in her eye.  However, mind what I ask."
 
 "She's not going to get him through me."
 
 Percombe had retired as far as the door; he came back, planted his cane
 on the coffin-stool, and looked her in the face.  "Marty South," he
 said, with deliberate emphasis, "YOU'VE GOT A LOVER YOURSELF, and
 that's why you won't let it go!"
 
 She reddened so intensely as to pass the mild blush that suffices to
 heighten beauty; she put the yellow leather glove on one hand, took up
 the hook with the other, and sat down doggedly to her work without
 turning her face to him again.  He regarded her head for a moment, went
--**--**--
 very brink of an absolute void, or the antemundane Ginnung-Gap believed
 in by her Teuton forefathers. For her eyes were fresh from the blaze,
 and here there was no street-lamp or lantern to form a kindly
 transition between the inner glare and the outer dark.  A lingering
 wind brought to her ear the creaking sound of two over-crowded branches
 in the neighboring wood which were rubbing each other into wounds, and
 other vocalized sorrows of the trees, together with the screech of
 owls, and the fluttering tumble of some awkward wood-pigeon
 ill-balanced on its roosting-bough.
 
 But the pupils of her young eyes soon expanded, and she could see well
 enough for her purpose.  Taking a bundle of spars under each arm, and
 guided by the serrated line of tree-tops against the sky, she went some
 hundred yards or more down the lane till she reached a long open shed,
 carpeted around with the dead leaves that lay about everywhere.  Night,
 that strange personality, which within walls brings ominous
 introspectiveness and self-distrust, but under the open sky banishes
 such subjective anxieties as too trivial for thought, inspired Marty
 South with a less perturbed and brisker manner now.  She laid the spars
 on the ground within the shed and returned for more, going to and fro
 till her whole manufactured stock were deposited here.
 
 This erection was the wagon-house of the chief man of business
 hereabout, Mr. George Melbury, the timber, bark, and copse-ware
 merchant for whom Marty's father did work of this sort by the piece.
 It formed one of the many rambling out-houses which surrounded his
 dwelling, an equally irregular block of building, whose immense
 chimneys could just be discerned even now.  The four huge wagons under
 the shed were built on those ancient lines whose proportions have been
--**--**--
 anxiety."  He went on to say that he could not think why "she (Marty
 knew he was speaking of his daughter) did not answer his letter.  She
 must be ill--she must, certainly," he said.
 
 "No, no.  'Tis all right, George," said his wife; and she assured him
 that such things always did appear so gloomy in the night-time, if
 people allowed their minds to run on them; that when morning came it
 was seen that such fears were nothing but shadows. "Grace is as well as
 you or I," she declared.
 
 But he persisted that she did not see all--that she did not see as much
 as he.  His daughter's not writing was only one part of his worry.  On
 account of her he was anxious concerning money affairs, which he would
 never alarm his mind about otherwise.  The reason he gave was that, as
 she had nobody to depend upon for a provision but himself, he wished
 her, when he was gone, to be securely out of risk of poverty.
 
 To this Mrs. Melbury replied that Grace would be sure to marry well,
 and that hence a hundred pounds more or less from him would not make
 much difference.
 
 Her husband said that that was what she, Mrs. Melbury, naturally
 thought; but there she was wrong, and in that lay the source of his
 trouble.  "I have a plan in my head about her," he said; "and according
 to my plan she won't marry a rich man."
 
 "A plan for her not to marry well?" said his wife, surprised.
 
 "Well, in one sense it is that," replied Melbury.  "It is a plan for
 her to marry a particular person, and as he has not so much money as
 she might expect, it might be called as you call it.  I may not be able
--**--**--
 children grew up, and seemed to be attached to each other, he
 determined to do all he could to right the wrong by letting his
 daughter marry the lad; not only that, but to give her the best
 education he could afford, so as to make the gift as valuable a one as
 it lay in his power to bestow.  "I still mean to do it," said Melbury.
 
 "Then do," said she.
 
 "But all these things trouble me," said he; "for I feel I am
 sacrificing her for my own sin; and I think of her, and often come down
 here and look at this."
 
 "Look at what?" asked his wife.
 
 He took the candle from her hand, held it to the ground, and removed a
 tile which lay in the garden-path.  "'Tis the track of her shoe that
 she made when she ran down here the day before she went away all those
 months ago.  I covered it up when she was gone; and when I come here
 and look at it, I ask myself again, why should she be sacrificed to a
 poor man?"
 
 "It is not altogether a sacrifice," said the woman.  "He is in love
 with her, and he's honest and upright.  If she encourages him, what can
 you wish for more?"
 
 "I wish for nothing definite.  But there's a lot of things possible for
 her.  Why, Mrs. Charmond is wanting some refined young lady, I hear, to
 go abroad with her--as companion or something of the kind.  She'd jump
 at Grace."
 
 "That's all uncertain.  Better stick to what's sure."
 
 "True, true," said Melbury; "and I hope it will be for the best. Yes,
 let me get 'em married up as soon as I can, so as to have it over and
 done with." He continued looking at the imprint, while he added,
--**--**--
 which, taken with the fact that there were the remains of other such
 buildings thereabout, indicated that Little Hintock had at some time or
 other been of greater importance than now, as its old name of Hintock
 St. Osmond also testified.  The house was of no marked antiquity, yet
 of well-advanced age; older than a stale novelty, but no canonized
 antique; faded, not hoary; looking at you from the still distinct
 middle-distance of the early Georgian time, and awakening on that
 account the instincts of reminiscence more decidedly than the remoter
 and far grander memorials which have to speak from the misty reaches of
 mediaevalism.  The faces, dress, passions, gratitudes, and revenues of
 the great-great-grandfathers and grandmothers who had been the first to
 gaze from those rectangular windows, and had stood under that
 key-stoned doorway, could be divined and measured by homely standards
 of to-day.  It was a house in whose reverberations queer old personal
 tales were yet audible if properly listened for; and not, as with those
 of the castle and cloister, silent beyond the possibility of echo.
 
 The garden-front remained much as it had always been, and there was a
 porch and entrance that way.  But the principal house-door opened on
 the square yard or quadrangle towards the road, formerly a regular
 carriage entrance, though the middle of the area was now made use of
 for stacking timber, fagots, bundles, and other products of the wood.
 It was divided from the lane by a lichen-coated wall, in which hung a
 pair of gates, flanked by piers out of the perpendicular, with a round
 white ball on the top of each.
 
 The building on the left of the enclosure was a long-backed erection,
 now used for spar-making, sawing, crib-framing, and copse-ware
 manufacture in general.  Opposite were the wagon-sheds where Marty had
--**--**--
 a old woman like you so dapper and stirring, when I bear in mind that
 after fifty one year counts as two did afore! But your smoke didn't
 rise this morning till twenty minutes past seven by my beater; and
 that's late, Grammer Oliver."
 
 "If you was a full-sized man, John, people might take notice of your
 scornful meanings.  But your growing up was such a scrimped and scanty
 business that really a woman couldn't feel hurt if you were to spit
 fire and brimstone itself at her.  Here," she added, holding out a
 spar-gad to one of the workmen, from which dangled a long
 black-pudding--"here's something for thy breakfast, and if you want tea
 you must fetch it from in-doors."
 
 "Mr. Melbury is late this morning," said the bottom-sawyer.
 
 "Yes.  'Twas a dark dawn," said Mrs. Oliver.  "Even when I opened the
 door, so late as I was, you couldn't have told poor men from gentlemen,
 or John from a reasonable-sized object.  And I don't think maister's
 slept at all well to-night.  He's anxious about his daughter; and I
 know what that is, for I've cried bucketfuls for my own."
 
 When the old woman had gone Creedle said,
 
 "He'll fret his gizzard green if he don't soon hear from that maid of
 his.  Well, learning is better than houses and lands.  But to keep a
 maid at school till she is taller out of pattens than her mother was in
 'em--'tis tempting Providence."
 
 "It seems no time ago that she was a little playward girl," said young
 Timothy Tangs.
 
 "I can mind her mother," said the hollow-turner.  "Always a teuny,
 delicate piece; her touch upon your hand was as soft and cool as wind.
 She was inoculated for the small-pox and had it beautifully fine, just
 about the time that I was out of my apprenticeship--ay, and a long
--**--**--
 the kitchen, where the family breakfasted in winter to save
 house-labor, he sat down by the fire, and looked a long time at the
 pair of dancing shadows cast by each fire-iron and dog-knob on the
 whitewashed chimney-corner--a yellow one from the window, and a blue
 one from the fire.
 
 "I don't quite know what to do to-day," he said to his wife at last.
 "I've recollected that I promised to meet Mrs. Charmond's steward in
 Round Wood at twelve o'clock, and yet I want to go for Grace."
 
 "Why not let Giles fetch her by himself? 'Twill bring 'em together all
 the quicker."
 
 "I could do that--but I should like to go myself.  I always have gone,
 without fail, every time hitherto.  It has been a great pleasure to
 drive into Sherton, and wait and see her arrive; and perhaps she'll be
 disappointed if I stay away."
 
 "Yon may be disappointed, but I don't think she will, if you send
 Giles," said Mrs. Melbury, dryly.
 
 "Very well--I'll send him."
 
 Melbury was often persuaded by the quietude of his wife's words when
 strenuous argument would have had no effect.  This second Mrs. Melbury
 was a placid woman, who had been nurse to his child Grace before her
 mother's death.  After that melancholy event little Grace had clung to
 the nurse with much affection; and ultimately Melbury, in dread lest
 the only woman who cared for the girl should be induced to leave her,
 persuaded the mild Lucy to marry him.  The arrangement--for it was
 little more--had worked satisfactorily enough; Grace had thriven, and
 Melbury had not repented.
 
 He returned to the spar-house and found Giles near at hand, to whom he
 explained the change of plan.  "As she won't arrive till five o'clock,
 you can get your business very well over in time to receive her," said
--**--**--
 
 Nevertheless, the greeting on her looks and lips was of a restrained
 type, which perhaps was not unnatural.  For true it was that Giles
 Winterborne, well-attired and well-mannered as he was for a yeoman,
 looked rough beside her.  It had sometimes dimly occurred to him, in
 his ruminating silence at Little Hintock, that external phenomena--such
 as the lowness or height or color of a hat, the fold of a coat, the
 make of a boot, or the chance attitude or occupation of a limb at the
 instant of view--may have a great influence upon feminine opinion of a
 man's worth--so frequently founded on non-essentials; but a certain
 causticity of mental tone towards himself and the world in general had
 prevented to-day, as always, any enthusiastic action on the strength of
 that reflection; and her momentary instinct of reserve at first sight
 of him was the penalty he paid for his laxness.
 
 He gave away the tree to a by-stander, as soon as he could find one who
 would accept the cumbersome gift, and the twain moved on towards the
 inn at which he had put up.  Marty made as if to step forward for the
 pleasure of being recognized by Miss Melbury; but abruptly checking
 herself, she glided behind a carrier's van, saying, dryly, "No; I baint
 wanted there," and critically regarded Winterborne's companion.
 
 It would have been very difficult to describe Grace Melbury with
 precision, either now or at any time.  Nay, from the highest point of
 view, to precisely describe a human being, the focus of a universe--how
 impossible! But, apart from transcendentalism, there never probably
 lived a person who was in herself more completely a reductio ad
 absurdum of attempts to appraise a woman, even externally, by items of
 face and figure.  Speaking generally, it may be said that she was
--**--**--
 distinguish."
 
 Winterborne did not continue.  It seemed as if the knowledge and
 interest which had formerly moved Grace's mind had quite died away from
 her.  He wondered whether the special attributes of his image in the
 past had evaporated like these other things.
 
 However that might be, the fact at present was merely this, that where
 he was seeing John-apples and farm-buildings she was beholding a far
 remoter scene--a scene no less innocent and simple, indeed, but much
 contrasting--a broad lawn in the fashionable suburb of a fast city, the
 evergreen leaves shining in the evening sun, amid which bounding girls,
 gracefully clad in artistic arrangements of blue, brown, red, black,
 and white, were playing at games, with laughter and chat, in all the
 pride of life, the notes of piano and harp trembling in the air from
 the open windows adjoining.  Moreover, they were girls--and this was a
 fact which Grace Melbury's delicate femininity could not lose sight
 of--whose parents Giles would have addressed with a deferential Sir or
 Madam.  Beside this visioned scene the homely farmsteads did not quite
 hold their own from her present twenty-year point of survey.  For all
 his woodland sequestration, Giles knew the primitive simplicity of the
 subject he had started, and now sounded a deeper note.
 
 "'Twas very odd what we said to each other years ago; I often think of
 it.  I mean our saying that if we still liked each other when you were
 twenty and I twenty-five, we'd--"
 
 "It was child's tattle."
 
 "H'm!" said Giles, suddenly.
 
 "I mean we were young," said she, more considerately.  That gruff
 manner of his in making inquiries reminded her that he was unaltered in
 much.
 
 "Yes....I beg your pardon, Miss Melbury; your father SENT me to meet
 you to-day."
 
 "I know it, and I am glad of it."
--**--**--
 bespoke, he whipped on the horse.  This it was which had brought the
 nose of Mr. Melbury's old gray close to the back of Mrs. Charmond's
 much-eclipsing vehicle.
 
 "There's Marty South Sitting up with the coachman," said he, discerning
 her by her dress.
 
 "Ah, poor Marty! I must ask her to come to see me this very evening.
 How does she happen to be riding there?"
 
 "I don't know.  It is very singular."
 
 Thus these people with converging destinies went along the road
 together, till Winterborne, leaving the track of the carriage, turned
 into Little Hintock, where almost the first house was the
 timber-merchant's.  Pencils of dancing light streamed out of the
 windows sufficiently to show the white laurestinus flowers, and glance
 over the polished leaves of laurel.  The interior of the rooms could be
 seen distinctly, warmed up by the fire-flames, which in the parlor were
 reflected from the glass of the pictures and bookcase, and in the
 kitchen from the utensils and ware.
 
 "Let us look at the dear place for a moment before we call them," she
 said.
 
 In the kitchen dinner was preparing; for though Melbury dined at one
 o'clock at other times, to-day the meal had been kept back for Grace.
 A rickety old spit was in motion, its end being fixed in the fire-dog,
 and the whole kept going by means of a cord conveyed over pulleys along
 the ceiling to a large stone suspended in a corner of the room.  Old
 Grammer Oliver came and wound it up with a rattle like that of a mill.
 
 In the parlor a large shade of Mrs. Melbury's head fell on the wall and
 ceiling; but before the girl had regarded this room many moments their
 presence was discovered, and her father and stepmother came out to
--**--**--
 
 Her curiosity was so widely awakened by the phenomenon that she sat up
 in bed, and stared steadily at the shine.  An appearance of this sort,
 sufficient to excite attention anywhere, was no less than a marvel in
 Hintock, as Grace had known the hamlet.  Almost every diurnal and
 nocturnal effect in that woodland place had hitherto been the direct
 result of the regular terrestrial roll which produced the season's
 changes; but here was something dissociated from these normal
 sequences, and foreign to local habit and knowledge.
 
 It was about this moment that Grace heard the household below preparing
 to retire, the most emphatic noise in the proceeding being that of her
 father bolting the doors.  Then the stairs creaked, and her father and
 mother passed her chamber.  The last to come was Grammer Oliver.
 
 Grace slid out of bed, ran across the room, and lifting the latch,
 said, "I am not asleep, Grammer.  Come in and talk to me."
 
 Before the old woman had entered, Grace was again under the bedclothes.
 Grammer set down her candlestick, and seated herself on the edge of
 Miss Melbury's coverlet.
 
 "I want you to tell me what light that is I see on the hill-side," said
 Grace.
 
 Mrs. Oliver looked across.  "Oh, that," she said, "is from the
 doctor's.  He's often doing things of that sort.  Perhaps you don't
 know that we've a doctor living here now--Mr. Fitzpiers by name?"
 
 Grace admitted that she had not heard of him.
 
 "Well, then, miss, he's come here to get up a practice.  I know him
 very well, through going there to help 'em scrub sometimes, which your
 father said I might do, if I wanted to, in my spare time.  Being a
 bachelor-man, he've only a lad in the house.  Oh yes, I know him very
--**--**--
 was interrupted; the lichen eat the vigor of the stalk, and the ivy
 slowly strangled to death the promising sapling.
 
 They dived amid beeches under which nothing grew, the younger boughs
 still retaining their hectic leaves, that rustled in the breeze with a
 sound almost metallic, like the sheet-iron foliage of the fabled
 Jarnvid wood.  Some flecks of white in Grace's drapery had enabled
 Giles to keep her and her father in view till this time; but now he
 lost sight of them, and was obliged to follow by ear--no difficult
 matter, for on the line of their course every wood-pigeon rose from its
 perch with a continued clash, dashing its wings against the branches
 with wellnigh force enough to break every quill.  By taking the track
 of this noise he soon came to a stile.
 
 Was it worth while to go farther? He examined the doughy soil at the
 foot of the stile, and saw among the large sole-and-heel tracks an
 impression of a slighter kind from a boot that was obviously not local,
 for Winterborne knew all the cobblers' patterns in that district,
 because they were very few to know. The mud-picture was enough to make
 him swing himself over and proceed.
 
 The character of the woodland now changed.  The bases of the smaller
 trees were nibbled bare by rabbits, and at divers points heaps of
 fresh-made chips, and the newly-cut stool of a tree, stared white
 through the undergrowth.  There had been a large fall of timber this
 year, which explained the meaning of some sounds that soon reached him.
 
 A voice was shouting intermittently in a sort of human bark, which
 reminded Giles that there was a sale of trees and fagots that very day.
 Melbury would naturally be present.  Thereupon Winterborne remembered
 that he himself wanted a few fagots, and entered upon the scene.
--**--**--
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 The inspiriting appointment which had led Grace Melbury to indulge in a
 six-candle illumination for the arrangement of her attire, carried her
 over the ground the next morning with a springy tread. Her sense of
 being properly appreciated on her own native soil seemed to brighten
 the atmosphere and herbage around her, as the glowworm's lamp
 irradiates the grass.  Thus she moved along, a vessel of emotion going
 to empty itself on she knew not what.
 
 Twenty minutes' walking through copses, over a stile, and along an
 upland lawn brought her to the verge of a deep glen, at the bottom of
 which Hintock House appeared immediately beneath her eye.  To describe
 it as standing in a hollow would not express the situation of the
 manor-house; it stood in a hole, notwithstanding that the hole was full
 of beauty.  From the spot which Grace had reached a stone could easily
 have been thrown over or into, the birds'-nested chimneys of the
 mansion.  Its walls were surmounted by a battlemented parapet; but the
 gray lead roofs were quite visible behind it, with their gutters, laps,
 rolls, and skylights, together with incised letterings and
 shoe-patterns cut by idlers thereon.
 
 The front of the house exhibited an ordinary manorial presentation of
 Elizabethan windows, mullioned and hooded, worked in rich snuff-colored
 freestone from local quarries.  The ashlar of the walls, where not
 overgrown with ivy and other creepers, was coated with lichen of every
 shade, intensifying its luxuriance with its nearness to the ground,
 till, below the plinth, it merged in moss.
 
 Above the house to the back was a dense plantation, the roots of whose
 trees were above the level of the chimneys.  The corresponding high
 ground on which Grace stood was richly grassed, with only an old tree
 here and there.  A few sheep lay about, which, as they ruminated,
--**--**--
 intellectual company."
 
 Grace, modestly blushing, deprecated any such idea.
 
 "Do you keep up your lucubrations at Little Hintock?"
 
 "Oh no.  Lucubrations are not unknown at Little Hintock; but they are
 not carried on by me."
 
 "What--another student in that retreat?"
 
 "There is a surgeon lately come, and I have heard that he reads a great
 deal--I see his light sometimes through the trees late at night."
 
 "Oh yes--a doctor--I believe I was told of him.  It is a strange place
 for him to settle in."
 
 "It is a convenient centre for a practice, they say.  But he does not
 confine his studies to medicine, it seems.  He investigates theology
 and metaphysics and all sorts of subjects."
 
 "What is his name?"
 
 "Fitzpiers.  He represents a very old family, I believe, the
 Fitzpierses of Buckbury-Fitzpiers--not a great many miles from here."
 
 "I am not sufficiently local to know the history of the family.  I was
 never in the county till my husband brought me here." Mrs. Charmond did
 not care to pursue this line of investigation. Whatever mysterious
 merit might attach to family antiquity, it was one which, though she
 herself could claim it, her adaptable, wandering weltburgerliche nature
 had grown tired of caring about--a peculiarity that made her a contrast
 to her neighbors.  "It is of rather more importance to know what the
 man is himself than what his family is," she said, "if he is going to
 practise upon us as a surgeon.  Have you seen him?"
 
 Grace had not.  "I think he is not a very old man," she added.
 
 "Has he a wife?"
 
 "I am not aware that he has."
 
 "Well, I hope he will be useful here.  I must get to know him when I
 come back.  It will be very convenient to have a medical man--if he is
--**--**--
 proceed with the work by the knowledge that the ground was close to the
 way-side along which Grace must pass on her return from Hintock House.
 
 "You've a cold in the head, Marty," he said, as they walked. "That
 comes of cutting off your hair."
 
 "I suppose it do.  Yes; I've three headaches going on in my head at the
 same time."
 
 "Three headaches!"
 
 "Yes, a rheumatic headache in my poll, a sick headache over my eyes,
 and a misery headache in the middle of my brain.  However, I came out,
 for I thought you might be waiting and grumbling like anything if I was
 not there."
 
 The holes were already dug, and they set to work.  Winterborne's
 fingers were endowed with a gentle conjuror's touch in spreading the
 roots of each little tree, resulting in a sort of caress, under which
 the delicate fibres all laid themselves out in their proper directions
 for growth.  He put most of these roots towards the south-west; for, he
 said, in forty years' time, when some great gale is blowing from that
 quarter, the trees will require the strongest holdfast on that side to
 stand against it and not fall.
 
 "How they sigh directly we put 'em upright, though while they are lying
 down they don't sigh at all," said Marty.
 
 "Do they?" said Giles.  "I've never noticed it."
 
 She erected one of the young pines into its hole, and held up her
 finger; the soft musical breathing instantly set in, which was not to
 cease night or day till the grown tree should be felled--probably long
 after the two planters should be felled themselves.
 
 "It seems to me," the girl continued, "as if they sigh because they are
 very sorry to begin life in earnest--just as we be."
 
 "Just as we be?" He looked critically at her.  "You ought not to feel
--**--**--
 
 She did not inquire what other things, for she had seen him walking
 with Grace Melbury.  She looked towards the western sky, which was now
 aglow like some vast foundery wherein new worlds were being cast.
 Across it the bare bough of a tree stretched horizontally, revealing
 every twig against the red, and showing in dark profile every beck and
 movement of three pheasants that were settling themselves down on it in
 a row to roost.
 
 "It will be fine to-morrow," said Marty, observing them with the
 vermilion light of the sun in the pupils of her eyes, "for they are
 a-croupied down nearly at the end of the bough.  If it were going to be
 stormy they'd squeeze close to the trunk.  The weather is almost all
 they have to think of, isn't it, Mr. Winterborne? and so they must be
 lighter-hearted than we."
 
 "I dare say they are," said Winterborne.
 
 
 Before taking a single step in the preparations, Winterborne, with no
 great hopes, went across that evening to the timber-merchant's to
 ascertain if Grace and her parents would honor him with their presence.
 Having first to set his nightly gins in the garden, to catch the
 rabbits that ate his winter-greens, his call was delayed till just
 after the rising of the moon, whose rays reached the Hintock houses but
 fitfully as yet, on account of the trees. Melbury was crossing his yard
 on his way to call on some one at the larger village, but he readily
 turned and walked up and down the path with the young man.
 
 Giles, in his self-deprecatory sense of living on a much smaller scale
 than the Melburys did, would not for the world imply that his
 invitation was to a gathering of any importance.  So he put it in the
--**--**--
 "I s'pose your memory can reach a long way back into history, Mr.
 Creedle?"
 
 "Oh yes.  Ancient days, when there was battles and famines and
 hang-fairs and other pomps, seem to me as yesterday.  Ah, many's the
 patriarch I've seed come and go in this parish! There, he's calling for
 more plates.  Lord, why can't 'em turn their plates bottom upward for
 pudding, as they used to do in former days?"
 
 Meanwhile, in the adjoining room Giles was presiding in a
 half-unconscious state.  He could not get over the initial failures in
 his scheme for advancing his suit, and hence he did not know that he
 was eating mouthfuls of bread and nothing else, and continually
 snuffing the two candles next him till he had reduced them to mere
 glimmers drowned in their own grease.  Creedle now appeared with a
 specially prepared dish, which he served by elevating the little
 three-legged pot that contained it, and tilting the contents into a
 dish, exclaiming, simultaneously, "Draw back, gentlemen and ladies,
 please!"
 
 A splash followed.  Grace gave a quick, involuntary nod and blink, and
 put her handkerchief to her face.
 
 "Good heavens! what did you do that for, Creedle?" said Giles, sternly,
 and jumping up.
 
 "'Tis how I do it when they baint here, maister," mildly expostulated
 Creedle, in an aside audible to all the company.
 
 "Well, yes--but--" replied Giles.  He went over to Grace, and hoped
 none of it had gone into her eye.
 
 "Oh no," she said.  "Only a sprinkle on my face.  It was nothing."
 
 "Kiss it and make it well," gallantly observed Mr. Bawtree.
 
 Miss Melbury blushed.
 
 The timber-merchant said, quickly, "Oh, it is nothing! She must bear
 these little mishaps." But there could be discerned in his face
 something which said "I ought to have foreseen this."
--**--**--
 Mr. Melbury was standing by, and exclaimed, contemptuously, "Tell her
 fortune, indeed! Her fortune has been told by men of science--what do
 you call 'em? Phrenologists.  You can't teach her anything new.  She's
 been too far among the wise ones to be astonished at anything she can
 hear among us folks in Hintock."
 
 At last the time came for breaking up, Melbury and his family being the
 earliest to leave, the two card-players still pursuing their game
 doggedly in the corner, where they had completely covered Giles's
 mahogany table with chalk scratches.  The three walked home, the
 distance being short and the night clear.
 
 "Well, Giles is a very good fellow," said Mr. Melbury, as they struck
 down the lane under boughs which formed a black filigree in which the
 stars seemed set.
 
 "Certainly he is," said Grace, quickly, and in such a tone as to show
 that he stood no lower, if no higher, in her regard than he had stood
 before.
 
 When they were opposite an opening through which, by day, the doctor's
 house could be seen, they observed a light in one of his rooms,
 although it was now about two o'clock.
 
 "The doctor is not abed yet," said Mrs. Melbury.
 
 "Hard study, no doubt," said her husband.
 
 "One would think that, as he seems to have nothing to do about here by
 day, he could at least afford to go to bed early at night. 'Tis
 astonishing how little we see of him."
 
 Melbury's mind seemed to turn with much relief to the contemplation of
 Mr. Fitzpiers after the scenes of the evening. "It is natural enough,"
 he replied.  "What can a man of that sort find to interest him in
 Hintock?  I don't expect he'll stay here long."
 
 His mind reverted to Giles's party, and when they were nearly home he
--**--**--
 they finished breakfast.  Looking up, they saw Giles in person mounted
 on horseback, and straining his neck forward, as he had been doing for
 some time, to catch their attention through the window.  Grace had been
 the first to see him, and involuntarily exclaimed, "There he is--and a
 new horse!"
 
 On their faces as they regarded Giles were written their suspended
 thoughts and compound feelings concerning him, could he have read them
 through those old panes.  But he saw nothing: his features just now
 were, for a wonder, lit up with a red smile at some other idea.  So
 they rose from breakfast and went to the door, Grace with an anxious,
 wistful manner, her father in a reverie, Mrs. Melbury placid and
 inquiring.  "We have come out to look at your horse," she said.
 
 It could be seen that he was pleased at their attention, and explained
 that he had ridden a mile or two to try the animal's paces.  "I bought
 her," he added, with warmth so severely repressed as to seem
 indifference, "because she has been used to carry a lady."
 
 Still Mr. Melbury did not brighten.  Mrs. Melbury said, "And is she
 quiet?"
 
 Winterborne assured her that there was no doubt of it.  "I took care of
 that.  She's five-and-twenty, and very clever for her age."
 
 "Well, get off and come in," said Melbury, brusquely; and Giles
 dismounted accordingly.
 
 This event was the concrete result of Winterborne's thoughts during the
 past week or two.  The want of success with his evening party he had
 accepted in as philosophic a mood as he was capable of; but there had
 been enthusiasm enough left in him one day at Sherton Abbas market to
 purchase this old mare, which had belonged to a neighboring parson with
 several daughters, and was offered him to carry either a gentleman or a
--**--**--
 
 That evening he called her into his room, a snug little apartment
 behind the large parlor.  It had at one time been part of the
 bakehouse, with the ordinary oval brick oven in the wall; but Mr.
 Melbury, in turning it into an office, had built into the cavity an
 iron safe, which he used for holding his private papers.  The door of
 the safe was now open, and his keys were hanging from it.
 
 "Sit down, Grace, and keep me company," he said.  "You may amuse
 yourself by looking over these." He threw out a heap of papers before
 her.
 
 "What are they?" she asked.
 
 "Securities of various sorts." He unfolded them one by one. "Papers
 worth so much money each.  Now here's a lot of turnpike bonds for one
 thing.  Would you think that each of these pieces of paper is worth two
 hundred pounds?"
 
 "No, indeed, if you didn't say so."
 
 "'Tis so, then.  Now here are papers of another sort.  They are for
 different sums in the three-per-cents.  Now these are Port Breedy
 Harbor bonds.  We have a great stake in that harbor, you know, because
 I send off timber there.  Open the rest at your pleasure.  They'll
 interest ye."
 
 "Yes, I will, some day," said she, rising.
 
 "Nonsense, open them now.  You ought to learn a little of such matters.
 A young lady of education should not be ignorant of money affairs
 altogether.  Suppose you should be left a widow some day, with your
 husband's title-deeds and investments thrown upon your hands--"
 
 "Don't say that, father--title-deeds; it sounds so vain!"
 
 "It does not.  Come to that, I have title-deeds myself.  There, that
 piece of parchment represents houses in Sherton Abbas."
 
 "Yes, but--" She hesitated, looked at the fire, and went on in a low
--**--**--
 
 "You mean Mrs. Charmond?  Oh, she doesn't know there's such a tree on
 her estate.  Besides, shrouding is not felling, and I'll risk that
 much."
 
 He went out, and when afternoon came he returned, took a billhook from
 the woodman's shed, and with a ladder climbed into the lower part of
 the tree, where he began lopping off--"shrouding," as they called it at
 Hintock--the lowest boughs.  Each of these quivered under his attack,
 bent, cracked, and fell into the hedge.  Having cut away the lowest
 tier, he stepped off the ladder, climbed a few steps higher, and
 attacked those at the next level.  Thus he ascended with the progress
 of his work far above the top of the ladder, cutting away his perches
 as he went, and leaving nothing but a bare stem below him.
 
 The work was troublesome, for the tree was large.  The afternoon wore
 on, turning dark and misty about four o'clock.  From time to time Giles
 cast his eyes across towards the bedroom window of South, where, by the
 flickering fire in the chamber, he could see the old man watching him,
 sitting motionless with a hand upon each arm of the chair.  Beside him
 sat Marty, also straining her eyes towards the skyey field of his
 operations.
 
 A curious question suddenly occurred to Winterborne, and he stopped his
 chopping.  He was operating on another person's property to prolong the
 years of a lease by whose termination that person would considerably
 benefit.  In that aspect of the case he doubted if he ought to go on.
 On the other hand he was working to save a man's life, and this seemed
 to empower him to adopt arbitrary measures.
 
 The wind had died down to a calm, and while he was weighing the
 circumstances he saw coming along the road through the increasing mist
--**--**--
 year by the warning notes they cast ahead; moreover, the tones of all
 the teams in the district being known to the carters of each, they
 could tell a long way off on a dark night whether they were about to
 encounter friends or strangers.
 
 The fog of the previous evening still lingered so heavily over the
 woods that the morning could not penetrate the trees till long after
 its time.  The load being a ponderous one, the lane crooked, and the
 air so thick, Winterborne set out, as he often did, to accompany the
 team as far as the corner, where it would turn into a wider road.
 
 So they rumbled on, shaking the foundations of the roadside cottages by
 the weight of their progress, the sixteen bells chiming harmoniously
 over all, till they had risen out of the valley and were descending
 towards the more open route, the sparks rising from their creaking skid
 and nearly setting fire to the dead leaves alongside.
 
 Then occurred one of the very incidents against which the bells were an
 endeavor to guard.  Suddenly there beamed into their eyes, quite close
 to them, the two lamps of a carriage, shorn of rays by the fog.  Its
 approach had been quite unheard, by reason of their own noise.  The
 carriage was a covered one, while behind it could be discerned another
 vehicle laden with luggage.
 
 Winterborne went to the head of the team, and heard the coachman
 telling the carter that he must turn back.  The carter declared that
 this was impossible.
 
 "You can turn if you unhitch your string-horses," said the coachman.
 
 "It is much easier for you to turn than for us," said Winterborne.
 "We've five tons of timber on these wheels if we've an ounce."
 
 "But I've another carriage with luggage at my back."
--**--**--
 Since one of the Souths still survived, there was not much doubt that
 Giles could do what his father had left undone, as far as his own life
 was concerned.  This possibility cheered him much, for by those houses
 hung many things.  Melbury's doubt of the young man's fitness to be the
 husband of Grace had been based not a little on the precariousness of
 his holdings in Little and Great Hintock. He resolved to attend to the
 business at once, the fine for renewal being a sum that he could easily
 muster.  His scheme, however, could not be carried out in a day; and
 meanwhile he would run up to South's, as he had intended to do, to
 learn the result of the experiment with the tree.
 
 Marty met him at the door.  "Well, Marty," he said; and was surprised
 to read in her face that the case was not so hopeful as he had imagined.
 
 "I am sorry for your labor," she said.  "It is all lost.  He says the
 tree seems taller than ever."
 
 Winterborne looked round at it.  Taller the tree certainly did seem,
 the gauntness of its now naked stem being more marked than before.
 
 "It quite terrified him when he first saw what you had done to it this
 morning," she added.  "He declares it will come down upon us and cleave
 us, like 'the sword of the Lord and of Gideon.'"
 
 "Well; can I do anything else?" asked he.
 
 "The doctor says the tree ought to be cut down."
 
 "Oh--you've had the doctor?"
 
 "I didn't send for him Mrs. Charmond, before she left, heard that
 father was ill, and told him to attend him at her expense."
 
 "That was very good of her.  And he says it ought to be cut down. We
--**--**--
 as dignified as that of her companion--the repose of a guileless soul
 that had nothing more left on earth to lose, except a life which she
 did not overvalue.
 
 South was buried, and a week passed, and Winterborne watched for a
 reply from Mrs. Charmond.  Melbury was very sanguine as to its tenor;
 but Winterborne had not told him of the encounter with her carriage,
 when, if ever he had heard an affronted tone on a woman's lips, he had
 heard it on hers.
 
 The postman's time for passing was just after Melbury's men had
 assembled in the spar-house; and Winterborne, who when not busy on his
 own account would lend assistance there, used to go out into the lane
 every morning and meet the post-man at the end of one of the green
 rides through the hazel copse, in the straight stretch of which his
 laden figure could be seen a long way off.  Grace also was very
 anxious; more anxious than her father; more, perhaps, than Winterborne
 himself.  This anxiety led her into the spar-house on some pretext or
 other almost every morning while they were awaiting the reply.
 
 Fitzpiers too, though he did not personally appear, was much
 interested, and not altogether easy in his mind; for he had been
 informed by an authority of what he had himself conjectured, that if
 the tree had been allowed to stand, the old man would have gone on
 complaining, but might have lived for twenty years.
 
 Eleven times had Winterborne gone to that corner of the ride, and
 looked up its long straight slope through the wet grays of winter dawn.
 But though the postman's bowed figure loomed in view pretty regularly,
 he brought nothing for Giles.  On the twelfth day the man of missives,
 while yet in the extreme distance, held up his hand, and Winterborne
--**--**--
 "Who, indeed?" said he.
 
 "I have rubbed it all out, as the point of it is quite gone."
 
 "You'd no business to rub it out.  I didn't tell you to.  I meant to
 let it stay a little longer."
 
 "Some idle boy did it, no doubt," she murmured.
 
 As this seemed very probable, and the actual perpetrator was
 unsuspected, Winterborne said no more, and dismissed the matter from
 his mind.
 
 From this day of his life onward for a considerable time, Winterborne,
 though not absolutely out of his house as yet, retired into the
 background of human life and action thereabout--a feat not particularly
 difficult of performance anywhere when the doer has the assistance of a
 lost prestige.  Grace, thinking that Winterborne saw her write, made no
 further sign, and the frail bark of fidelity that she had thus timidly
 launched was stranded and lost.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XVI.
 
 Dr. Fitzpiers lived on the slope of the hill, in a house of much less
 pretension, both as to architecture and as to magnitude, than the
 timber-merchant's.  The latter had, without doubt, been once the
 manorial residence appertaining to the snug and modest domain of Little
 Hintock, of which the boundaries were now lost by its absorption with
 others of its kind into the adjoining estate of Mrs. Charmond.  Though
 the Melburys themselves were unaware of the fact, there was every
 reason to believe--at least so the parson said that the owners of that
 little manor had been Melbury's own ancestors, the family name
 occurring in numerous documents relating to transfers of land about the
 time of the civil wars.
 
 Mr. Fitzpiers's dwelling, on the contrary, was small, cottage-like, and
 comparatively modern.  It had been occupied, and was in part occupied
 still, by a retired farmer and his wife, who, on the surgeon's arrival
--**--**--
 over the hedge.  "It might have been," he said.  "She is quite a
 gentlewoman--the one I mean.  She cannot be a permanent resident in
 Hintock or I should have seen her before.  Nor does she look like one."
 
 "She is not staying at Hintock House?"
 
 "No; it is closed."
 
 "Then perhaps she is staying at one of the cottages, or farmhouses?"
 
 "Oh no--you mistake.  She was a different sort of girl altogether." As
 Giles was nobody, Fitzpiers treated him accordingly, and apostrophized
 the night in continuation:
 
   "'She moved upon this earth a shape of brightness,
     A power, that from its objects scarcely drew
     One impulse of her being--in her lightness
     Most like some radiant cloud of morning dew,
     Which wanders through the waste air's pathless blue,
     To nourish some far desert: she did seem
     Beside me, gathering beauty as she grew,
     Like the bright shade of some immortal dream
     Which walks, when tempests sleep, the wave of life's dark stream.'"
 
 
 The consummate charm of the lines seemed to Winterborne, though he
 divined that they were a quotation, to be somehow the result of his
 lost love's charms upon Fitzpiers.
 
 "You seem to be mightily in love with her, sir," he said, with a
 sensation of heart-sickness, and more than ever resolved not to mention
 Grace by name.
 
 "Oh no--I am not that, Winterborne; people living insulated, as I do by
 the solitude of this place, get charged with emotive fluid like a
 Leyden-jar with electric, for want of some conductor at hand to
 disperse it.  Human love is a subjective thing--the essence itself of
 man, as that great thinker Spinoza the philosopher says--ipsa hominis
 essentia--it is joy accompanied by an idea which we project against any
 suitable object in the line of our vision, just as the rainbow iris is
--**--**--
 door as the safest way, all the household having occupations at the
 other side.  The morning looked forbidding enough when she stealthily
 opened it.  The battle between frost and thaw was continuing in
 mid-air: the trees dripped on the garden-plots, where no vegetables
 would grow for the dripping, though they were planted year after year
 with that curious mechanical regularity of country people in the face
 of hopelessness; the moss which covered the once broad gravel terrace
 was swamped; and Grace stood irresolute.  Then she thought of poor
 Grammer, and her dreams of the doctor running after her, scalpel in
 hand, and the possibility of a case so curiously similar to South's
 ending in the same way; thereupon she stepped out into the drizzle.
 
 The nature of her errand, and Grammer Oliver's account of the compact
 she had made, lent a fascinating horror to Grace's conception of
 Fitzpiers.  She knew that he was a young man; but her single object in
 seeking an interview with him put all considerations of his age and
 social aspect from her mind. Standing as she stood, in Grammer Oliver's
 shoes, he was simply a remorseless Jove of the sciences, who would not
 have mercy, and would have sacrifice; a man whom, save for this, she
 would have preferred to avoid knowing.  But since, in such a small
 village, it was improbable that any long time could pass without their
 meeting, there was not much to deplore in her having to meet him now.
 
 But, as need hardly be said, Miss Melbury's view of the doctor as a
 merciless, unwavering, irresistible scientist was not quite in
 accordance with fact.  The real Dr. Fitzpiers w as a man of too many
 hobbies to show likelihood of rising to any great eminence in the
 profession he had chosen, or even to acquire any wide practice in the
--**--**--
 came hesitatingly along, carrying her umbrella so low over her head
 that he could hardly see her face.  When she reached the point where
 the raspberry bushes ended and the strawberry bed began, she made a
 little pause.
 
 Fitzpiers feared that she might not be coming to him even now, and
 hastily quitting the room, he ran down the path to meet her.  The
 nature of her errand he could not divine, but he was prepared to give
 her any amount of encouragement.
 
 "I beg pardon, Miss Melbury," he said.  "I saw you from the window, and
 fancied you might imagine that I was not at home--if it is I you were
 coming for."
 
 "I was coming to speak one word to you, nothing more," she replied.
 "And I can say it here."
 
 "No, no.  Please do come in.  Well, then, if you will not come into the
 house, come as far as the porch."
 
 Thus pressed she went on to the porch, and they stood together inside
 it, Fitzpiers closing her umbrella for her.
 
 "I have merely a request or petition to make," she said.  "My father's
 servant is ill--a woman you know--and her illness is serious."
 
 "I am sorry to hear it.  You wish me to come and see her at once?"
 
 "No; I particularly wish you not to come."
 
 "Oh, indeed."
 
 "Yes; and she wishes the same.  It would make her seriously worse if
 you were to come.  It would almost kill her....My errand is of a
 peculiar and awkward nature.  It is concerning a subject which weighs
 on her mind--that unfortunate arrangement she made with you, that you
 might have her body--after death."
 
 "Oh! Grammer Oliver, the old woman with the fine head.  Seriously ill,
 is she!"
 
 "And SO disturbed by her rash compact! I have brought the money
--**--**--
 
 As Fitzpiers did not take up the money (half of which had come from
 Grace's own purse), she pushed it a little nearer to him. "No, no.  I
 shall not take it from the old woman," he said.  "It is more strange
 than the fact of a surgeon arranging to obtain a subject for dissection
 that our acquaintance should be formed out of it."
 
 "I am afraid you think me uncivil in showing my dislike to the notion.
 But I did not mean to be."
 
 "Oh no, no."  He looked at her, as he had done before, with puzzled
 interest.  "I cannot think, I cannot think," he murmured. "Something
 bewilders me greatly."  He still reflected and hesitated.  "Last night
 I sat up very late," he at last went on, "and on that account I fell
 into a little nap on that couch about half an hour ago.  And during my
 few minutes of unconsciousness I dreamed--what do you think?--that you
 stood in the room."
 
 Should she tell? She merely blushed.
 
 "You may imagine," Fitzpiers continued, now persuaded that it had,
 indeed, been a dream, "that I should not have dreamed of you without
 considerable thinking about you first."
 
 He could not be acting; of that she felt assured.
 
 "I fancied in my vision that you stood there," he said, pointing to
 where she had paused.  "I did not see you directly, but reflected in
 the glass.  I thought, what a lovely creature! The design is for once
 carried out.  Nature has at last recovered her lost union with the
 Idea! My thoughts ran in that direction because I had been reading the
 work of a transcendental philosopher last night; and I dare say it was
 the dose of Idealism that I received from it that made me scarcely able
--**--**--
 to fill reflective human beings who are not undertaking much themselves
 with a sudden uneasiness at the contrast.  He heard in the distance a
 curious sound, something like the quack of a duck, which, though it was
 common enough here about this time, was not common to him.
 
 Looking through the trees Fitzpiers soon perceived the origin of the
 noise.  The barking season had just commenced, and what he had heard
 was the tear of the ripping tool as it ploughed its way along the
 sticky parting between the trunk and the rind.  Melbury did a large
 business in bark, and as he was Grace's father, and possibly might be
 found on the spot, Fitzpiers was attracted to the scene even more than
 he might have been by its intrinsic interest.  When he got nearer he
 recognized among the workmen the two Timothys, and Robert Creedle, who
 probably had been "lent" by Winterborne; Marty South also assisted.
 
 Each tree doomed to this flaying process was first attacked by Creedle.
 With a small billhook he carefully freed the collar of the tree from
 twigs and patches of moss which incrusted it to a height of a foot or
 two above the ground, an operation comparable to the "little toilet" of
 the executioner's victim.  After this it was barked in its erect
 position to a point as high as a man could reach.  If a fine product of
 vegetable nature could ever be said to look ridiculous it was the case
 now, when the oak stood naked-legged, and as if ashamed, till the
 axe-man came and cut a ring round it, and the two Timothys finished the
 work with the crosscut-saw.
 
 As soon as it had fallen the barkers attacked it like locusts, and in a
 short time not a particle of rind was left on the trunk and larger
--**--**--
 He looked out towards the gig wherein Grace sat, her face still turned
 in the opposite direction.  "She doesn't see us.  Well, never mind: let
 her be."
 
 Grace was indeed quite unconscious of Fitzpiers's propinquity. She was
 thinking of something which had little connection with the scene before
 her--thinking of her friend, lost as soon as found, Mrs. Charmond; of
 her capricious conduct, and of the contrasting scenes she was possibly
 enjoying at that very moment in other climes, to which Grace herself
 had hoped to be introduced by her friend's means.  She wondered if this
 patronizing lady would return to Hintock during the summer, and whether
 the acquaintance which had been nipped on the last occasion of her
 residence there would develop on the next.
 
 Melbury told ancient timber-stories as he sat, relating them directly
 to Fitzpiers, and obliquely to the men, who had heard them often
 before.  Marty, who poured out tea, was just saying, "I think I'll take
 out a cup to Miss Grace," when they heard a clashing of the
 gig-harness, and turning round Melbury saw that the horse had become
 restless, and was jerking about the vehicle in a way which alarmed its
 occupant, though she refrained from screaming.  Melbury jumped up
 immediately, but not more quickly than Fitzpiers; and while her father
 ran to the horse's head and speedily began to control him, Fitzpiers
 was alongside the gig assisting Grace to descend.  Her surprise at his
 appearance was so great that, far from making a calm and independent
 descent, she was very nearly lifted down in his arms.  He relinquished
 her when she touched ground, and hoped she was not frightened.
 
 "Oh no, not much," she managed to say.  "There was no danger--unless he
 had run under the trees where the boughs are low enough to hit my head."
--**--**--
 beheld a wide valley, differing both in feature and atmosphere from
 that of the Hintock precincts.  It was the cider country, which met the
 woodland district on the axis of this hill.  Over the vale the air was
 blue as sapphire--such a blue as outside that apple-valley was never
 seen.  Under the blue the orchards were in a blaze of bloom, some of
 the richly flowered trees running almost up to where they drove along.
 Over a gate which opened down the incline a man leaned on his arms,
 regarding this fair promise so intently that he did not observe their
 passing.
 
 "That was Giles," said Melbury, when they had gone by.
 
 "Was it? Poor Giles," said she.
 
 "All that blooth means heavy autumn work for him and his hands. If no
 blight happens before the setting the apple yield will be such as we
 have not had for years."
 
 Meanwhile, in the wood they had come from, the men had sat on so long
 that they were indisposed to begin work again that evening; they were
 paid by the ton, and their time for labor was as they chose.  They
 placed the last gatherings of bark in rows for the curers, which led
 them farther and farther away from the shed; and thus they gradually
 withdrew as the sun went down.
 
 Fitzpiers lingered yet.  He had opened his book again, though he could
 hardly see a word in it, and sat before the dying fire, scarcely
 knowing of the men's departure.  He dreamed and mused till his
 consciousness seemed to occupy the whole space of the woodland around,
 so little was there of jarring sight or sound to hinder perfect unity
 with the sentiment of the place.  The idea returned upon him of
 sacrificing all practical aims to live in calm contentment here, and
--**--**--
 "Nor was he," said Grace.
 
 "But, Miss Melbury, I saw him."
 
 "No," said Grace.  "It was somebody else.  Giles Winterborne is nothing
 to me."
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XX.
 
 The leaves over Hintock grew denser in their substance, and the
 woodland seemed to change from an open filigree to a solid opaque body
 of infinitely larger shape and importance.  The boughs cast green
 shades, which hurt the complexion of the girls who walked there; and a
 fringe of them which overhung Mr. Melbury's garden dripped on his
 seed-plots when it rained, pitting their surface all over as with
 pock-marks, till Melbury declared that gardens in such a place were no
 good at all.  The two trees that had creaked all the winter left off
 creaking, the whir of the night-jar, however, forming a very
 satisfactory continuation of uncanny music from that quarter.  Except
 at mid-day the sun was not seen complete by the Hintock people, but
 rather in the form of numerous little stars staring through the leaves.
 
 Such an appearance it had on Midsummer Eve of this year, and as the
 hour grew later, and nine o'clock drew on, the irradiation of the
 daytime became broken up by weird shadows and ghostly nooks of
 indistinctness.  Imagination could trace upon the trunks and boughs
 strange faces and figures shaped by the dying lights; the surfaces of
 the holly-leaves would here and there shine like peeping eyes, while
 such fragments of the sky as were visible between the trunks assumed
 the aspect of sheeted forms and cloven tongues.  This was before the
 moonrise.  Later on, when that planet was getting command of the upper
 heaven, and consequently shining with an unbroken face into such open
 glades as there were in the neighborhood of the hamlet, it became
 apparent that the margin of the wood which approached the
--**--**--
 that she had no difficulty in persuading Mrs. Melbury to accompany her;
 and thus, joined by Marty, these went onward in the same direction.
 
 Passing Winterborne's house, they heard a noise of hammering. Marty
 explained it.  This was the last night on which his paternal roof would
 shelter him, the days of grace since it fell into hand having expired;
 and Giles was taking down his cupboards and bedsteads with a view to an
 early exit next morning.  His encounter with Mrs. Charmond had cost him
 dearly.
 
 When they had proceeded a little farther Marty was joined by Grammer
 Oliver (who was as young as the youngest in such matters), and Grace
 and Mrs. Melbury went on by themselves till they had arrived at the
 spot chosen by the village daughters, whose primary intention of
 keeping their expedition a secret had been quite defeated.  Grace and
 her step-mother paused by a holly-tree; and at a little distance stood
 Fitzpiers under the shade of a young oak, intently observing Grace, who
 was in the full rays of the moon.
 
 He watched her without speaking, and unperceived by any but Marty and
 Grammer, who had drawn up on the dark side of the same holly which
 sheltered Mrs. and Miss Melbury on its bright side.  The two former
 conversed in low tones.
 
 "If they two come up in Wood next Midsummer Night they'll come as one,"
 said Grammer, signifying Fitzpiers and Grace.  "Instead of my
 skellington he'll carry home her living carcass before long. But though
 she's a lady in herself, and worthy of any such as he, it do seem to me
 that he ought to marry somebody more of the sort of Mrs. Charmond, and
 that Miss Grace should make the best of Winterborne."
 
 Marty returned no comment; and at that minute the girls, some of whom
--**--**--
 the wood-girl that she should walk forward at the heels of Grace, and
 "tole" her down the required way if she showed a tendency to run in
 another direction.  Poor Marty, always doomed to sacrifice desire to
 obligation, walked forward accordingly, and waited as a beacon, still
 and silent, for the retreat of Grace and her giddy companions, now
 quite out of hearing.
 
 The first sound to break the silence was the distant note of Great
 Hintock clock striking the significant hour.  About a minute later that
 quarter of the wood to which the girls had wandered resounded with the
 flapping of disturbed birds; then two or three hares and rabbits
 bounded down the glade from the same direction, and after these the
 rustling and crackling of leaves and dead twigs denoted the hurried
 approach of the adventurers, whose fluttering gowns soon became
 visible.  Miss Melbury, having gone forward quite in the rear of the
 rest, was one of the first to return, and the excitement being
 contagious, she ran laughing towards Marty, who still stood as a
 hand-post to guide her; then, passing on, she flew round the fatal bush
 where the undergrowth narrowed to a gorge.  Marty arrived at her heels
 just in time to see the result. Fitzpiers had quickly stepped forward
 in front of Winterborne, who, disdaining to shift his position, had
 turned on his heel, and then the surgeon did what he would not have
 thought of doing but for Mrs. Melbury's encouragement and the sentiment
 of an eve which effaced conventionality.  Stretching out his arms as
 the white figure burst upon him, he captured her in a moment, as if she
 had been a bird.
 
 "Oh!" cried Grace, in her fright.
 
 "You are in my arms, dearest," said Fitzpiers, "and I am going to claim
--**--**--
 one of the hay-cocks.
 
 Fitzpiers, now thoroughly excited, was not going to let her escape him
 thus.  He approached, and set about turning over the heaps one by one.
 As soon as he paused, tantalized and puzzled, he was directed anew by
 an imitative kiss which came from her hiding-place, and by snatches of
 a local ballad in the smallest voice she could assume:
 
     "O come in from the foggy, foggy dew."
 
 
 In a minute or two he uncovered her.
 
 "Oh, 'tis not Tim!" said she, burying her face.
 
 Fitzpiers, however, disregarded her resistance by reason of its
 mildness, stooped and imprinted the purposed kiss, then sunk down on
 the next hay-cock, panting with his race.
 
 "Whom do you mean by Tim?" he asked, presently.
 
 "My young man, Tim Tangs," said she.
 
 "Now, honor bright, did you really think it was he?"
 
 "I did at first."
 
 "But you didn't at last?"
 
 "I didn't at last."
 
 "Do you much mind that it was not?"
 
 "No," she answered, slyly.
 
 Fitzpiers did not pursue his questioning.  In the moonlight Suke looked
 very beautiful, the scratches and blemishes incidental to her out-door
 occupation being invisible under these pale rays. While they remain
 silent the coarse whir of the eternal night-jar burst sarcastically
 from the top of a tree at the nearest corner of the wood.  Besides this
 not a sound of any kind reached their ears, the time of nightingales
 being now past, and Hintock lying at a distance of two miles at least.
 In the opposite direction the hay-field stretched away into remoteness
 till it was lost to the eye in a soft mist.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI.
 
 When the general stampede occurred Winterborne had also been looking
 on, and encountering one of the girls, had asked her what caused them
 all to fly.
--**--**--
 "Yes.  And the question is, where would you advise me to send her?"
 
 The timber-merchant had happened to call at a moment when Fitzpiers was
 at the spring-tide of a sentiment that Grace was a necessity of his
 existence.  The sudden pressure of her form upon his breast as she came
 headlong round the bush had never ceased to linger with him, ever since
 he adopted the manoeuvre for which the hour and the moonlight and the
 occasion had been the only excuse. Now she was to be sent away.
 Ambition? it could be postponed. Family? culture and reciprocity of
 tastes had taken the place of family nowadays.  He allowed himself to
 be carried forward on the wave of his desire.
 
 "How strange, how very strange it is," he said, "that you should have
 come to me about her just now.  I have been thinking every day of
 coming to you on the very same errand."
 
 "Ah!--you have noticed, too, that her health----"
 
 "I have noticed nothing the matter with her health, because there is
 nothing.  But, Mr. Melbury, I have seen your daughter several times by
 accident.  I have admired her infinitely, and I was coming to ask you
 if I may become better acquainted with her--pay my addresses to her?"
 
 Melbury was looking down as he listened, and did not see the air of
 half-misgiving at his own rashness that spread over Fitzpiers's face as
 he made this declaration.
 
 "You have--got to know her?" said Melbury, a spell of dead silence
 having preceded his utterance, during which his emotion rose with
 almost visible effect.
 
 "Yes," said Fitzpiers.
 
 "And you wish to become better acquainted with her? You mean with a
 view to marriage--of course that is what you mean?"
 
 "Yes," said the young man.  "I mean, get acquainted with her, with a
--**--**--
 "Hey?" said Melbury, looking hard at him.  The man repeated the words.
 
 Melbury stood; then turning suddenly away without answering, he went up
 the court and entered the house.  As time was no object with the
 journeymen, except as a thing to get past, they leisurely surveyed the
 door through which he had disappeared.
 
 "What maggot has the gaffer got in his head now?" said Tangs the elder.
 "Sommit to do with that chiel of his! When you've got a maid of yer
 own, John Upjohn, that costs ye what she costs him, that will take the
 squeak out of your Sunday shoes, John! But you'll never be tall enough
 to accomplish such as she; and 'tis a lucky thing for ye, John, as
 things be.  Well, he ought to have a dozen--that would bring him to
 reason.  I see 'em walking together last Sunday, and when they came to
 a puddle he lifted her over like a halfpenny doll.  He ought to have a
 dozen; he'd let 'em walk through puddles for themselves then."
 
 Meanwhile Melbury had entered the house with the look of a man who sees
 a vision before him.  His wife was in the room.  Without taking off his
 hat he sat down at random.
 
 "Luce--we've done it!" he said.  "Yes--the thing is as I expected. The
 spell, that I foresaw might be worked, has worked.  She's done it, and
 done it well.  Where is she--Grace, I mean?"
 
 "Up in her room--what has happened!"
 
 Mr. Melbury explained the circumstances as coherently as he could. "I
 told you so," he said.  "A maid like her couldn't stay hid long, even
 in a place like this.  But where is Grace? Let's have her down.
 Here--Gra-a-ace!"
 
 She appeared after a reasonable interval, for she was sufficiently
 spoiled by this father of hers not to put herself in a hurry, however
--**--**--
 life, such as has now become natural to you; and though the doctor's
 practice is small here, he'll no doubt go to a dashing town when he's
 got his hand in, and keep a stylish carriage, and you'll be brought to
 know a good many ladies of excellent society.  If you should ever meet
 me then, Grace, you can drive past me, looking the other way.  I
 shouldn't expect you to speak to me, or wish such a thing, unless it
 happened to be in some lonely, private place where 'twouldn't lower ye
 at all. Don't think such men as neighbor Giles your equal.  He and I
 shall be good friends enough, but he's not for the like of you.  He's
 lived our rough and homely life here, and his wife's life must be rough
 and homely likewise."
 
 So much pressure could not but produce some displacement.  As Grace was
 left very much to herself, she took advantage of one fine day before
 Fitzpiers's return to drive into the aforesaid vale where stood the
 village of Buckbury Fitzpiers.  Leaving her father's man at the inn
 with the horse and gig, she rambled onward to the ruins of a castle,
 which stood in a field hard by.  She had no doubt that it represented
 the ancient stronghold of the Fitzpiers family.
 
 The remains were few, and consisted mostly of remnants of the lower
 vaulting, supported on low stout columns surmounted by the crochet
 capital of the period.  The two or three arches of these vaults that
 were still in position were utilized by the adjoining farmer as shelter
 for his calves, the floor being spread with straw, amid which the young
 creatures rustled, cooling their thirsty tongues by licking the quaint
 Norman carving, which glistened with the moisture.  It was a
--**--**--
 with more recent discoveries.
 
 The day of Fitzpiers's return arrived, and he sent to say that he would
 call immediately.  In the little time that was afforded for putting the
 house in order the sweeping of Melbury's parlor was as the sweeping of
 the parlor at the Interpreter's which wellnigh choked the Pilgrim.  At
 the end of it Mrs. Melbury sat down, folded her hands and lips, and
 waited.  Her husband restlessly walked in and out from the timber-yard,
 stared at the interior of the room, jerked out "ay, ay," and retreated
 again.  Between four and five Fitzpiers arrived, hitching his horse to
 the hook outside the door.
 
 As soon as he had walked in and perceived that Grace was not in the
 room, he seemed to have a misgiving.  Nothing less than her actual
 presence could long keep him to the level of this impassioned
 enterprise, and that lacking he appeared as one who wished to retrace
 his steps.
 
 He mechanically talked at what he considered a woodland matron's level
 of thought till a rustling was heard on the stairs, and Grace came in.
 Fitzpiers was for once as agitated as she.  Over and above the genuine
 emotion which she raised in his heart there hung the sense that he was
 casting a die by impulse which he might not have thrown by judgment.
 
 Mr. Melbury was not in the room.  Having to attend to matters in the
 yard, he had delayed putting on his afternoon coat and waistcoat till
 the doctor's appearance, when, not wishing to be backward in receiving
 him, he entered the parlor hastily buttoning up those garments.
 Grace's fastidiousness was a little distressed that Fitzpiers should
 see by this action the strain his visit was putting upon her father;
 and to make matters worse for her just then, old Grammer seemed to have
--**--**--
 has any right eye to her parents' honor and the seemliness of things.
 That time has come.  I won't say to ye, you SHALL marry him.  But I
 will say that if you refuse, I shall forever be ashamed and a-weary of
 ye as a daughter, and shall look upon you as the hope of my life no
 more.  What do you know about life and what it can bring forth, and how
 you ought to act to lead up to best ends?  Oh, you are an ungrateful
 maid, Grace; you've seen that fellow Giles, and he has got over ye;
 that's where the secret lies, I'll warrant me!"
 
 "No, father, no! It is not Giles--it is something I cannot tell you
 of--"
 
 "Well, make fools of us all; make us laughing-stocks; break it off;
 have your own way."
 
 "But who knows of the engagement as yet? how can breaking it disgrace
 you?"
 
 Melbury then by degrees admitted that he had mentioned the engagement
 to this acquaintance and to that, till she perceived that in his
 restlessness and pride he had published it everywhere. She went
 dismally away to a bower of laurel at the top of the garden.  Her
 father followed her.
 
 "It is that Giles Winterborne!" he said, with an upbraiding gaze at her.
 
 "No, it is not; though for that matter you encouraged him once," she
 said, troubled to the verge of despair.  "It is not Giles, it is Mr.
 Fitzpiers."
 
 "You've had a tiff--a lovers' tiff--that's all, I suppose
 
 "It is some woman--"
 
 "Ay, ay; you are jealous.  The old story.  Don't tell me.  Now do you
 bide here.  I'll send Fitzpiers to you. I saw him smoking in front of
 his house but a minute by-gone."
 
 He went off hastily out of the garden-gate and down the lane.  But she
--**--**--
 satisfaction of feeling that she would be the heroine of an hour;
 moreover, she was proud, as a cultivated woman, to be the wife of a
 cultivated man.  It was an opportunity denied very frequently to young
 women in her position, nowadays not a few; those in whom parental
 discovery of the value of education has implanted tastes which parental
 circles fail to gratify.  But what an attenuation was this cold pride
 of the dream of her youth, in which she had pictured herself walking in
 state towards the altar, flushed by the purple light and bloom of her
 own passion, without a single misgiving as to the sealing of the bond,
 and fervently receiving as her due
 
   "The homage of a thousand hearts; the fond, deep love of one."
 
 
 Everything had been clear then, in imagination; now something was
 undefined.  She had little carking anxieties; a curious fatefulness
 seemed to rule her, and she experienced a mournful want of some one to
 confide in.
 
 The day loomed so big and nigh that her prophetic ear could, in fancy,
 catch the noise of it, hear the murmur of the villagers as she came out
 of church, imagine the jangle of the three thin-toned Hintock bells.
 The dialogues seemed to grow louder, and the ding-ding-dong of those
 three crazed bells more persistent.  She awoke: the morning had come.
 
 Five hours later she was the wife of Fitzpiers.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV.
 
 The chief hotel at Sherton-Abbas was an old stone-fronted inn with a
 yawning arch, under which vehicles were driven by stooping coachmen to
 back premises of wonderful commodiousness.  The windows to the street
 were mullioned into narrow lights, and only commanded a view of the
 opposite houses; hence, perhaps, it arose that the best and most
 luxurious private sitting-room that the inn could afford over-looked
--**--**--
 luxuriously performed--for Fitzpiers did not study economy where
 pleasure was in question.  Hence it perhaps arose that Giles and all
 his belongings seemed sorry and common to her for the moment--moving in
 a plane so far removed from her own of late that she could scarcely
 believe she had ever found congruity therein.  "No--I could never have
 married him!" she said, gently shaking her head.  "Dear father was
 right.  It would have been too coarse a life for me." And she looked at
 the rings of sapphire and opal upon her white and slender fingers that
 had been gifts from Fitzpiers.
 
 Seeing that Giles still kept his back turned, and with a little of the
 above-described pride of life--easily to be understood, and possibly
 excused, in a young, inexperienced woman who thought she had married
 well--she said at last, with a smile on her lips, "Mr. Winterborne!"
 
 He appeared to take no heed, and she said a second time, "Mr.
 Winterborne!"
 
 Even now he seemed not to hear, though a person close enough to him to
 see the expression of his face might have doubted it; and she said a
 third time, with a timid loudness, "Mr. Winterborne! What, have you
 forgotten my voice?" She remained with her lips parted in a welcoming
 smile.
 
 He turned without surprise, and came deliberately towards the window.
 "Why do you call me?" he said, with a sternness that took her
 completely unawares, his face being now pale.  "Is it not enough that
 you see me here moiling and muddling for my daily bread while you are
 sitting there in your success, that you can't refrain from opening old
 wounds by calling out my name?"
 
 She flushed, and was struck dumb for some moments; but she forgave his
 unreasoning anger, knowing so well in what it had its root. "I am sorry
--**--**--
 could be shut off on the landing by a door that Melbury had hung for
 the purpose.  A friendly fire was burning in the grate, although it was
 not cold.  Fitzpiers said it was too soon for any sort of meal, they
 only having dined shortly before leaving Sherton-Abbas.  He would walk
 across to his old lodging, to learn how his locum tenens had got on in
 his absence.
 
 In leaving Melbury's door he looked back at the house.  There was
 economy in living under that roof, and economy was desirable, but in
 some way he was dissatisfied with the arrangement; it immersed him so
 deeply in son-in-lawship to Melbury.  He went on to his former
 residence.  His deputy was out, and Fitzpiers fell into conversation
 with his former landlady.
 
 "Well, Mrs. Cox, what's the best news?" he asked of her, with cheery
 weariness.
 
 She was a little soured at losing by his marriage so profitable a
 tenant as the surgeon had proved to be duling his residence under her
 roof; and the more so in there being hardly the remotest chance of her
 getting such another settler in the Hintock solitudes.  "'Tis what I
 don't wish to repeat, sir; least of all to you," she mumbled.
 
 "Never mind me, Mrs. Cox; go ahead."
 
 "It is what people say about your hasty marrying, Dr. Fitzpiers.
 Whereas they won't believe you know such clever doctrines in physic as
 they once supposed of ye, seeing as you could marry into Mr. Melbury's
 family, which is only Hintock-born, such as me."
 
 "They are kindly welcome to their opinion," said Fitzpiers, not
 allowing himself to recognize that he winced.  "Anything else?"
 
 "Yes; SHE'S come home at last."
 
 "Who's she?"
 
 "Mrs. Charmond."
 
 "Oh, indeed!" said Fitzpiers, with but slight interest.  "I've never
 seen her."
--**--**--
 awkwardly into the road, and the opening caused by its absence was very
 distinct.
 
 In the silence the trot of horses and the spin of carriage-wheels
 became audible; and the vehicle soon shaped itself against the blank
 sky, bearing down upon him with the bend in the lane which here
 occurred, and of which the house had been the cause.  He could discern
 the figure of a woman high up on the driving-seat of a phaeton, a groom
 being just visible behind.  Presently there was a slight scrape, then a
 scream.  Winterborne went across to the spot, and found the phaeton
 half overturned, its driver sitting on the heap of rubbish which had
 once been his dwelling, and the man seizing the horses' heads.  The
 equipage was Mrs. Charmond's, and the unseated charioteer that lady
 herself.
 
 To his inquiry if she were hurt she made some incoherent reply to the
 effect that she did not know.  The damage in other respects was little
 or none: the phaeton was righted, Mrs. Charmond placed in it, and the
 reins given to the servant.  It appeared that she had been deceived by
 the removal of the house, imagining the gap caused by the demolition to
 be the opening of the road, so that she turned in upon the ruins
 instead of at the bend a few yards farther on.
 
 "Drive home--drive home!" cried the lady, impatiently; and they started
 on their way.  They had not, however, gone many paces when, the air
 being still, Winterborne heard her say "Stop; tell that man to call the
 doctor--Mr. Fitzpiers--and send him on to the House.  I find I am hurt
 more seriously than I thought."
 
 Winterborne took the message from the groom and proceeded to the
 doctor's at once.  Having delivered it, he stepped back into the
--**--**--
 neighbors think I am an atheist, except those who think I am a Roman
 Catholic; and when I speak disrespectfully of the weather or the crops
 they think I am a blasphemer."
 
 She broke into a low musical laugh at the idea.
 
 "You don't wish me to stay any longer?" he inquired, when he found that
 she remained musing.
 
 "No--I think not."
 
 "Then tell me that I am to be gone."
 
 "Why? Cannot you go without?"
 
 "I may consult my own feelings only, if left to myself."
 
 "Well, if you do, what then? Do you suppose you'll be in my way?"
 
 "I feared it might be so."
 
 "Then fear no more.  But good-night.  Come to-morrow and see if I am
 going on right.  This renewal of acquaintance touches me.  I have
 already a friendship for you."
 
 "If it depends upon myself it shall last forever."
 
 "My best hopes that it may.  Good-by."
 
 Fitzpiers went down the stairs absolutely unable to decide whether she
 had sent for him in the natural alarm which might have followed her
 mishap, or with the single view of making herself known to him as she
 had done, for which the capsize had afforded excellent opportunity.
 Outside the house he mused over the spot under the light of the stars.
 It seemed very strange that he should have come there more than once
 when its inhabitant was absent, and observed the house with a nameless
 interest; that he should have assumed off-hand before he knew Grace
 that it was here she lived; that, in short, at sundry times and seasons
 the individuality of Hintock House should have forced itself upon him
 as appertaining to some existence with which he was concerned.
 
 The intersection of his temporal orbit with Mrs. Charmond's for a day
 or two in the past had created a sentimental interest in her at the
--**--**--
 Now, with regard to the doctor's notion of leaving Hintock, he had
 advanced further towards completing the purchase of the Budmouth
 surgeon's good-will than he had admitted to Mrs. Charmond.  The whole
 matter hung upon what he might do in the ensuing twenty-four hours.
 The evening after leaving her he went out into the lane, and walked and
 pondered between the high hedges, now greenish-white with wild
 clematis--here called "old-man's beard," from its aspect later in the
 year.
 
 The letter of acceptance was to be written that night, after which his
 departure from Hintock would be irrevocable.  But could he go away,
 remembering what had just passed? The trees, the hills, the leaves, the
 grass--each had been endowed and quickened with a subtle charm since he
 had discovered the person and history, and, above all, mood of their
 owner.  There was every temporal reason for leaving; it would be
 entering again into a world which he had only quitted in a passion for
 isolation, induced by a fit of Achillean moodiness after an imagined
 slight.  His wife herself saw the awkwardness of their position here,
 and cheerfully welcomed the purposed change, towards which every step
 had been taken but the last.  But could he find it in his heart--as he
 found it clearly enough in his conscience--to go away?
 
 He drew a troubled breath, and went in-doors.  Here he rapidly penned a
 letter, wherein he withdrew once for all from the treaty for the
 Budmouth practice.  As the postman had already left Little Hintock for
 that night, he sent one of Melbury's men to intercept a mail-cart on
 another turnpike-road, and so got the letter off.
 
 The man returned, met Fitzpiers in the lane, and told him the thing was
 done.  Fitzpiers went back to his house musing.  Why had he carried out
--**--**--
 And when I come back I shall be a new woman; and you can come and see
 me safely then, and bring your wife with you, and we'll be friends--she
 and I.  Oh, how this shutting up of one's self does lead to indulgence
 in idle sentiments.  I shall not wish you to give your attendance to me
 after to-day.  But I am glad that you are not going away--if your
 remaining does not injure your prospects at all."
 
 As soon as he had left the room the mild friendliness she had preserved
 in her tone at parting, the playful sadness with which she had
 conversed with him, equally departed from her.  She became as heavy as
 lead--just as she had been before he arrived.  Her whole being seemed
 to dissolve in a sad powerlessness to do anything, and the sense of it
 made her lips tremulous and her closed eyes wet.  His footsteps again
 startled her, and she turned round.
 
 "I returned for a moment to tell you that the evening is going to be
 fine.  The sun is shining; so do open your curtains and put out those
 lights.  Shall I do it for you?"
 
 "Please--if you don't mind."
 
 He drew back the window-curtains, whereupon the red glow of the lamp
 and the two candle-flames became almost invisible with the flood of
 late autumn sunlight that poured in.  "Shall I come round to you?" he
 asked, her back being towards him.
 
 "No," she replied.
 
 "Why not?"
 
 "Because I am crying, and I don't want to see you."
 
 He stood a moment irresolute, and regretted that he had killed the
 rosy, passionate lamplight by opening the curtains and letting in
 garish day.
 
 "Then I am going," he said.
 
 "Very well," she answered, stretching one hand round to him, and
--**--**--
 was in such a state as no horse could be in by honest riding.  It was
 true that the doctor had stabled her himself when he got home, so that
 she was not looked after as she would have been if he had groomed and
 fed her; but that did not account for the appearance she presented, if
 Mr. Fitzpiers's journey had been only where he had stated.  The
 phenomenal exhaustion of Darling, as thus related, was sufficient to
 develop a whole series of tales about riding witches and demons, the
 narration of which occupied a considerable time.
 
 Grace returned in-doors.  In passing through the outer room she picked
 up her husband's overcoat which he had carelessly flung down across a
 chair.  A turnpike ticket fell out of the breast-pocket, and she saw
 that it had been issued at Middleton Gate.  He had therefore visited
 Middleton the previous night, a distance of at least five-and-thirty
 miles on horseback, there and back.
 
 During the day she made some inquiries, and learned for the first time
 that Mrs. Charmond was staying at Middleton Abbey.  She could not
 resist an inference--strange as that inference was.
 
 A few days later he prepared to start again, at the same time and in
 the same direction.  She knew that the state of the cottager who lived
 that way was a mere pretext; she was quite sure he was going to Mrs.
 Charmond.  Grace was amazed at the mildness of the passion which the
 suspicion engendered in her.  She was but little excited, and her
 jealousy was languid even to death.  It told tales of the nature of her
 affection for him.  In truth, her antenuptial regard for Fitzpiers had
 been rather of the quality of awe towards a superior being than of
 tender solicitude for a lover.  It had been based upon mystery and
--**--**--
 he gradually disappeared.
 
 Thus she had beheld the pet animal purchased for her own use, in pure
 love of her, by one who had always been true, impressed to convey her
 husband away from her to the side of a new-found idol. While she was
 musing on the vicissitudes of horses and wives, she discerned shapes
 moving up the valley towards her, quite near at hand, though till now
 hidden by the hedges.  Surely they were Giles Winterborne, with his two
 horses and cider-apparatus, conducted by Robert Creedle.  Up, upward
 they crept, a stray beam of the sun alighting every now and then like a
 star on the blades of the pomace-shovels, which had been converted to
 steel mirrors by the action of the malic acid.  She opened the gate
 when he came close, and the panting horses rested as they achieved the
 ascent.
 
 "How do you do, Giles?" said she, under a sudden impulse to be familiar
 with him.
 
 He replied with much more reserve.  "You are going for a walk, Mrs.
 Fitzpiers?" he added.  "It is pleasant just now."
 
 "No, I am returning," said she.
 
 The vehicles passed through, the gate slammed, and Winterborne walked
 by her side in the rear of the apple-mill.
 
 He looked and smelt like Autumn's very brother, his face being sunburnt
 to wheat-color, his eyes blue as corn-flowers, his boots and leggings
 dyed with fruit-stains, his hands clammy with the sweet juice of
 apples, his hat sprinkled with pips, and everywhere about him that
 atmosphere of cider which at its first return each season has such an
 indescribable fascination for those who have been born and bred among
 the orchards.  Her heart rose from its late sadness like a released
 spring; her senses revelled in the sudden lapse back to nature
 unadorned.  The consciousness of having to be genteel because of her
--**--**--
 
 As her husband's character thus shaped itself under the touch of time,
 Grace was almost startled to find how little she suffered from that
 jealous excitement which is conventionally attributed to all wives in
 such circumstances.  But though possessed by none of that feline
 wildness which it was her moral duty to experience, she did not fail to
 know that she had made a frightful mistake in her marriage.
 Acquiescence in her father's wishes had been degradation to herself.
 People are not given premonitions for nothing; she should have obeyed
 her impulse on that early morning, and steadfastly refused her hand.
 
 Oh, that plausible tale which her then betrothed had told her about
 Suke--the dramatic account of her entreaties to him to draw the aching
 enemy, and the fine artistic touch he had given to the story by
 explaining that it was a lovely molar without a flaw!
 
 She traced the remainder of the woodland track dazed by the
 complications of her position.  If his protestations to her before
 their marriage could be believed, her husband had felt affection of
 some sort for herself and this woman simultaneously; and was now again
 spreading the same emotion over Mrs. Charmond and herself conjointly,
 his manner being still kind and fond at times. But surely, rather than
 that, he must have played the hypocrite towards her in each case with
 elaborate completeness; and the thought of this sickened her, for it
 involved the conjecture that if he had not loved her, his only motive
 for making her his wife must have been her little fortune.  Yet here
 Grace made a mistake, for the love of men like Fitzpiers is
 unquestionably of such quality as to bear division and transference.
 He had indeed, once declared, though not to her, that on one occasion
--**--**--
 about, the hollow-turner among the rest; he was loading his
 wares--wooden-bowls, dishes, spigots, spoons, cheese-vats, funnels, and
 so on--upon one of her father's wagons, who carried them to the fair
 for him every year out of neighborly kindness.
 
 The scene and the occasion would have enlivened her but that her
 husband was still absent; though it was now five o'clock.  She could
 hardly suppose him, whatever his infatuation, to have prolonged to a
 later hour than ten an ostensibly professional call on Mrs. Charmond at
 Middleton; and he could have ridden home in two hours and a half.
 What, then, had become of him? That he had been out the greater part of
 the two preceding nights added to her uneasiness.
 
 She dressed herself, descended, and went out, the weird twilight of
 advancing day chilling the rays from the lanterns, and making the men's
 faces wan.  As soon as Melbury saw her he came round, showing his alarm.
 
 "Edgar is not come," she said.  "And I have reason to know that he's
 not attending anybody.  He has had no rest for two nights before this.
 I was going to the top of the hill to look for him."
 
 "I'll come with you," said Melbury.
 
 She begged him not to hinder himself; but he insisted, for he saw a
 peculiar and rigid gloom in her face over and above her uneasiness, and
 did not like the look of it.  Telling the men he would be with them
 again soon, he walked beside her into the turnpike-road, and partly up
 the hill whence she had watched Fitzpiers the night before across the
 Great White Hart or Blackmoor Valley.  They halted beneath a half-dead
 oak, hollow, and disfigured with white tumors, its roots spreading out
 like accipitrine claws grasping the ground.  A chilly wind circled
--**--**--
 Something was wrong in the dove-cot.  A ghastly sense that he alone
 would be responsible for whatever unhappiness should be brought upon
 her for whom he almost solely lived, whom to retain under his roof he
 had faced the numerous inconveniences involved in giving up the best
 part of his house to Fitzpiers.  There was no room for doubt that, had
 he allowed events to take their natural course, she would have accepted
 Winterborne, and realized his old dream of restitution to that young
 man's family.
 
 That Fitzpiers could allow himself to look on any other creature for a
 moment than Grace filled Melbury with grief and astonishment.  In the
 pure and simple life he had led it had scarcely occurred to him that
 after marriage a man might be faithless.  That he could sweep to the
 heights of Mrs. Charmond's position, lift the veil of Isis, so to
 speak, would have amazed Melbury by its audacity if he had not
 suspected encouragement from that quarter.  What could he and his
 simple Grace do to countervail the passions of such as those two
 sophisticated beings--versed in the world's ways, armed with every
 apparatus for victory?  In such an encounter the homely timber-dealer
 felt as inferior as a bow-and-arrow savage before the precise weapons
 of modern warfare.
 
 Grace came out of the house as the morning drew on.  The village was
 silent, most of the folk having gone to the fair.  Fitzpiers had
 retired to bed, and was sleeping off his fatigue.  She went to the
 stable and looked at poor Darling: in all probability Giles
 Winterborne, by obtaining for her a horse of such intelligence and
 docility, had been the means of saving her husband's life.  She paused
 over the strange thought; and then there appeared her father behind
--**--**--
 Mrs. Charmond had returned.  But Hintock House scarcely gave forth
 signs of life, so quietly had she reentered it.  He went to church at
 Great Hintock one afternoon as usual, there being no service at the
 smaller village.  A few minutes before his departure, he had casually
 heard Fitzpiers, who was no church-goer, tell his wife that he was
 going to walk in the wood.  Melbury entered the building and sat down
 in his pew; the parson came in, then Mrs. Charmond, then Mr. Fitzpiers.
 
 The service proceeded, and the jealous father was quite sure that a
 mutual consciousness was uninterruptedly maintained between those two;
 he fancied that more than once their eyes met.  At the end, Fitzpiers
 so timed his movement into the aisle that it exactly coincided with
 Felice Charmond's from the opposite side, and they walked out with
 their garments in contact, the surgeon being just that two or three
 inches in her rear which made it convenient for his eyes to rest upon
 her cheek.  The cheek warmed up to a richer tone.
 
 This was a worse feature in the flirtation than he had expected. If she
 had been playing with him in an idle freak the game might soon have
 wearied her; but the smallest germ of passion--and women of the world
 do not change color for nothing--was a threatening development.  The
 mere presence of Fitzpiers in the building, after his statement, was
 wellnigh conclusive as far as he was concerned; but Melbury resolved
 yet to watch.
 
 He had to wait long.  Autumn drew shiveringly to its end.  One day
 something seemed to be gone from the gardens; the tenderer leaves of
 vegetables had shrunk under the first smart frost, and hung like faded
 linen rags; then the forest leaves, which had been descending at
--**--**--
 very tame and let-alone, I am bound to say," he remarked, pointedly.
 
 "I am what I feel, father," she repeated.
 
 He glanced at her, and there returned upon his mind the scene of her
 offering to wed Winterborne instead of Fitzpiers in the last days
 before her marriage; and he asked himself if it could be the fact that
 she loved Winterborne, now that she had lost him, more than she had
 ever done when she was comparatively free to choose him.
 
 "What would you have me do?" she asked, in a low voice.
 
 He recalled his mind from the retrospective pain to the practical
 matter before them.  "I would have you go to Mrs. Charmond," he said.
 
 "Go to Mrs. Charmond--what for?" said she.
 
 "Well--if I must speak plain, dear Grace--to ask her, appeal to her in
 the name of your common womanhood, and your many like sentiments on
 things, not to make unhappiness between you and your husband.  It lies
 with her entirely to do one or the other--that I can see."
 
 Grace's face had heated at her father's words, and the very rustle of
 her skirts upon the box-edging bespoke hauteur.  "I shall not think of
 going to her, father--of course I could not!" she answered.
 
 "Why--don't 'ee want to be happier than you be at present?" said
 Melbury, more moved on her account than she was herself.
 
 "I don't wish to be more humiliated.  If I have anything to bear I can
 bear it in silence."
 
 "But, my dear maid, you are too young--you don't know what the present
 state of things may lead to.  Just see the harm done a'ready! Your
 husband would have gone away to Budmouth to a bigger practice if it had
 not been for this.  Although it has gone such a little way, it is
--**--**--
 "Ah, Giles--you should have been my partner.  You should have been my
 son-in-law," the old man said at last.  "It would have been far better
 for her and for me."
 
 Winterborne saw that something had gone wrong with his former friend,
 and throwing down the switch he was about to interweave, he responded
 only too readily to the mood of the timber-dealer. "Is she ill?" he
 said, hurriedly.
 
 "No, no." Melbury stood without speaking for some minutes, and then, as
 though he could not bring himself to proceed, turned to go away.
 
 Winterborne told one of his men to pack up the tools for the night and
 walked after Melbury.
 
 "Heaven forbid that I should seem too inquisitive, sir," he said,
 "especially since we don't stand as we used to stand to one another;
 but I hope it is well with them all over your way?"
 
 "No," said Melbury--"no."  He stopped, and struck the smooth trunk of a
 young ash-tree with the flat of his hand.  "I would that his ear had
 been where that rind is!" he exclaimed; "I should have treated him to
 little compared wi what he deserves."
 
 "Now," said Winterborne, "don't be in a hurry to go home.  I've put
 some cider down to warm in my shelter here, and we'll sit and drink it
 and talk this over."
 
 Melbury turned unresistingly as Giles took his arm, and they went back
 to where the fire was, and sat down under the screen, the other woodmen
 having gone.  He drew out the cider-mug from the ashes and they drank
 together.
 
 "Giles, you ought to have had her, as I said just now," repeated
 Melbury.  "I'll tell you why for the first time."
 
 He thereupon told Winterborne, as with great relief, the story of how
 he won away Giles's father's chosen one--by nothing worse than a
--**--**--
 Charmond, I have called upon a more serious matter--at least to
 me--than tree-throwing.  And whatever mistakes I make in my manner of
 speaking upon it to you, madam, do me the justice to set 'em down to my
 want of practice, and not to my want of care."
 
 Mrs. Charmond looked ill at ease.  She might have begun to guess his
 meaning; but apart from that, she had such dread of contact with
 anything painful, harsh, or even earnest, that his preliminaries alone
 were enough to distress her.  "Yes, what is it?" she said.
 
 "I am an old man," said Melbury, "whom, somewhat late in life, God
 thought fit to bless with one child, and she a daughter.  Her mother
 was a very dear wife to me, but she was taken away from us when the
 child was young, and the child became precious as the apple of my eye
 to me, for she was all I had left to love.  For her sake entirely I
 married as second wife a homespun woman who had been kind as a mother
 to her.  In due time the question of her education came on, and I said,
 'I will educate the maid well, if I live upon bread to do it.' Of her
 possible marriage I could not bear to think, for it seemed like a death
 that she should cleave to another man, and grow to think his house her
 home rather than mine.  But I saw it was the law of nature that this
 should be, and that it was for the maid's happiness that she should
 have a home when I was gone; and I made up my mind without a murmur to
 help it on for her sake.  In my youth I had wronged my dead friend, and
--**--**--
 mutual embarrassment at each other's presence, they beheld approaching
 the girl a lady in a dark fur mantle and a black hat, having a white
 veil tied picturesquely round it.  She spoke to Marty, who turned and
 courtesied, and the lady fell into conversation with her.  It was Mrs.
 Charmond.
 
 On leaving her house, Mrs. Charmond had walked on and onward under the
 fret and fever of her mind with more vigor than she was accustomed to
 show in her normal moods--a fever which the solace of a cigarette did
 not entirely allay.  Reaching the coppice, she listlessly observed
 Marty at work, threw away her cigarette, and came near.  Chop, chop,
 chop, went Marty's little billhook with never more assiduity, till Mrs.
 Charmond spoke.
 
 "Who is that young lady I see talking to the woodman yonder?" she asked.
 
 "Mrs. Fitzpiers, ma'am," said Marty.
 
 "Oh," said Mrs. Charmond, with something like a start; for she had not
 recognized Grace at that distance.  "And the man she is talking to?"
 
 "That's Mr. Winterborne."
 
 A redness stole into Marty's face as she mentioned Giles's name, which
 Mrs. Charmond did not fail to notice informed her of the state of the
 girl's heart.  "Are you engaged to him?" she asked, softly.
 
 "No, ma'am," said Marty.  "SHE was once; and I think--"
 
 But Marty could not possibly explain the complications of her thoughts
 on this matter--which were nothing less than one of extraordinary
 acuteness for a girl so young and inexperienced--namely, that she saw
 danger to two hearts naturally honest in Grace being thrown back into
 Winterborne's society by the neglect of her husband.  Mrs. Charmond,
 however, with the almost supersensory means to knowledge which women
 have on such occasions, quite understood what Marty had intended to
 convey, and the picture thus exhibited to her of lives drifting away,
--**--**--
 we both know to be in our minds already?"
 
 "Mrs. Fitzpiers, your husband--" The moment that the speaker's tongue
 touched the dangerous subject a vivid look of self-consciousness
 flashed over her, in which her heart revealed, as by a lightning gleam,
 what filled it to overflowing.  So transitory was the expression that
 none but a sensitive woman, and she in Grace's position, would have had
 the power to catch its meaning. Upon her the phase was not lost.
 
 "Then you DO love him!" she exclaimed, in a tone of much surprise.
 
 "What do you mean, my young friend?"
 
 "Why," cried Grace, "I thought till now that you had only been cruelly
 flirting with my husband, to amuse your idle moments--a rich lady with
 a poor professional gentleman whom in her heart she despised not much
 less than her who belongs to him.  But I guess from your manner that
 you love him desperately, and I don't hate you as I did before."
 
 "Yes, indeed," continued Mrs. Fitzpiers, with a trembling tongue,
 "since it is not playing in your case at all, but REAL.  Oh, I do pity
 you, more than I despise you, for you will s-s-suffer most!"
 
 Mrs. Charmond was now as much agitated as Grace.  "I ought not to allow
 myself to argue with you," she exclaimed.  "I demean myself by doing
 it.  But I liked you once, and for the sake of that time I try to tell
 you how mistaken you are!" Much of her confusion resulted from her
 wonder and alarm at finding herself in a sense dominated mentally and
 emotionally by this simple school-girl.  "I do not love him," she went
 on, with desperate untruth.  "It was a kindness--my making somewhat
 more of him than one usually does of one's doctor.  I was lonely; I
--**--**--
 
 They dragged themselves onward, turned into the lane, passed the track
 to Little Hintock, and so reached the park.
 
 "Here I turn back," said Grace, in the same passionless voice. "You are
 quite near home."
 
 Mrs. Charmond stood inert, seeming appalled by her late admission.
 
 "I have told you something in a moment of irresistible desire to
 unburden my soul which all but a fool would have kept silent as the
 grave," she said.  "I cannot help it now.  Is it to be a secret--or do
 you mean war?"
 
 "A secret, certainly," said Grace, mournfully.  "How can you expect war
 from such a helpless, wretched being as I!"
 
 "And I'll do my best not to see him.  I am his slave; but I'll try."
 
 Grace was naturally kind; but she could not help using a small dagger
 now.
 
 "Pray don't distress yourself," she said, with exquisitely fine scorn.
 "You may keep him--for me." Had she been wounded instead of mortified
 she could not have used the words; but Fitzpiers's hold upon her heart
 was slight.
 
 They parted thus and there, and Grace went moodily homeward. Passing
 Marty's cottage she observed through the window that the girl was
 writing instead of chopping as usual, and wondered what her
 correspondence could be.  Directly afterwards she met people in search
 of her, and reached the house to find all in serious alarm.  She soon
 explained that she had lost her way, and her general depression was
 attributed to exhaustion on that account.
 
 Could she have known what Marty was writing she would have been
 surprised.
 
 The rumor which agitated the other folk of Hintock had reached the
 young girl, and she was penning a letter to Fitzpiers, to tell him that
 Mrs. Charmond wore her hair.  It was poor Marty's only card, and she
--**--**--
 at which Grammer reared herself upon her knees and held the fuel
 suspended in her hand, while Fitzpiers half opened the casement.
 
 "She is off to foreign lands again at last--hev made up her mind quite
 sudden-like--and it is thoughted she'll leave in a day or two.  She's
 been all as if her mind were low for some days past--with a sort of
 sorrow in her face, as if she reproached her own soul.  She's the wrong
 sort of woman for Hintock--hardly knowing a beech from a woak--that I
 own.  But I don't care who the man is, she's been a very kind friend to
 me.
 
 "Well, the day after to-morrow is the Sabbath day, and without charity
 we are but tinkling simples; but this I do say, that her going will be
 a blessed thing for a certain married couple who remain."
 
 The fire was lighted, and Fitzpiers sat down in front of it, restless
 as the last leaf upon a tree.  "A sort of sorrow in her face, as if she
 reproached her own soul." Poor Felice.  How Felice's frame must be
 pulsing under the conditions of which he had just heard the caricature;
 how her fair temples must ache; what a mood of wretchedness she must be
 in! But for the mixing up of his name with hers, and her determination
 to sunder their too close acquaintance on that account, she would
 probably have sent for him professionally. She was now sitting alone,
 suffering, perhaps wishing that she had not forbidden him to come again.
 
 Unable to remain in this lonely room any longer, or to wait for the
 meal which was in course of preparation, he made himself ready for
 riding, descended to the yard, stood by the stable-door while Darling
 was being saddled, and rode off down the lane.  He would have preferred
--**--**--
 suspected.  It occurred to him, too, that even if his suspicion were
 justified, his abrupt, if not unwarrantable, entry into the house might
 end in confounding its inhabitant at the expense of his daughter's
 dignity and his own. Any ill result would be pretty sure to hit Grace
 hardest in the long-run.  He would, after all, adopt the more rational
 course, and plead with Fitzpiers privately, as he had pleaded with Mrs.
 Charmond.
 
 He accordingly retreated as silently as he had come.  Passing the door
 of the drawing-room anew, he fancied that he heard a noise within which
 was not the crackling of the fire.  Melbury gently reopened the door to
 a distance of a few inches, and saw at the opposite window two figures
 in the act of stepping out--a man and a woman--in whom he recognized
 the lady of the house and his son-in-law.  In a moment they had
 disappeared amid the gloom of the lawn.
 
 He returned into the hall, and let himself out by the carriage-entrance
 door, coming round to the lawn front in time to see the two figures
 parting at the railing which divided the precincts of the house from
 the open park.  Mrs. Charmond turned to hasten back immediately that
 Fitzpiers had left her side, and he was speedily absorbed into the
 duskiness of the trees.
 
 Melbury waited till Mrs. Charmond had re-entered the drawing-room, and
 then followed after Fitzpiers, thinking that he would allow the latter
 to mount and ride ahead a little way before overtaking him and giving
 him a piece of his mind.  His son-in-law might possibly see the second
 horse near his own; but that would do him no harm, and might prepare
 him for what he was to expect.
 
 The event, however, was different from the plan.  On plunging into the
--**--**--
 into a sitting posture, and found that he was a little stunned and
 stupefied, but, as he had said, not otherwise hurt.  How this fall had
 come about was readily conjecturable: Fitzpiers, imagining there was
 only old Darling under him, had been taken unawares by the younger
 horse's sprightliness.
 
 Melbury was a traveller of the old-fashioned sort; having just come
 from Shottsford-Forum, he still had in his pocket the pilgrim's flask
 of rum which he always carried on journeys exceeding a dozen miles,
 though he seldom drank much of it.  He poured it down the surgeon's
 throat, with such effect that he quickly revived.  Melbury got him on
 his legs; but the question was what to do with him.  He could not walk
 more than a few steps, and the other horse had gone away.
 
 With great exertion Melbury contrived to get him astride Darling,
 mounting himself behind, and holding Fitzpiers round his waist with one
 arm.  Darling being broad, straight-backed, and high in the withers,
 was well able to carry double, at any rate as far as Hintock, and at a
 gentle pace.
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXXV.
 
 The mare paced along with firm and cautious tread through the copse
 where Winterborne had worked, and into the heavier soil where the oaks
 grew; past Great Willy, the largest oak in the wood, and thence towards
 Nellcombe Bottom, intensely dark now with overgrowth, and popularly
 supposed to be haunted by the spirits of the fratricides exorcised from
 Hintock House.
 
 By this time Fitzpiers was quite recovered as to physical strength.
 But he had eaten nothing since making a hasty breakfast in London that
 morning, his anxiety about Felice having hurried him away from home
 before dining; as a consequence, the old rum administered by his
 father-in-law flew to the young man's head and loosened his tongue,
--**--**--
 stairs a woman whom at first she did not recognize, till her voice
 revealed her to be Suke Damson, in great fright and sorrow.  A streak
 of light from the partially closed door of Grace's room fell upon her
 face as she came forward, and it was drawn and pale.
 
 "Oh, Miss Melbury--I would say Mrs. Fitzpiers," she said, wringing her
 hands.  "This terrible news.  Is he dead? Is he hurted very bad? Tell
 me; I couldn't help coming; please forgive me, Miss Melbury--Mrs.
 Fitzpiers I would say!"
 
 Grace sank down on the oak chest which stood on the landing, and put
 her hands to her now flushed face and head.  Could she order Suke
 Damson down-stairs and out of the house? Her husband might be brought
 in at any moment, and what would happen? But could she order this
 genuinely grieved woman away?
 
 There was a dead silence of half a minute or so, till Suke said, "Why
 don't ye speak? Is he here? Is he dead? If so, why can't I see
 him--would it be so very wrong?"
 
 Before Grace had answered somebody else came to the door below--a
 foot-fall light as a roe's.  There was a hurried tapping upon the
 panel, as if with the impatient tips of fingers whose owner thought not
 whether a knocker were there or no.  Without a pause, and possibly
 guided by the stray beam of light on the landing, the newcomer ascended
 the staircase as the first had done.  Grace was sufficiently visible,
 and the lady, for a lady it was, came to her side.
 
 "I could make nobody hear down-stairs," said Felice Charmond, with lips
 whose dryness could almost be heard, and panting, as she stood like one
 ready to sink on the floor with distress.  "What is--the matter--tell
--**--**--
 her mood.  A tenderness spread over Grace like a dew.  It was well,
 very well, conventionally, to address either one of them in the wife's
 regulation terms of virtuous sarcasm, as woman, creature, or thing, for
 losing their hearts to her husband.  But life, what was it, and who was
 she?  She had, like the singer of the psalm of Asaph, been plagued and
 chastened all the day long; but could she, by retributive words, in
 order to please herself--the individual--"offend against the
 generation," as he would not?
 
 "He is dying, perhaps," blubbered Suke Damson, putting her apron to her
 eyes.
 
 In their gestures and faces there were anxieties, affection, agony of
 heart, all for a man who had wronged them--had never really behaved
 towards either of them anyhow but selfishly.  Neither one but would
 have wellnigh sacrificed half her life to him, even now. The tears
 which his possibly critical situation could not bring to her eyes
 surged over at the contemplation of these fellow-women. She turned to
 the balustrade, bent herself upon it, and wept.
 
 Thereupon Felice began to cry also, without using her handkerchief, and
 letting the tears run down silently.  While these three poor women
 stood together thus, pitying another though most to be pitied
 themselves, the pacing of a horse or horses became audible in the
 court, and in a moment Melbury's voice was heard calling to his
 stableman.  Grace at once started up, ran down the stairs and out into
 the quadrangle as her father crossed it towards the door.  "Father,
 what is the matter with him?" she cried.
 
 "Who--Edgar?" said Melbury, abruptly.  "Matter? Nothing.  What, my
 dear, and have you got home safe? Why, you are better already! But you
 ought not to be out in the air like this."
 
 "But he has been thrown off his horse!"
--**--**--
 
 Gabriel's features adhered throughout their form so exactly to the
 middle line between the beauty of St. John and the ugliness of Judas
 Iscariot, as represented in a window of the church he attended, that
 not a single lineament could be selected and called worthy either of
 distinction or notoriety.  The red-jacketed and dark-haired maiden
 seemed to think so too, for she carelessly glanced over him, and told
 her man to drive on.  She might have looked her thanks to Gabriel on
 a minute scale, but she did not speak them; more probably she felt
 none, for in gaining her a passage he had lost her her point, and we
 know how women take a favour of that kind.
 
 The gatekeeper surveyed the retreating vehicle.  "That's a
 handsome maid," he said to Oak.
 
 "But she has her faults," said Gabriel.
 
 "True, farmer."
 
 "And the greatest of them is--well, what it is always."
 
 "Beating people down? ay, 'tis so."
 
 "O no."
 
 "What, then?"
 
 Gabriel, perhaps a little piqued by the comely traveller's
 indifference, glanced back to where he had witnessed her performance
 over the hedge, and said, "Vanity."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II
 
 
 NIGHT--THE FLOCK--AN INTERIOR--ANOTHER INTERIOR
 
 
 It was nearly midnight on the eve of St. Thomas's, the shortest day
 in the year.  A desolating wind wandered from the north over the hill
 whereon Oak had watched the yellow waggon and its occupant in the
 sunshine of a few days earlier.
 
 Norcombe Hill--not far from lonely Toller-Down--was one of the spots
 which suggest to a passer-by that he is in the presence of a shape
 approaching the indestructible as nearly as any to be found on
 earth.  It was a featureless convexity of chalk and soil--an ordinary
 specimen of those smoothly-outlined protuberances of the globe which
 may remain undisturbed on some great day of confusion, when far
--**--**--
 to attach either meaning or use.
 
 The image as a whole was that of a small Noah's Ark on a small
 Ararat, allowing the traditionary outlines and general form of
 the Ark which are followed by toy-makers--and by these means are
 established in men's imaginations among their firmest, because
 earliest impressions--to pass as an approximate pattern.  The hut
 stood on little wheels, which raised its floor about a foot from the
 ground.  Such shepherds' huts are dragged into the fields when the
 lambing season comes on, to shelter the shepherd in his enforced
 nightly attendance.
 
 It was only latterly that people had begun to call Gabriel "Farmer"
 Oak.  During the twelvemonth preceding this time he had been enabled
 by sustained efforts of industry and chronic good spirits to lease
 the small sheep-farm of which Norcombe Hill was a portion, and stock
 it with two hundred sheep.  Previously he had been a bailiff for a
 short time, and earlier still a shepherd only, having from his
 childhood assisted his father in tending the flocks of large
 proprietors, till old Gabriel sank to rest.
 
 This venture, unaided and alone, into the paths of farming as master
 and not as man, with an advance of sheep not yet paid for, was a
 critical juncture with Gabriel Oak, and he recognised his position
 clearly.  The first movement in his new progress was the lambing of
 his ewes, and sheep having been his speciality from his youth, he
 wisely refrained from deputing the task of tending them at this
 season to a hireling or a novice.
 
 The wind continued to beat about the corners of the hut, but the
 flute-playing ceased.  A rectangular space of light appeared in the
 side of the hut, and in the opening the outline of Farmer Oak's
 figure.  He carried a lantern in his hand, and closing the door
--**--**--
 Being a man not without a frequent consciousness that there was some
 charm in this life he led, he stood still after looking at the sky
 as a useful instrument, and regarded it in an appreciative spirit,
 as a work of art superlatively beautiful.  For a moment he seemed
 impressed with the speaking loneliness of the scene, or rather with
 the complete abstraction from all its compass of the sights and
 sounds of man.  Human shapes, interferences, troubles, and joys
 were all as if they were not, and there seemed to be on the shaded
 hemisphere of the globe no sentient being save himself; he could
 fancy them all gone round to the sunny side.
 
 Occupied thus, with eyes stretched afar, Oak gradually perceived
 that what he had previously taken to be a star low down behind the
 outskirts of the plantation was in reality no such thing.  It was an
 artificial light, almost close at hand.
 
 To find themselves utterly alone at night where company is desirable
 and expected makes some people fearful; but a case more trying by
 far to the nerves is to discover some mysterious companionship when
 intuition, sensation, memory, analogy, testimony, probability,
 induction--every kind of evidence in the logician's list--have united
 to persuade consciousness that it is quite in isolation.
 
 Farmer Oak went towards the plantation and pushed through its lower
 boughs to the windy side.  A dim mass under the slope reminded him
 that a shed occupied a place here, the site being a cutting into the
 slope of the hill, so that at its back part the roof was almost level
 with the ground.  In front it was formed of board nailed to posts and
 covered with tar as a preservative.  Through crevices in the roof and
 side spread streaks and dots of light, a combination of which made
--**--**--
 his work.
 
 Five mornings and evenings passed.  The young woman came regularly to
 milk the healthy cow or to attend to the sick one, but never allowed
 her vision to stray in the direction of Oak's person.  His want of
 tact had deeply offended her--not by seeing what he could not help,
 but by letting her know that he had seen it.  For, as without law
 there is no sin, without eyes there is no indecorum; and she appeared
 to feel that Gabriel's espial had made her an indecorous woman
 without her own connivance.  It was food for great regret with him;
 it was also a _contretemps_ which touched into life a latent heat he
 had experienced in that direction.
 
 The acquaintanceship might, however, have ended in a slow forgetting,
 but for an incident which occurred at the end of the same week.  One
 afternoon it began to freeze, and the frost increased with evening,
 which drew on like a stealthy tightening of bonds.  It was a time
 when in cottages the breath of the sleepers freezes to the sheets;
 when round the drawing-room fire of a thick-walled mansion the
 sitters' backs are cold, even whilst their faces are all aglow.  Many
 a small bird went to bed supperless that night among the bare boughs.
 
 As the milking-hour drew near, Oak kept his usual watch upon the
 cowshed.  At last he felt cold, and shaking an extra quantity of
 bedding round the yearling ewes he entered the hut and heaped more
 fuel upon the stove.  The wind came in at the bottom of the door,
 and to prevent it Oak laid a sack there and wheeled the cot round a
 little more to the south.  Then the wind spouted in at a ventilating
 hole--of which there was one on each side of the hut.
--**--**--
 hand again.
 
 Oak held it longer this time--indeed, curiously long.  "How soft it
 is--being winter time, too--not chapped or rough or anything!" he
 said.
 
 "There--that's long enough," said she, though without pulling it
 away. "But I suppose you are thinking you would like to kiss it?  You
 may if you want to."
 
 "I wasn't thinking of any such thing," said Gabriel, simply; "but I
 will--"
 
 "That you won't!" She snatched back her hand.
 
 Gabriel felt himself guilty of another want of tact.
 
 "Now find out my name," she said, teasingly; and withdrew.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV
 
 
 GABRIEL'S RESOLVE--THE VISIT--THE MISTAKE
 
 
 The only superiority in women that is tolerable to the rival sex is,
 as a rule, that of the unconscious kind; but a superiority which
 recognizes itself may sometimes please by suggesting possibilities
 of capture to the subordinated man.
 
 This well-favoured and comely girl soon made appreciable inroads upon
 the emotional constitution of young Farmer Oak.
 
 Love, being an extremely exacting usurer (a sense of exorbitant
 profit, spiritually, by an exchange of hearts, being at the bottom of
 pure passions, as that of exorbitant profit, bodily or materially,
 is at the bottom of those of lower atmosphere), every morning Oak's
 feelings were as sensitive as the money-market in calculations upon
 his chances.  His dog waited for his meals in a way so like that in
 which Oak waited for the girl's presence, that the farmer was quite
 struck with the resemblance, felt it lowering, and would not look at
 the dog.  However, he continued to watch through the hedge for her
 regular coming, and thus his sentiments towards her were deepened
 without any corresponding effect being produced upon herself.  Oak
 had nothing finished and ready to say as yet, and not being able to
 frame love phrases which end where they begin; passionate tales--
--**--**--
 getting to have pianos now--and I'll practise up the flute right well
 to play with you in the evenings."
 
 "Yes; I should like that."
 
 "And have one of those little ten-pound gigs for market--and nice
 flowers, and birds--cocks and hens I mean, because they be useful,"
 continued Gabriel, feeling balanced between poetry and practicality.
 
 "I should like it very much."
 
 "And a frame for cucumbers--like a gentleman and lady."
 
 "Yes."
 
 "And when the wedding was over, we'd have it put in the newspaper
 list of marriages."
 
 "Dearly I should like that!"
 
 "And the babies in the births--every man jack of 'em!  And at home by
 the fire, whenever you look up, there I shall be--and whenever I look
 up there will be you."
 
 "Wait, wait, and don't be improper!"
 
 Her countenance fell, and she was silent awhile.  He regarded the red
 berries between them over and over again, to such an extent, that
 holly seemed in his after life to be a cypher signifying a proposal
 of marriage.  Bathsheba decisively turned to him.
 
 "No; 'tis no use," she said.  "I don't want to marry you."
 
 "Try."
 
 "I have tried hard all the time I've been thinking; for a marriage
 would be very nice in one sense.  People would talk about me, and
 think I had won my battle, and I should feel triumphant, and all
 that, But a husband--"
 
 "Well!"
 
 "Why, he'd always be there, as you say; whenever I looked up, there
 he'd be."
 
 "Of course he would--I, that is."
 
 "Well, what I mean is that I shouldn't mind being a bride at a
 wedding, if I could be one without having a husband.  But since a
 woman can't show off in that way by herself, I shan't marry--at least
 yet."
 
 "That's a terrible wooden story!"
 
 At this criticism of her statement Bathsheba made an addition to her
--**--**--
 and over it hung the attenuated skeleton of a chrome-yellow moon
 which had only a few days to last--the morning star dogging her on
 the left hand.  The pool glittered like a dead man's eye, and as the
 world awoke a breeze blew, shaking and elongating the reflection of
 the moon without breaking it, and turning the image of the star to a
 phosphoric streak upon the water.  All this Oak saw and remembered.
 
 As far as could be learnt it appeared that the poor young dog, still
 under the impression that since he was kept for running after sheep,
 the more he ran after them the better, had at the end of his meal
 off the dead lamb, which may have given him additional energy and
 spirits, collected all the ewes into a corner, driven the timid
 creatures through the hedge, across the upper field, and by main
 force of worrying had given them momentum enough to break down a
 portion of the rotten railing, and so hurled them over the edge.
 
 George's son had done his work so thoroughly that he was considered
 too good a workman to live, and was, in fact, taken and tragically
 shot at twelve o'clock that same day--another instance of the
 untoward fate which so often attends dogs and other philosophers
 who follow out a train of reasoning to its logical conclusion, and
 attempt perfectly consistent conduct in a world made up so largely
 of compromise.
 
 Gabriel's farm had been stocked by a dealer--on the strength of Oak's
 promising look and character--who was receiving a percentage from the
 farmer till such time as the advance should be cleared off. Oak found
 that the value of stock, plant, and implements which were really his
 own would be about sufficient to pay his debts, leaving himself a
--**--**--
 hands he had fallen.
 
 Two figures were dimly visible in front, sitting with their legs
 outside the waggon, one of whom was driving.  Gabriel soon found that
 this was the waggoner, and it appeared they had come from
 Casterbridge fair, like himself.
 
 A conversation was in progress, which continued thus:--
 
 "Be as 'twill, she's a fine handsome body as far's looks be
 concerned.  But that's only the skin of the woman, and these dandy
 cattle be as proud as a lucifer in their insides."
 
 "Ay--so 'a do seem, Billy Smallbury--so 'a do seem."  This utterance
 was very shaky by nature, and more so by circumstance, the jolting of
 the waggon not being without its effect upon the speaker's larynx.
 It came from the man who held the reins.
 
 "She's a very vain feymell--so 'tis said here and there."
 
 "Ah, now.  If so be 'tis like that, I can't look her in the face.
 Lord, no: not I--heh-heh-heh!  Such a shy man as I be!"
 
 "Yes--she's very vain.  'Tis said that every night at going to bed
 she looks in the glass to put on her night-cap properly."
 
 "And not a married woman.  Oh, the world!"
 
 "And 'a can play the peanner, so 'tis said.  Can play so clever that
 'a can make a psalm tune sound as well as the merriest loose song a
 man can wish for."
 
 "D'ye tell o't!  A happy time for us, and I feel quite a new man!
 And how do she pay?"
 
 "That I don't know, Master Poorgrass."
 
 On hearing these and other similar remarks, a wild thought flashed
 into Gabriel's mind that they might be speaking of Bathsheba.  There
 were, however, no grounds for retaining such a supposition, for the
 waggon, though going in the direction of Weatherbury, might be going
 beyond it, and the woman alluded to seemed to be the mistress of some
--**--**--
 Maryann stalked off towards the rick and met Oak at the foot of the
 ladder.  She delivered her message.
 
 "Where is your master the farmer?" asked Gabriel, kindling with the
 idea of getting employment that seemed to strike him now.
 
 "'Tisn't a master; 'tis a mistress, shepherd."
 
 "A woman farmer?"
 
 "Ay, 'a b'lieve, and a rich one too!" said a bystander. "Lately
 'a came here from a distance.  Took on her uncle's farm, who died
 suddenly.  Used to measure his money in half-pint cups.  They say
 now that she've business in every bank in Casterbridge, and thinks
 no more of playing pitch-and-toss sovereign than you and I, do
 pitch-halfpenny--not a bit in the world, shepherd."
 
 "That's she, back there upon the pony," said Maryann; "wi' her face
 a-covered up in that black cloth with holes in it."
 
 Oak, his features smudged, grimy, and undiscoverable from the smoke
 and heat, his smock-frock burnt into holes and dripping with water,
 the ash stem of his sheep-crook charred six inches shorter, advanced
 with the humility stern adversity had thrust upon him up to the
 slight female form in the saddle.  He lifted his hat with respect,
 and not without gallantry: stepping close to her hanging feet he said
 in a hesitating voice,--
 
 "Do you happen to want a shepherd, ma'am?"
 
 She lifted the wool veil tied round her face, and looked all
 astonishment.  Gabriel and his cold-hearted darling, Bathsheba
 Everdene, were face to face.
 
 Bathsheba did not speak, and he mechanically repeated in an abashed
 and sad voice,--
 
 "Do you want a shepherd, ma'am?"
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII
 
 
 RECOGNITION--A TIMID GIRL
 
 
 Bathsheba withdrew into the shade.  She scarcely knew whether most to
 be amused at the singularity of the meeting, or to be concerned at
 its awkwardness.  There was room for a little pity, also for a very
--**--**--
 Jacob there and your father were sworn brothers--that they were
 sure--weren't ye, Jacob?"
 
 "Ay, sure," said his son, a young man about sixty-five, with a
 semi-bald head and one tooth in the left centre of his upper jaw,
 which made much of itself by standing prominent, like a milestone in
 a bank.  "But 'twas Joe had most to do with him.  However, my son
 William must have knowed the very man afore us--didn't ye, Billy,
 afore ye left Norcombe?"
 
 "No, 'twas Andrew," said Jacob's son Billy, a child of forty, or
 thereabouts, who manifested the peculiarity of possessing a cheerful
 soul in a gloomy body, and whose whiskers were assuming a chinchilla
 shade here and there.
 
 "I can mind Andrew," said Oak, "as being a man in the place when I
 was quite a child."
 
 "Ay--the other day I and my youngest daughter, Liddy, were over at
 my grandson's christening," continued Billy.  "We were talking about
 this very family, and 'twas only last Purification Day in this very
 world, when the use-money is gied away to the second-best poor folk,
 you know, shepherd, and I can mind the day because they all had to
 traypse up to the vestry--yes, this very man's family."
 
 "Come, shepherd, and drink.  'Tis gape and swaller with us--a drap of
 sommit, but not of much account," said the maltster, removing from
 the fire his eyes, which were vermilion-red and bleared by gazing
 into it for so many years.  "Take up the God-forgive-me, Jacob.  See
 if 'tis warm, Jacob."
 
 Jacob stooped to the God-forgive-me, which was a two-handled tall mug
 standing in the ashes, cracked and charred with heat: it was rather
 furred with extraneous matter about the outside, especially in the
 crevices of the handles, the innermost curves of which may not have
 seen daylight for several years by reason of this encrustation
--**--**--
 Henry did not refuse.  He was a man of more than middle age, with
 eyebrows high up in his forehead, who laid it down that the law of
 the world was bad, with a long-suffering look through his listeners
 at the world alluded to, as it presented itself to his imagination.
 He always signed his name "Henery"--strenuously insisting upon that
 spelling, and if any passing schoolmaster ventured to remark that the
 second "e" was superfluous and old-fashioned, he received the reply
 that "H-e-n-e-r-y" was the name he was christened and the name he
 would stick to--in the tone of one to whom orthographical differences
 were matters which had a great deal to do with personal character.
 
 Mr. Jan Coggan, who had passed the cup to Henery, was a crimson man
 with a spacious countenance and private glimmer in his eye, whose
 name had appeared on the marriage register of Weatherbury and
 neighbouring parishes as best man and chief witness in countless
 unions of the previous twenty years; he also very frequently filled
 the post of head godfather in baptisms of the subtly-jovial kind.
 
 "Come, Mark Clark--come.  Ther's plenty more in the barrel," said
 Jan.
 
 "Ay--that I will, 'tis my only doctor," replied Mr. Clark, who,
 twenty years younger than Jan Coggan, revolved in the same orbit.  He
 secreted mirth on all occasions for special discharge at popular
 parties.
 
 "Why, Joseph Poorgrass, ye han't had a drop!" said Mr. Coggan to a
 self-conscious man in the background, thrusting the cup towards him.
 
 "Such a modest man as he is!" said Jacob Smallbury.  "Why, ye've
 hardly had strength of eye enough to look in our young mis'ess's
 face, so I hear, Joseph?"
 
 All looked at Joseph Poorgrass with pitying reproach.
 
 "No--I've hardly looked at her at all," simpered Joseph, reducing his
--**--**--
 
 "Oh, 'tis true enough.  I knowed the man and woman both well.  Levi
 Everdene--that was the man's name, sure.  'Man,' saith I in my
 hurry, but he were of a higher circle of life than that--'a was a
 gentleman-tailor really, worth scores of pounds.  And he became a
 very celebrated bankrupt two or three times."
 
 "Oh, I thought he was quite a common man!" said Joseph.
 
 "Oh no, no!  That man failed for heaps of money; hundreds in gold and
 silver."
 
 The maltster being rather short of breath, Mr. Coggan, after absently
 scrutinising a coal which had fallen among the ashes, took up the
 narrative, with a private twirl of his eye:--
 
 "Well, now, you'd hardly believe it, but that man--our Miss
 Everdene's father--was one of the ficklest husbands alive, after a
 while.  Understand? 'a didn't want to be fickle, but he couldn't help
 it.  The pore feller were faithful and true enough to her in his
 wish, but his heart would rove, do what he would.  He spoke to me in
 real tribulation about it once.  'Coggan,' he said, 'I could never
 wish for a handsomer woman than I've got, but feeling she's ticketed
 as my lawful wife, I can't help my wicked heart wandering, do what I
 will.'  But at last I believe he cured it by making her take off her
 wedding-ring and calling her by her maiden name as they sat together
 after the shop was shut, and so 'a would get to fancy she was only
 his sweetheart, and not married to him at all.  And as soon as he
 could thoroughly fancy he was doing wrong and committing the seventh,
 'a got to like her as well as ever, and they lived on a perfect
 picture of mutel love."
 
 "Well, 'twas a most ungodly remedy," murmured Joseph Poorgrass; "but
--**--**--
 "New Lords new laws, as the saying is, I suppose," remarked Coggan.
 
 "Ay, 'a b'lieve--ha, ha!" said Susan Tall's husband, in a tone
 intended to imply his habitual reception of jokes without minding
 them at all.  The young man then wished them good-night and withdrew.
 
 Henery Fray was the first to follow.  Then Gabriel arose and went off
 with Jan Coggan, who had offered him a lodging.  A few minutes later,
 when the remaining ones were on their legs and about to depart, Fray
 came back again in a hurry.  Flourishing his finger ominously he
 threw a gaze teeming with tidings just where his eye alighted by
 accident, which happened to be in Joseph Poorgrass's face.
 
 "O--what's the matter, what's the matter, Henery?" said Joseph,
 starting back.
 
 "What's a-brewing, Henrey?" asked Jacob and Mark Clark.
 
 "Baily Pennyways--Baily Pennyways--I said so; yes, I said so!"
 
 "What, found out stealing anything?"
 
 "Stealing it is.  The news is, that after Miss Everdene got home she
 went out again to see all was safe, as she usually do, and coming in
 found Baily Pennyways creeping down the granary steps with half a a
 bushel of barley.  She fleed at him like a cat--never such a tomboy
 as she is--of course I speak with closed doors?"
 
 "You do--you do, Henery."
 
 "She fleed at him, and, to cut a long story short, he owned to having
 carried off five sack altogether, upon her promising not to persecute
 him.  Well, he's turned out neck and crop, and my question is, who's
 going to be baily now?"
 
 The question was such a profound one that Henery was obliged to drink
 there and then from the large cup till the bottom was distinctly
 visible inside.  Before he had replaced it on the table, in came the
 young man, Susan Tall's husband, in a still greater hurry.
--**--**--
 The argument was unanswerable after a glance at Maryann.
 
 "Liddy--you must," said Bathsheba.
 
 Liddy held up her hands and arms, coated with dust from the rubbish
 they were sorting, and looked imploringly at her mistress.
 
 "There--Mrs. Coggan is going!" said Bathsheba, exhaling her relief
 in the form of a long breath which had lain in her bosom a minute or
 more.
 
 The door opened, and a deep voice said--
 
 "Is Miss Everdene at home?"
 
 "I'll see, sir," said Mrs. Coggan, and in a minute appeared in the
 room.
 
 "Dear, what a thirtover place this world is!" continued Mrs. Coggan
 (a wholesome-looking lady who had a voice for each class of remark
 according to the emotion involved; who could toss a pancake or twirl
 a mop with the accuracy of pure mathematics, and who at this moment
 showed hands shaggy with fragments of dough and arms encrusted with
 flour).  "I am never up to my elbows, Miss, in making a pudding but
 one of two things do happen--either my nose must needs begin
 tickling, and I can't live without scratching it, or somebody knocks
 at the door.  Here's Mr. Boldwood wanting to see you, Miss Everdene."
 
 A woman's dress being a part of her countenance, and any disorder in
 the one being of the same nature with a malformation or wound in the
 other, Bathsheba said at once--
 
 "I can't see him in this state.  Whatever shall I do?"
 
 Not-at-homes were hardly naturalized in Weatherbury farmhouses, so
 Liddy suggested--"Say you're a fright with dust, and can't come
 down."
 
 "Yes--that sounds very well," said Mrs. Coggan, critically.
 
 "Say I can't see him--that will do."
 
 Mrs. Coggan went downstairs, and returned the answer as requested,
 adding, however, on her own responsibility, "Miss is dusting bottles,
 sir, and is quite a object--that's why 'tis."
--**--**--
 
 The men breathed an audible breath of amazement.
 
 "The next matter is, have you heard anything of Fanny?"
 
 "Nothing, ma'am."
 
 "Have you done anything?"
 
 "I met Farmer Boldwood," said Jacob Smallbury, "and I went with him
 and two of his men, and dragged Newmill Pond, but we found nothing."
 
 "And the new shepherd have been to Buck's Head, by Yalbury, thinking
 she had gone there, but nobody had seed her," said Laban Tall.
 
 "Hasn't William Smallbury been to Casterbridge?"
 
 "Yes, ma'am, but he's not yet come home.  He promised to be back by
 six."
 
 "It wants a quarter to six at present," said Bathsheba, looking at
 her watch.  "I daresay he'll be in directly.  Well, now then"--she
 looked into the book--"Joseph Poorgrass, are you there?"
 
 "Yes, sir--ma'am I mane," said the person addressed.  "I be the
 personal name of Poorgrass."
 
 "And what are you?"
 
 "Nothing in my own eye.  In the eye of other people--well, I don't
 say it; though public thought will out."
 
 "What do you do on the farm?"
 
 "I do do carting things all the year, and in seed time I shoots the
 rooks and sparrows, and helps at pig-killing, sir."
 
 "How much to you?"
 
 "Please nine and ninepence and a good halfpenny where 'twas a bad
 one, sir--ma'am I mane."
 
 "Quite correct.  Now here are ten shillings in addition as a small
 present, as I am a new comer."
 
 Bathsheba blushed slightly at the sense of being generous in public,
 and Henery Fray, who had drawn up towards her chair, lifted his
 eyebrows and fingers to express amazement on a small scale.
 
 "How much do I owe you--that man in the corner--what's your name?"
 continued Bathsheba.
 
 "Matthew Moon, ma'am," said a singular framework of clothes with
 nothing of any consequence inside them, which advanced with the toes
--**--**--
 "Oh mem--don't ask me!  Yielding women--as scarlet a pair as ever
 was!" groaned Henery under his breath.
 
 "Sit down."
 
 "Who, mem?"
 
 "Sit down."
 
 Joseph Poorgrass, in the background twitched, and his lips became
 dry with fear of some terrible consequences, as he saw Bathsheba
 summarily speaking, and Henery slinking off to a corner.
 
 "Now the next.  Laban Tall, you'll stay on working for me?"
 
 "For you or anybody that pays me well, ma'am," replied the young
 married man.
 
 "True--the man must live!" said a woman in the back quarter, who had
 just entered with clicking pattens.
 
 "What woman is that?" Bathsheba asked.
 
 "I be his lawful wife!" continued the voice with greater prominence
 of manner and tone.  This lady called herself five-and-twenty, looked
 thirty, passed as thirty-five, and was forty.  She was a woman who
 never, like some newly married, showed conjugal tenderness in public,
 perhaps because she had none to show.
 
 "Oh, you are," said Bathsheba.  "Well, Laban, will you stay on?"
 
 "Yes, he'll stay, ma'am!" said again the shrill tongue of Laban's
 lawful wife.
 
 "Well, he can speak for himself, I suppose."
 
 "Oh Lord, not he, ma'am!  A simple tool.  Well enough, but a poor
 gawkhammer mortal," the wife replied.
 
 "Heh-heh-heh!" laughed the married man with a hideous effort of
 appreciation, for he was as irrepressibly good-humoured under ghastly
 snubs as a parliamentary candidate on the hustings.
 
 The names remaining were called in the same manner.
 
 "Now I think I have done with you," said Bathsheba, closing the book
 and shaking back a stray twine of hair.  "Has William Smallbury
 returned?"
 
 "No, ma'am."
 
 "The new shepherd will want a man under him," suggested Henery Fray,
 trying to make himself official again by a sideway approach towards
 her chair.
 
 "Oh--he will.  Who can he have?"
 
 "Young Cain Ball is a very good lad," Henery said, "and Shepherd Oak
--**--**--
 imbecility as was shown here.
 
 Another attempt, and another; till by degrees the wall must have
 become pimpled with the adhering lumps of snow.  At last one fragment
 struck the fifth window.
 
 The river would have been seen by day to be of that deep smooth sort
 which races middle and sides with the same gliding precision, any
 irregularities of speed being immediately corrected by a small
 whirlpool.  Nothing was heard in reply to the signal but the gurgle
 and cluck of one of these invisible wheels--together with a few small
 sounds which a sad man would have called moans, and a happy man
 laughter--caused by the flapping of the waters against trifling
 objects in other parts of the stream.
 
 The window was struck again in the same manner.
 
 Then a noise was heard, apparently produced by the opening of the
 window.  This was followed by a voice from the same quarter.
 
 "Who's there?"
 
 The tones were masculine, and not those of surprise.  The high
 wall being that of a barrack, and marriage being looked upon with
 disfavour in the army, assignations and communications had probably
 been made across the river before to-night.
 
 "Is it Sergeant Troy?" said the blurred spot in the snow,
 tremulously.
 
 This person was so much like a mere shade upon the earth, and the
 other speaker so much a part of the building, that one would have
 said the wall was holding a conversation with the snow.
 
 "Yes," came suspiciously from the shadow. "What girl are you?"
 
 "Oh, Frank--don't you know me?" said the spot.  "Your wife, Fanny
 Robin."
 
 "Fanny!" said the wall, in utter astonishment.
 
 "Yes," said the girl, with a half-suppressed gasp of emotion.
 
 There was something in the woman's tone which is not that of the
 wife, and there was a manner in the man which is rarely a husband's.
--**--**--
 Street?  I don't like to come to the Barracks.  There are bad women
 about, and they think me one."
 
 "Quite, so.  I'll come to you, my dear.  Good-night."
 
 "Good-night, Frank--good-night!"
 
 And the noise was again heard of a window closing.  The little spot
 moved away.  When she passed the corner a subdued exclamation was
 heard inside the wall.
 
 "Ho--ho--Sergeant--ho--ho!" An  expostulation followed, but it was
 indistinct; and it became lost amid a low peal of laughter, which was
 hardly distinguishable from the gurgle of the tiny whirlpools
 outside.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XII
 
 
 FARMERS--A RULE--AN EXCEPTION
 
 
 The first public evidence of Bathsheba's decision to be a farmer in
 her own person and by proxy no more was her appearance the following
 market-day in the cornmarket at Casterbridge.
 
 The low though extensive hall, supported by beams and pillars,
 and latterly dignified by the name of Corn Exchange, was thronged
 with hot men who talked among each other in twos and threes, the
 speaker of the minute looking sideways into his auditor's face and
 concentrating his argument by a contraction of one eyelid during
 delivery.  The greater number carried in their hands ground-ash
 saplings, using them partly as walking-sticks and partly for poking
 up pigs, sheep, neighbours with their backs turned, and restful
 things in general, which seemed to require such treatment in the
 course of their peregrinations.  During conversations each subjected
 his sapling to great varieties of usage--bending it round his back,
 forming an arch of it between his two hands, overweighting it on the
 ground till it reached nearly a semicircle; or perhaps it was hastily
 tucked under the arm whilst the sample-bag was pulled forth and a
 handful of corn poured into the palm, which, after criticism, was
 flung upon the floor, an issue of events perfectly well known to
 half-a-dozen acute town-bred fowls which had as usual crept into the
--**--**--
 "What's right week days is right Sundays," replied her mistress in a
 tone which was a proof in itself.
 
 The book was opened--the leaves, drab with age, being quite worn away
 at much-read verses by the forefingers of unpractised readers in
 former days, where they were moved along under the line as an aid to
 the vision.  The special verse in the Book of Ruth was sought out by
 Bathsheba, and the sublime words met her eye.  They slightly thrilled
 and abashed her.  It was Wisdom in the abstract facing Folly in the
 concrete.  Folly in the concrete blushed, persisted in her intention,
 and placed the key on the book.  A rusty patch immediately upon the
 verse, caused by previous pressure of an iron substance thereon, told
 that this was not the first time the old volume had been used for the
 purpose.
 
 "Now keep steady, and be silent," said Bathsheba.
 
 The verse was repeated; the book turned round; Bathsheba blushed
 guiltily.
 
 "Who did you try?" said Liddy curiously.
 
 "I shall not tell you."
 
 "Did you notice Mr. Boldwood's doings in church this morning, miss?"
 Liddy continued, adumbrating by the remark the track her thoughts had
 taken.
 
 "No, indeed," said Bathsheba, with serene indifference.
 
 "His pew is exactly opposite yours, miss."
 
 "I know it."
 
 "And you did not see his goings on!"
 
 "Certainly I did not, I tell you."
 
 Liddy assumed a smaller physiognomy, and shut her lips decisively.
 
 This move was unexpected, and proportionately disconcerting.  "What
 did he do?" Bathsheba said perforce.
 
 "Didn't turn his head to look at you once all the service."
 
 "Why should he?" again demanded her mistress, wearing a nettled look.
 "I didn't ask him to."
 
 "Oh no.  But everybody else was noticing you; and it was odd he
 didn't.  There, 'tis like him.  Rich and gentlemanly, what does he
--**--**--
 it, expecting another anonymous one--so greatly are people's ideas of
 probability a mere sense that precedent will repeat itself.
 
 "I don't think it is for you, sir," said the man, when he saw
 Boldwood's action.  "Though there is no name, I think it is for your
 shepherd."
 
 Boldwood looked then at the address--
 
 
    To the New Shepherd,
          Weatherbury Farm,
                Near Casterbridge
 
 
 "Oh--what a mistake!--it is not mine.  Nor is it for my shepherd.  It
 is for Miss Everdene's.  You had better take it on to him--Gabriel
 Oak--and say I opened it in mistake."
 
 At this moment, on the ridge, up against the blazing sky, a figure
 was visible, like the black snuff in the midst of a candle-flame.
 Then it moved and began to bustle about vigorously from place to
 place, carrying square skeleton masses, which were riddled by the
 same rays.  A small figure on all fours followed behind.  The tall
 form was that of Gabriel Oak; the small one that of George; the
 articles in course of transit were hurdles.
 
 "Wait," said Boldwood. "That's the man on the hill.  I'll take the
 letter to him myself."
 
 To Boldwood it was now no longer merely a letter to another man.  It
 was an opportunity.  Exhibiting a face pregnant with intention, he
 entered the snowy field.
 
 Gabriel, at that minute, descended the hill towards the right.  The
 glow stretched down in this direction now, and touched the distant
 roof of Warren's Malthouse--whither the shepherd was apparently bent:
 Boldwood followed at a distance.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XV
 
 
 A MORNING MEETING--THE LETTER AGAIN
 
 
 The scarlet and orange light outside the malthouse did not penetrate
 to its interior, which was, as usual, lighted by a rival glow of
 similar hue, radiating from the hearth.
 
 The maltster, after having lain down in his clothes for a few
--**--**--
 at each end," said Mr. Clark.  "Likewise looking-glasses for the
 pretty, and lying books for the wicked."
 
 A firm loud tread was now heard stamping outside; the door was opened
 about six inches, and somebody on the other side exclaimed--
 
 "Neighbours, have ye got room for a few new-born lambs?"
 
 "Ay, sure, shepherd," said the conclave.
 
 The door was flung back till it kicked the wall and trembled from
 top to bottom with the blow.  Mr. Oak appeared in the entry with a
 steaming face, hay-bands wound about his ankles to keep out the snow,
 a leather strap round his waist outside the smock-frock, and looking
 altogether an epitome of the world's health and vigour.  Four lambs
 hung in various embarrassing attitudes over his shoulders, and the
 dog George, whom Gabriel had contrived to fetch from Norcombe,
 stalked solemnly behind.
 
 "Well, Shepherd Oak, and how's lambing this year, if I mid say it?"
 inquired Joseph Poorgrass.
 
 "Terrible trying," said Oak.  "I've been wet through twice a-day,
 either in snow or rain, this last fortnight.  Cainy and I haven't
 tined our eyes to-night."
 
 "A good few twins, too, I hear?"
 
 "Too many by half.  Yes; 'tis a very queer lambing this year.  We
 shan't have done by Lady Day."
 
 "And last year 'twer all over by Sexajessamine Sunday," Joseph
 remarked.
 
 "Bring on the rest Cain," said Gabriel, "and then run back to the
 ewes.  I'll follow you soon."
 
 Cainy Ball--a cheery-faced young lad, with a small circular orifice
 by way of mouth, advanced and deposited two others, and retired as he
 was bidden.  Oak lowered the lambs from their unnatural elevation,
 wrapped them in hay, and placed them round the fire.
 
 "We've no lambing-hut here, as I used to have at Norcombe," said
 Gabriel, "and 'tis such a plague to bring the weakly ones to a house.
--**--**--
 mathematical centre of the maltster's little table, and with it gave
 a bump or two thereon, as if to ensure that their eyes all thoroughly
 took in the idea of fistiness before he went further.  "Now--the
 first man in the parish that I hear prophesying bad of our mistress,
 why" (here the fist was raised and let fall as Thor might have done
 with his hammer in assaying it)--"he'll smell and taste that--or I'm
 a Dutchman."
 
 All earnestly expressed by their features that their minds did not
 wander to Holland for a moment on account of this statement, but were
 deploring the difference which gave rise to the figure; and Mark
 Clark cried "Hear, hear; just what I should ha' said." The dog George
 looked up at the same time after the shepherd's menace, and though he
 understood English but imperfectly, began to growl.
 
 "Now, don't ye take on so, shepherd, and sit down!" said Henery,
 with a deprecating peacefulness equal to anything of the kind in
 Christianity.
 
 "We hear that ye be a extraordinary good and clever man, shepherd,"
 said Joseph Poorgrass with considerable anxiety from behind the
 maltster's bedstead, whither he had retired for safety.  "'Tis a
 great thing to be clever, I'm sure," he added, making movements
 associated with states of mind rather than body; "we wish we were,
 don't we, neighbours?"
 
 "Ay, that we do, sure," said Matthew Moon, with a small anxious laugh
 towards Oak, to show how very friendly disposed he was likewise.
 
 "Who's been telling you I'm clever?" said Oak.
 
 "'Tis blowed about from pillar to post quite common," said Matthew.
 "We hear that ye can tell the time as well by the stars as we can by
 the sun and moon, shepherd."
 
 "Yes, I can do a little that way," said Gabriel, as a man of medium
--**--**--
 sergeant upon his sleeve, strode up the aisle, with an embarrassment
 which was only the more marked by the intense vigour of his step, and
 by the determination upon his face to show none.  A slight flush had
 mounted his cheek by the time he had run the gauntlet between these
 women; but, passing on through the chancel arch, he never paused till
 he came close to the altar railing.  Here for a moment he stood
 alone.
 
 The officiating curate, who had not yet doffed his surplice,
 perceived the new-comer, and followed him to the communion-space.  He
 whispered to the soldier, and then beckoned to the clerk, who in his
 turn whispered to an elderly woman, apparently his wife, and they
 also went up the chancel steps.
 
 "'Tis a wedding!" murmured some of the women, brightening.  "Let's
 wait!"
 
 The majority again sat down.
 
 There was a creaking of machinery behind, and some of the young ones
 turned their heads.  From the interior face of the west wall of the
 tower projected a little canopy with a quarter-jack and small bell
 beneath it, the automaton being driven by the same clock machinery
 that struck the large bell in the tower.  Between the tower and the
 church was a close screen, the door of which was kept shut during
 services, hiding this grotesque clockwork from sight.  At present,
 however, the door was open, and the egress of the jack, the blows on
 the bell, and the mannikin's retreat into the nook again, were
 visible to many, and audible throughout the church.
 
 The jack had struck half-past eleven.
 
 "Where's the woman?" whispered some of the spectators.
 
 The young sergeant stood still with the abnormal rigidity of the old
 pillars around.  He faced the south-east, and was as silent as he was
 still.
--**--**--
 floodmarks faintly visible, he had never been seen at the high tides
 which caused them.
 
 Farmer Boldwood came to the stable-door and looked forth across the
 level fields.  Beyond the first enclosure was a hedge, and on the
 other side of this a meadow belonging to Bathsheba's farm.
 
 It was now early spring--the time of going to grass with the sheep,
 when they have the first feed of the meadows, before these are laid
 up for mowing.  The wind, which had been blowing east for several
 weeks, had veered to the southward, and the middle of spring had come
 abruptly--almost without a beginning.  It was that period in the
 vernal quarter when we may suppose the Dryads to be waking for the
 season.  The vegetable world begins to move and swell and the saps to
 rise, till in the completest silence of lone gardens and trackless
 plantations, where everything seems helpless and still after the
 bond and slavery of frost, there are bustlings, strainings, united
 thrusts, and pulls-all-together, in comparison with which the
 powerful tugs of cranes and pulleys in a noisy city are but pigmy
 efforts.
 
 Boldwood, looking into the distant meadows, saw there three figures.
 They were those of Miss Everdene, Shepherd Oak, and Cainy Ball.
 
 When Bathsheba's figure shone upon the farmer's eyes it lighted him
 up as the moon lights up a great tower.  A man's body is as the
 shell, or the tablet, of his soul, as he is reserved or ingenuous,
 overflowing or self-contained.  There was a change in Boldwood's
 exterior from its former impassibleness; and his face showed that he
 was now living outside his defences for the first time, and with a
 fearful sense of exposure.  It is the usual experience of strong
 natures when they love.
 
 At last he arrived at a conclusion.  It was to go across and inquire
--**--**--
 had forgotten the accidents of her position as an agriculturist--that
 being as much of a farmer, and as extensive a farmer, as himself,
 her probable whereabouts was out-of-doors at this time of the year.
 This, and the other oversights Boldwood was guilty of, were natural
 to the mood, and still more natural to the circumstances.  The
 great aids to idealization in love were present here: occasional
 observation of her from a distance, and the absence of social
 intercourse with her--visual familiarity, oral strangeness.  The
 smaller human elements were kept out of sight; the pettinesses that
 enter so largely into all earthly living and doing were disguised by
 the accident of lover and loved-one not being on visiting terms; and
 there was hardly awakened a thought in Boldwood that sorry household
 realities appertained to her, or that she, like all others, had
 moments of commonplace, when to be least plainly seen was to be most
 prettily remembered.  Thus a mild sort of apotheosis took place
 in his fancy, whilst she still lived and breathed within his own
 horizon, a troubled creature like himself.
 
 It was the end of May when the farmer determined to be no longer
 repulsed by trivialities or distracted by suspense.  He had by this
 time grown used to being in love; the passion now startled him less
 even when it tortured him more, and he felt himself adequate to the
 situation.  On inquiring for her at her house they had told him she
 was at the sheepwashing, and he went off to seek her there.
 
 The sheep-washing pool was a perfectly circular basin of brickwork in
 the meadows, full of the clearest water.  To birds on the wing its
 glassy surface, reflecting the light sky, must have been visible for
 miles around as a glistening Cyclops' eye in a green face.  The grass
--**--**--
 But a disquiet filled her which was somewhat to her credit, for it
 would have affected few.  Beyond the mentioned reasons with which
 she combated her objections, she had a strong feeling that, having
 been the one who began the game, she ought in honesty to accept the
 consequences.  Still the reluctance remained.  She said in the same
 breath that it would be ungenerous not to marry Boldwood, and that
 she couldn't do it to save her life.
 
 Bathsheba's was an impulsive nature under a deliberative aspect.  An
 Elizabeth in brain and a Mary Stuart in spirit, she often performed
 actions of the greatest temerity with a manner of extreme discretion.
 Many of her thoughts were perfect syllogisms; unluckily they always
 remained thoughts. Only a few were irrational assumptions; but,
 unfortunately, they were the ones which most frequently grew into
 deeds.
 
 The next day to that of the declaration she found Gabriel Oak at the
 bottom of her garden, grinding his shears for the sheep-shearing.
 All the surrounding cottages were more or less scenes of the same
 operation; the scurr of whetting spread into the sky from all parts
 of the village as from an armoury previous to a campaign.  Peace and
 war kiss each other at their hours of preparation--sickles, scythes,
 shears, and pruning-hooks, ranking with swords, bayonets, and lances,
 in their common necessity for point and edge.
 
 Cainy Ball turned the handle of Gabriel's grindstone, his head
 performing a melancholy see-saw up and down with each turn of the
 wheel.  Oak stood somewhat as Eros is represented when in the act of
 sharpening his arrows: his figure slightly bent, the weight of his
 body thrown over on the shears, and his head balanced side-ways, with
 a critical compression of the lips and contraction of the eyelids to
--**--**--
 
 Hands and shears were inclined to suit the words, and held thus for a
 peculiarly long time by the instructor as he spoke.
 
 "That will do," exclaimed Bathsheba.  "Loose my hands.  I won't have
 them held!  Turn the winch."
 
 Gabriel freed her hands quietly, retired to his handle, and the
 grinding went on.
 
 "Did the men think it odd?" she said again.
 
 "Odd was not the idea, miss."
 
 "What did they say?"
 
 "That Farmer Boldwood's name and your own were likely to be flung
 over pulpit together before the year was out."
 
 "I thought so by the look of them!  Why, there's nothing in it.  A
 more foolish remark was never made, and I want you to contradict it!
 that's what I came for."
 
 Gabriel looked incredulous and sad, but between his moments of
 incredulity, relieved.
 
 "They must have heard our conversation," she continued.
 
 "Well, then, Bathsheba!" said Oak, stopping the handle, and gazing
 into her face with astonishment.
 
 "Miss Everdene, you mean," she said, with dignity.
 
 "I mean this, that if Mr. Boldwood really spoke of marriage, I bain't
 going to tell a story and say he didn't to please you.  I have
 already tried to please you too much for my own good!"
 
 Bathsheba regarded him with round-eyed perplexity.  She did not know
 whether to pity him for disappointed love of her, or to be angry with
 him for having got over it--his tone being ambiguous.
 
 "I said I wanted you just to mention that it was not true I was going
 to be married to him," she murmured, with a slight decline in her
 assurance.
 
 "I can say that to them if you wish, Miss Everdene.  And I could
 likewise give an opinion to 'ee on what you have done."
 
 "I daresay.  But I don't want your opinion."
--**--**--
 "I cannot allow any man to--to criticise my private conduct!" she
 exclaimed.  "Nor will I for a minute.  So you'll please leave the
 farm at the end of the week!"
 
 It may have been a peculiarity--at any rate it was a fact--that when
 Bathsheba was swayed by an emotion of an earthly sort her lower lip
 trembled: when by a refined emotion, her upper or heavenward one.
 Her nether lip quivered now.
 
 "Very well, so I will," said Gabriel calmly.  He had been held to
 her by a beautiful thread which it pained him to spoil by breaking,
 rather than by a chain he could not break.  "I should be even better
 pleased to go at once," he added.
 
 "Go at once then, in Heaven's name!" said she, her eyes flashing at
 his, though never meeting them.  "Don't let me see your face any
 more."
 
 "Very well, Miss Everdene--so it shall be."
 
 And he took his shears and went away from her in placid dignity, as
 Moses left the presence of Pharaoh.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXI
 
 
 TROUBLES IN THE FOLD--A MESSAGE
 
 
 Gabriel Oak had ceased to feed the Weatherbury flock for about
 four-and-twenty hours, when on Sunday afternoon the elderly gentlemen
 Joseph Poorgrass, Matthew Moon, Fray, and half-a-dozen others, came
 running up to the house of the mistress of the Upper Farm.
 
 "Whatever IS the matter, men?" she said, meeting them at the door
 just as she was coming out on her way to church, and ceasing in a
 moment from the close compression of her two red lips, with which
 she had accompanied the exertion of pulling on a tight glove.
 
 "Sixty!" said Joseph Poorgrass.
 
 "Seventy!" said Moon.
 
 "Fifty-nine!" said Susan Tall's husband.
 
 "--Sheep have broke fence," said Fray.
 
 "--And got into a field of young clover," said Tall.
 
 "--Young clover!" said Moon.
--**--**--
 belonging rather to the demonian than to the angelic school, she
 never looked so well as when she was angry--and particularly when the
 effect was heightened by a rather dashing velvet dress, carefully put
 on before a glass.
 
 All the ancient men ran in a jumbled throng after her to the
 clover-field, Joseph sinking down in the midst when about half-way,
 like an individual withering in a world which was more and more
 insupportable.  Having once received the stimulus that her presence
 always gave them they went round among the sheep with a will.  The
 majority of the afflicted animals were lying down, and could not be
 stirred.  These were bodily lifted out, and the others driven into
 the adjoining field.  Here, after the lapse of a few minutes, several
 more fell down, and lay helpless and livid as the rest.
 
 Bathsheba, with a sad, bursting heart, looked at these primest
 specimens of her prime flock as they rolled there--
 
 
    Swoln with wind and the rank mist they drew.
 
 
 Many of them foamed at the mouth, their breathing being quick and
 short, whilst the bodies of all were fearfully distended.
 
 "Oh, what can I do, what can I do!" said Bathsheba, helplessly.
 "Sheep are such unfortunate animals!--there's always something
 happening to them!  I never knew a flock pass a year without getting
 into some scrape or other."
 
 "There's only one way of saving them," said Tall.
 
 "What way?  Tell me quick!"
 
 "They must be pierced in the side with a thing made on purpose."
 
 "Can you do it?  Can I?"
 
 "No, ma'am.  We can't, nor you neither.  It must be done in a
 particular spot.  If ye go to the right or left but an inch you stab
 the ewe and kill her.  Not even a shepherd can do it, as a rule."
--**--**--
 "I will," said Gabriel.
 
 And she smiled on him again.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXII
 
 
 THE GREAT BARN AND THE SHEEP-SHEARERS
 
 
 Men thin away to insignificance and oblivion quite as often by not
 making the most of good spirits when they have them as by lacking
 good spirits when they are indispensable.  Gabriel lately, for the
 first time since his prostration by misfortune, had been independent
 in thought and vigorous in action to a marked extent--conditions
 which, powerless without an opportunity as an opportunity without
 them is barren, would have given him a sure lift upwards when the
 favourable conjunction should have occurred.  But this incurable
 loitering beside Bathsheba Everdene stole his time ruinously.  The
 spring tides were going by without floating him off, and the neap
 might soon come which could not.
 
 It was the first day of June, and the sheep-shearing season
 culminated, the landscape, even to the leanest pasture, being
 all health and colour.  Every green was young, every pore was
 open, and every stalk was swollen with racing currents of juice.
 God was palpably present in the country, and the devil had gone
 with the world to town.  Flossy catkins of the later kinds,
 fern-sprouts like bishops' croziers, the square-headed moschatel,
 the odd cuckoo-pint,--like an apoplectic saint in a niche of
 malachite,--snow-white ladies'-smocks, the toothwort, approximating
 to human flesh, the enchanter's night-shade, and the black-petaled
 doleful-bells, were among the quainter objects of the vegetable world
 in and about Weatherbury at this teeming time; and of the animal,
 the metamorphosed figures of Mr. Jan Coggan, the master-shearer; the
 second and third shearers, who travelled in the exercise of their
 calling, and do not require definition by name; Henery Fray the
 fourth shearer, Susan Tall's husband the fifth, Joseph Poorgrass
 the sixth, young Cain Ball as assistant-shearer, and Gabriel Oak as
--**--**--
 back with a dexterous twist of the arm.  He lopped off the tresses
 about its head, and opened up the neck and collar, his mistress
 quietly looking on.
 
 "She blushes at the insult," murmured Bathsheba, watching the pink
 flush which arose and overspread the neck and shoulders of the ewe
 where they were left bare by the clicking shears--a flush which was
 enviable, for its delicacy, by many queens of coteries, and would
 have been creditable, for its promptness, to any woman in the world.
 
 Poor Gabriel's soul was fed with a luxury of content by having her
 over him, her eyes critically regarding his skilful shears, which
 apparently were going to gather up a piece of the flesh at every
 close, and yet never did so.  Like Guildenstern, Oak was happy in
 that he was not over happy.  He had no wish to converse with her:
 that his bright lady and himself formed one group, exclusively their
 own, and containing no others in the world, was enough.
 
 So the chatter was all on her side.  There is a loquacity that tells
 nothing, which was Bathsheba's; and there is a silence which says
 much: that was Gabriel's.  Full of this dim and temperate bliss, he
 went on to fling the ewe over upon her other side, covering her head
 with his knee, gradually running the shears line after line round her
 dewlap; thence about her flank and back, and finishing over the tail.
 
 "Well done, and done quickly!" said Bathsheba, looking at her watch
 as the last snip resounded.
 
 "How long, miss?" said Gabriel, wiping his brow.
 
 "Three-and-twenty minutes and a half since you took the first lock
 from its forehead.  It is the first time that I have ever seen one
 done in less than half an hour."
--**--**--
 carriage of perfect ease.  He spoke to her in low tones, and she
 instinctively modulated her own to the same pitch, and her voice
 ultimately even caught the inflection of his.  She was far from
 having a wish to appear mysteriously connected with him; but woman at
 the impressionable age gravitates to the larger body not only in her
 choice of words, which is apparent every day, but even in her shades
 of tone and humour, when the influence is great.
 
 What they conversed about was not audible to Gabriel, who was too
 independent to get near, though too concerned to disregard.  The
 issue of their dialogue was the taking of her hand by the courteous
 farmer to help her over the spreading-board into the bright June
 sunlight outside.  Standing beside the sheep already shorn, they went
 on talking again.  Concerning the flock?  Apparently not. Gabriel
 theorized, not without truth, that in quiet discussion of any matter
 within reach of the speakers' eyes, these are usually fixed upon
 it.  Bathsheba demurely regarded a contemptible straw lying upon the
 ground, in a way which suggested less ovine criticism than womanly
 embarrassment.  She became more or less red in the cheek, the blood
 wavering in uncertain flux and reflux over the sensitive space
 between ebb and flood.  Gabriel sheared on, constrained and sad.
 
 She left Boldwood's side, and he walked up and down alone for nearly
 a quarter of an hour.  Then she reappeared in her new riding-habit of
 myrtle green, which fitted her to the waist as a rind fits its fruit;
 and young Bob Coggan led on her mare, Boldwood fetching his own horse
 from the tree under which it had been tied.
 
 Oak's eyes could not forsake them; and in endeavouring to continue
 his shearing at the same time that he watched Boldwood's manner,
--**--**--
 what to say.  It would be a poor plain ballet of my own composure."
 
 "Hear, hear!" said the supper-party.
 
 Poorgrass, thus assured, trilled forth a flickering yet commendable
 piece of sentiment, the tune of which consisted of the key-note and
 another, the latter being the sound chiefly dwelt upon.  This was so
 successful that he rashly plunged into a second in the same breath,
 after a few false starts:--
 
 
    I sow'-ed th'-e .....
    I sow'-ed .....
    I sow'-ed th'-e seeds' of' love',
       I-it was' all' i'-in the'-e spring',
    I-in A'-pril', Ma'-ay, a'-nd sun'-ny' June',
       When sma'-all bi'-irds they' do' sing.
 
 
 "Well put out of hand," said Coggan, at the end of the verse.  "'They
 do sing' was a very taking paragraph."
 
 "Ay; and there was a pretty place at 'seeds of love.' and 'twas well
 heaved out.  Though 'love' is a nasty high corner when a man's voice
 is getting crazed.  Next verse, Master Poorgrass."
 
 But during this rendering young Bob Coggan exhibited one of those
 anomalies which will afflict little people when other persons are
 particularly serious: in trying to check his laughter, he pushed down
 his throat as much of the tablecloth as he could get hold of, when,
 after continuing hermetically sealed for a short time, his mirth
 burst out through his nose.  Joseph perceived it, and with hectic
 cheeks of indignation instantly ceased singing.  Coggan boxed Bob's
 ears immediately.
 
 "Go on, Joseph--go on, and never mind the young scamp," said Coggan.
 "'Tis a very catching ballet.  Now then again--the next bar; I'll
 help ye to flourish up the shrill notes where yer wind is rather
 wheezy:--
 
 
    "Oh the wi'-il-lo'-ow tree' will' twist',
    And the wil'-low' tre'-ee wi'-ill twine'."
 
 
 But the singer could not be set going again.  Bob Coggan was sent
 home for his ill manners, and tranquility was restored by Jacob
--**--**--
 amends without thinking whether the sin quite deserved the penalty
 she was schooling herself to pay.  To have brought all this about her
 ears was terrible; but after a while the situation was not without
 a fearful joy.  The facility with which even the most timid women
 sometimes acquire a relish for the dreadful when that is amalgamated
 with a little triumph, is marvellous.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXIV
 
 
 THE SAME NIGHT--THE FIR PLANTATION
 
 
 Among the multifarious duties which Bathsheba had voluntarily imposed
 upon herself by dispensing with the services of a bailiff, was the
 particular one of looking round the homestead before going to bed,
 to see that all was right and safe for the night.  Gabriel had
 almost constantly preceded her in this tour every evening, watching
 her affairs as carefully as any specially appointed officer of
 surveillance could have done; but this tender devotion was to a
 great extent unknown to his mistress, and as much as was known was
 somewhat thanklessly received.  Women are never tired of bewailing
 man's fickleness in love, but they only seem to snub his constancy.
 
 As watching is best done invisibly, she usually carried a dark
 lantern in her hand, and every now and then turned on the light
 to examine nooks and corners with the coolness of a metropolitan
 policeman.  This coolness may have owed its existence not so much
 to her fearlessness of expected danger as to her freedom from the
 suspicion of any; her worst anticipated discovery being that a horse
 might not be well bedded, the fowls not all in, or a door not closed.
 
 This night the buildings were inspected as usual, and she went round
 to the farm paddock.  Here the only sounds disturbing the stillness
 were steady munchings of many mouths, and stentorian breathings from
 all but invisible noses, ending in snores and puffs like the blowing
--**--**--
 want to be praised, which is often, when they want to be mastered,
 which is sometimes; and when they want no nonsense, which is seldom.
 Just now the first feeling was in the ascendant with Bathsheba,
 with a dash of the second.  Moreover, by chance or by devilry, the
 ministrant was antecedently made interesting by being a handsome
 stranger who had evidently seen better days.
 
 So she could not clearly decide whether it was her opinion that he
 had insulted her or not.
 
 "Was ever anything so odd!" she at last exclaimed to herself, in her
 own room.  "And was ever anything so meanly done as what I did--to
 skulk away like that from a man who was only civil and kind!" Clearly
 she did not think his barefaced praise of her person an insult now.
 
 It was a fatal omission of Boldwood's that he had never once told her
 she was beautiful.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXV
 
 
 THE NEW ACQUAINTANCE DESCRIBED
 
 
 Idiosyncrasy and vicissitude had combined to stamp Sergeant Troy as
 an exceptional being.
 
 He was a man to whom memories were an incumbrance, and anticipations
 a superfluity.  Simply feeling, considering, and caring for what was
 before his eyes, he was vulnerable only in the present.  His outlook
 upon time was as a transient flash of the eye now and then: that
 projection of consciousness into days gone by and to come, which
 makes the past a synonym for the pathetic and the future a word
 for circumspection, was foreign to Troy.  With him the past was
 yesterday; the future, to-morrow; never, the day after.
 
 On this account he might, in certain lights, have been regarded as
 one of the most fortunate of his order.  For it may be argued with
 great plausibility that reminiscence is less an endowment than a
--**--**--
 continue their indulgence in such experiments with terrible effect.
 Sergeant Troy was one.
 
 He had been known to observe casually that in dealing with womankind
 the only alternative to flattery was cursing and swearing.  There was
 no third method.  "Treat them fairly, and you are a lost man." he
 would say.
 
 This person's public appearance in Weatherbury promptly followed his
 arrival there.  A week or two after the shearing, Bathsheba, feeling
 a nameless relief of spirits on account of Boldwood's absence,
 approached her hayfields and looked over the hedge towards the
 haymakers.  They consisted in about equal proportions of gnarled and
 flexuous forms, the former being the men, the latter the women, who
 wore tilt bonnets covered with nankeen, which hung in a curtain upon
 their shoulders.  Coggan and Mark Clark were mowing in a less forward
 meadow, Clark humming a tune to the strokes of his scythe, to
 which Jan made no attempt to keep time with his.  In the first mead
 they were already loading hay, the women raking it into cocks and
 windrows, and the men tossing it upon the waggon.
 
 From behind the waggon a bright scarlet spot emerged, and went on
 loading unconcernedly with the rest.  It was the gallant sergeant,
 who had come haymaking for pleasure; and nobody could deny that
 he was doing the mistress of the farm real knight-service by this
 voluntary contribution of his labour at a busy time.
 
 As soon as she had entered the field Troy saw her, and sticking his
 pitchfork into the ground and picking up his crop or cane, he came
 forward.  Bathsheba blushed with half-angry embarrassment, and
 adjusted her eyes as well as her feet to the direct line of her path.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVI
 
 
 SCENE ON THE VERGE OF THE HAY-MEAD
 
 
 "Ah, Miss Everdene!" said the sergeant, touching his diminutive cap.
--**--**--
 being able to express it on the spur of the moment, and I let out
 mine.  It would have been just the same if you had been the reverse
 person--ugly and old--I should have exclaimed about it in the same
 way."
 
 "How long is it since you have been so afflicted with strong feeling,
 then?"
 
 "Oh, ever since I was big enough to know loveliness from deformity."
 
 "'Tis to be hoped your sense of the difference you speak of doesn't
 stop at faces, but extends to morals as well."
 
 "I won't speak of morals or religion--my own or anybody else's.
 Though perhaps I should have been a very good Christian if you pretty
 women hadn't made me an idolater."
 
 Bathsheba moved on to hide the irrepressible dimplings of merriment.
 Troy followed, whirling his crop.
 
 "But--Miss Everdene--you do forgive me?"
 
 "Hardly."
 
 "Why?"
 
 "You say such things."
 
 "I said you were beautiful, and I'll say so still; for, by--so you
 are!  The most beautiful ever I saw, or may I fall dead this instant!
 Why, upon my--"
 
 "Don't--don't!  I won't listen to you--you are so profane!" she said,
 in a restless state between distress at hearing him and a _penchant_
 to hear more.
 
 "I again say you are a most fascinating woman.  There's nothing
 remarkable in my saying so, is there?  I'm sure the fact is evident
 enough.  Miss Everdene, my opinion may be too forcibly let out
 to please you, and, for the matter of that, too insignificant to
 convince you, but surely it is honest, and why can't it be excused?"
 
 "Because it--it isn't a correct one," she femininely murmured.
 
 "Oh, fie--fie!  Am I any worse for breaking the third of that
 Terrible Ten than you for breaking the ninth?"
 
 "Well, it doesn't seem QUITE true to me that I am fascinating," she
--**--**--
 
 "Put shortly, it is not being able to think, hear, or look in
 any direction except one without wretchedness, nor there without
 torture."
 
 "Ah, sergeant, it won't do--you are pretending!" she said, shaking
 her head. "Your words are too dashing to be true."
 
 "I am not, upon the honour of a soldier."
 
 "But WHY is it so?--Of course I ask for mere pastime."
 
 "Because you are so distracting--and I am so distracted."
 
 "You look like it."
 
 "I am indeed."
 
 "Why, you only saw me the other night!"
 
 "That makes no difference.  The lightning works instantaneously.  I
 loved you then, at once--as I do now."
 
 Bathsheba surveyed him curiously, from the feet upward, as high as
 she liked to venture her glance, which was not quite so high as his
 eyes.
 
 "You cannot and you don't," she said demurely.  "There is no such
 sudden feeling in people.  I won't listen to you any longer.  Hear
 me, I wish I knew what o'clock it is--I am going--I have wasted too
 much time here already!"
 
 The sergeant looked at his watch and told her.  "What, haven't you a
 watch, miss?" he inquired.
 
 "I have not just at present--I am about to get a new one."
 
 "No.  You shall be given one.  Yes--you shall.  A gift, Miss
 Everdene--a gift."
 
 And before she knew what the young man was intending, a heavy gold
 watch was in her hand.
 
 "It is an unusually good one for a man like me to possess," he
 quietly said.  "That watch has a history.  Press the spring and open
 the back."
 
 She did so.
 
 "What do you see?"
 
 "A crest and a motto."
 
 "A coronet with five points, and beneath, _Cedit amor rebus_--'Love
 yields to circumstance.' It's the motto of the Earls of Severn.
 That watch belonged to the last lord, and was given to my mother's
--**--**--
 
 Troy looked far away.  "I don't see why you want to bring her," he
 said coldly.
 
 An unconscious look of assent in Bathsheba's eyes betrayed that
 something more than his coldness had made her also feel that Liddy
 would be superfluous in the suggested scene.  She had felt it, even
 whilst making the proposal.
 
 "Well, I won't bring Liddy--and I'll come.  But only for a very short
 time," she added; "a very short time."
 
 "It will not take five minutes," said Troy.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXVIII
 
 
 THE HOLLOW AMID THE FERNS
 
 
 The hill opposite Bathsheba's dwelling extended, a mile off, into an
 uncultivated tract of land, dotted at this season with tall thickets
 of brake fern, plump and diaphanous from recent rapid growth, and
 radiant in hues of clear and untainted green.
 
 At eight o'clock this midsummer evening, whilst the bristling ball
 of gold in the west still swept the tips of the ferns with its long,
 luxuriant rays, a soft brushing-by of garments might have been heard
 among them, and Bathsheba appeared in their midst, their soft,
 feathery arms caressing her up to her shoulders.  She paused, turned,
 went back over the hill and half-way to her own door, whence she cast
 a farewell glance upon the spot she had just left, having resolved
 not to remain near the place after all.
 
 She saw a dim spot of artificial red moving round the shoulder of the
 rise.  It disappeared on the other side.
 
 She waited one minute--two minutes--thought of Troy's disappointment
 at her non-fulfilment of a promised engagement, till she again ran
 along the field, clambered over the bank, and followed the original
 direction.  She was now literally trembling and panting at this her
 temerity in such an errant undertaking; her breath came and went
 quickly, and her eyes shone with an infrequent light.  Yet go she
--**--**--
 Bathsheba.  It may safely be asserted with respect to the closeness
 of his cuts, that had it been possible for the edge of the sword to
 leave in the air a permanent substance wherever it flew past, the
 space left untouched would have been almost a mould of Bathsheba's
 figure.
 
 Behind the luminous streams of this _aurora militaris_, she could see
 the hue of Troy's sword arm, spread in a scarlet haze over the space
 covered by its motions, like a twanged harpstring, and behind all
 Troy himself, mostly facing her; sometimes, to show the rear cuts,
 half turned away, his eye nevertheless always keenly measuring
 her breadth and outline, and his lips tightly closed in sustained
 effort.  Next, his movements lapsed slower, and she could see them
 individually.  The hissing of the sword had ceased, and he stopped
 entirely.
 
 "That outer loose lock of hair wants tidying," he said, before she
 had moved or spoken.  "Wait: I'll do it for you."
 
 An arc of silver shone on her right side: the sword had descended.
 The lock dropped to the ground.
 
 "Bravely borne!" said Troy.  "You didn't flinch a shade's thickness.
 Wonderful in a woman!"
 
 "It was because I didn't expect it.  Oh, you have spoilt my hair!"
 
 "Only once more."
 
 "No--no!  I am afraid of you--indeed I am!" she cried.
 
 "I won't touch you at all--not even your hair.  I am only going to
 kill that caterpillar settling on you.  Now: still!"
 
 It appeared that a caterpillar had come from the fern and chosen the
 front of her bodice as his resting place.  She saw the point glisten
 towards her bosom, and seemingly enter it.  Bathsheba closed her eyes
 in the full persuasion that she was killed at last.  However, feeling
 just as usual, she opened them again.
--**--**--
 
 All this infatuation Gabriel saw, and was troubled thereby from the
 time of his daily journey a-field to the time of his return, and on
 to the small hours of many a night.  That he was not beloved had
 hitherto been his great sorrow; that Bathsheba was getting into
 the toils was now a sorrow greater than the first, and one which
 nearly obscured it.  It was a result which paralleled the oft-quoted
 observation of Hippocrates concerning physical pains.
 
 That is a noble though perhaps an unpromising love which not even the
 fear of breeding aversion in the bosom of the one beloved can deter
 from combating his or her errors.  Oak determined to speak to his
 mistress.  He would base his appeal on what he considered her unfair
 treatment of Farmer Boldwood, now absent from home.
 
 An opportunity occurred one evening when she had gone for a short
 walk by a path through the neighbouring cornfields.  It was dusk when
 Oak, who had not been far a-field that day, took the same path and
 met her returning, quite pensively, as he thought.
 
 The wheat was now tall, and the path was narrow; thus the way was
 quite a sunken groove between the embowing thicket on either side.
 Two persons could not walk abreast without damaging the crop, and
 Oak stood aside to let her pass.
 
 "Oh, is it Gabriel?" she said.  "You are taking a walk too.
 Good-night."
 
 "I thought I would come to meet you, as it is rather late," said Oak,
 turning and following at her heels when she had brushed somewhat
 quickly by him.
 
 "Thank you, indeed, but I am not very fearful."
 
 "Oh no; but there are bad characters about."
 
 "I never meet them."
 
 Now Oak, with marvellous ingenuity, had been going to introduce the
--**--**--
 
 No Christmas robin detained by a window-pane ever pulsed as did
 Bathsheba now.
 
 "I say--I say again--that it doesn't become you to talk about
 him.  Why he should be mentioned passes me quite!" she exclaimed
 desperately.  "I know this, th-th-that he is a thoroughly
 conscientious man--blunt sometimes even to rudeness--but always
 speaking his mind about you plain to your face!"
 
 "Oh."
 
 "He is as good as anybody in this parish!  He is very particular,
 too, about going to church--yes, he is!"
 
 "I am afeard nobody saw him there.  I never did, certainly."
 
 "The reason of that is," she said eagerly, "that he goes in privately
 by the old tower door, just when the service commences, and sits at
 the back of the gallery.  He told me so."
 
 This supreme instance of Troy's goodness fell upon Gabriel ears like
 the thirteenth stroke of crazy clock.  It was not only received with
 utter incredulity as regarded itself, but threw a doubt on all the
 assurances that had preceded it.
 
 Oak was grieved to find how entirely she trusted him.  He brimmed
 with deep feeling as he replied in a steady voice, the steadiness of
 which was spoilt by the palpableness of his great effort to keep it
 so:--
 
 "You know, mistress, that I love you, and shall love you always.
 I only mention this to bring to your mind that at any rate I would
 wish to do you no harm: beyond that I put it aside.  I have lost in
 the race for money and good things, and I am not such a fool as to
 pretend to 'ee now I am poor, and you have got altogether above me.
 But Bathsheba, dear mistress, this I beg you to consider--that, both
 to keep yourself well honoured among the workfolk, and in common
--**--**--
 he ascended the external flight of steps at the top of which
 it stood, and examined it.  The pale lustre yet hanging in the
 north-western heaven was sufficient to show that a sprig of ivy had
 grown from the wall across the door to a length of more than a foot,
 delicately tying the panel to the stone jamb.  It was a decisive
 proof that the door had not been opened at least since Troy came back
 to Weatherbury.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XXX
 
 
 HOT CHEEKS AND TEARFUL EYES
 
 
 Half an hour later Bathsheba entered her own house.  There burnt
 upon her face when she met the light of the candles the flush and
 excitement which were little less than chronic with her now.  The
 farewell words of Troy, who had accompanied her to the very door,
 still lingered in her ears.  He had bidden her adieu for two days,
 which were, so he stated, to be spent at Bath in visiting some
 friends.  He had also kissed her a second time.
 
 It is only fair to Bathsheba to explain here a little fact which
 did not come to light till a long time afterwards: that Troy's
 presentation of himself so aptly at the roadside this evening was
 not by any distinctly preconcerted arrangement.  He had hinted--she
 had forbidden; and it was only on the chance of his still coming
 that she had dismissed Oak, fearing a meeting between them just
 then.
 
 She now sank down into a chair, wild and perturbed by all these
 new and fevering sequences.  Then she jumped up with a manner of
 decision, and fetched her desk from a side table.
 
 In three minutes, without pause or modification, she had written a
 letter to Boldwood, at his address beyond Casterbridge, saying mildly
 but firmly that she had well considered the whole subject he had
--**--**--
 "Maryann--Oh you perjured woman!  How can you speak that wicked
 story!" said Bathsheba, excitedly.  "You admired him from your heart
 only this morning in the very world, you did.  Yes, Maryann, you know
 it!"
 
 "Yes, miss, but so did you.  He is a wild scamp now, and you are
 right to hate him."
 
 "He's NOT a wild scamp!  How dare you to my face!  I have no right to
 hate him, nor you, nor anybody.  But I am a silly woman!  What is it
 to me what he is?  You know it is nothing.  I don't care for him; I
 don't mean to defend his good name, not I.  Mind this, if any of you
 say a word against him you'll be dismissed instantly!"
 
 She flung down the letter and surged back into the parlour, with a
 big heart and tearful eyes, Liddy following her.
 
 "Oh miss!" said mild Liddy, looking pitifully into Bathsheba's face.
 "I am sorry we mistook you so!  I did think you cared for him; but I
 see you don't now."
 
 "Shut the door, Liddy."
 
 Liddy closed the door, and went on: "People always say such foolery,
 miss.  I'll make answer hencefor'ard, 'Of course a lady like Miss
 Everdene can't love him'; I'll say it out in plain black and white."
 
 Bathsheba burst out: "O Liddy, are you such a simpleton?  Can't you
 read riddles?  Can't you see?  Are you a woman yourself?"
 
 Liddy's clear eyes rounded with wonderment.
 
 "Yes; you must be a blind thing, Liddy!" she said, in reckless
 abandonment and grief.  "Oh, I love him to very distraction and
 misery and agony!  Don't be frightened at me, though perhaps I am
 enough to frighten any innocent woman.  Come closer--closer." She
 put her arms round Liddy's neck.  "I must let it out to somebody; it
--**--**--
 Boldwood had for the first time been awakened to woman's privileges
 in tergiversation even when it involves another person's possible
 blight.  That Bathsheba was a firm and positive girl, far less
 inconsequent than her fellows, had been the very lung of his hope;
 for he had held that these qualities would lead her to adhere to a
 straight course for consistency's sake, and accept him, though her
 fancy might not flood him with the iridescent hues of uncritical
 love.  But the argument now came back as sorry gleams from a broken
 mirror.  The discovery was no less a scourge than a surprise.
 
 He came on looking upon the ground, and did not see Bathsheba till
 they were less than a stone's throw apart.  He looked up at the sound
 of her pit-pat, and his changed appearance sufficiently denoted to
 her the depth and strength of the feelings paralyzed by her letter.
 
 "Oh; is it you, Mr. Boldwood?" she faltered, a guilty warmth pulsing
 in her face.
 
 Those who have the power of reproaching in silence may find it a
 means more effective than words.  There are accents in the eye which
 are not on the tongue, and more tales come from pale lips than can
 enter an ear.  It is both the grandeur and the pain of the remoter
 moods that they avoid the pathway of sound.  Boldwood's look was
 unanswerable.
 
 Seeing she turned a little aside, he said, "What, are you afraid of
 me?"
 
 "Why should you say that?" said Bathsheba.
 
 "I fancied you looked so," said he.  "And it is most strange, because
 of its contrast with my feeling for you."
 
 She regained self-possession, fixed her eyes calmly, and waited.
 
 "You know what that feeling is," continued Boldwood, deliberately.
 "A thing strong as death.  No dismissal by a hasty letter affects
--**--**--
 would have died for me.'  Yes, and you have given way to him, knowing
 him to be not the man for you.  He has kissed you--claimed you as
 his.  Do you hear--he has kissed you.  Deny it!"
 
 The most tragic woman is cowed by a tragic man, and although Boldwood
 was, in vehemence and glow, nearly her own self rendered into another
 sex, Bathsheba's cheek quivered.  She gasped, "Leave me, sir--leave
 me!  I am nothing to you.  Let me go on!"
 
 "Deny that he has kissed you."
 
 "I shall not."
 
 "Ha--then he has!" came hoarsely from the farmer.
 
 "He has," she said, slowly, and, in spite of her fear, defiantly.  "I
 am not ashamed to speak the truth."
 
 "Then curse him; and curse him!" said Boldwood, breaking into a
 whispered fury. "Whilst I would have given worlds to touch your hand,
 you have let a rake come in without right or ceremony and--kiss you!
 Heaven's mercy--kiss you! ...  Ah, a time of his life shall come
 when he will have to repent, and think wretchedly of the pain he has
 caused another man; and then may he ache, and wish, and curse, and
 yearn--as I do now!"
 
 "Don't, don't, oh, don't pray down evil upon him!" she implored in a
 miserable cry.  "Anything but that--anything.  Oh, be kind to him,
 sir, for I love him true!"
 
 Boldwood's ideas had reached that point of fusion at which outline
 and consistency entirely disappear.  The impending night appeared to
 concentrate in his eye.  He did not hear her at all now.
 
 "I'll punish him--by my soul, that will I!  I'll meet him, soldier or
 no, and I'll horsewhip the untimely stripling for this reckless theft
 of my one delight.  If he were a hundred men I'd horsewhip him--"
 He dropped his voice suddenly and unnaturally.  "Bathsheba, sweet,
--**--**--
 "Now on at full speed!"
 
 No sound of the rider in their van could now be discovered.  The
 road-metal grew softer and more clayey as Weatherbury was left
 behind, and the late rain had wetted its surface to a somewhat
 plastic, but not muddy state.  They came to cross-roads.  Coggan
 suddenly pulled up Moll and slipped off.
 
 "What's the matter?" said Gabriel.
 
 "We must try to track 'em, since we can't hear 'em," said Jan,
 fumbling in his pockets.  He struck a light, and held the match to
 the ground.  The rain had been heavier here, and all foot and horse
 tracks made previous to the storm had been abraded and blurred by
 the drops, and they were now so many little scoops of water, which
 reflected the flame of the match like eyes.  One set of tracks was
 fresh and had no water in them; one pair of ruts was also empty,
 and not small canals, like the others.  The footprints forming this
 recent impression were full of information as to pace; they were in
 equidistant pairs, three or four feet apart, the right and left foot
 of each pair being exactly opposite one another.
 
 "Straight on!" Jan exclaimed.  "Tracks like that mean a stiff gallop.
 No wonder we don't hear him.  And the horse is harnessed--look at the
 ruts.  Ay, that's our mare sure enough!"
 
 "How do you know?"
 
 "Old Jimmy Harris only shoed her last week, and I'd swear to his make
 among ten thousand."
 
 "The rest of the gipsies must ha' gone on earlier, or some other
 way," said Oak.  "You saw there were no other tracks?"
 
 "True." They rode along silently for a long weary time. Coggan
 carried an old pinchbeck repeater which he had inherited from some
 genius in his family; and it now struck one.  He lighted another
--**--**--
 
 She jumped to her feet.  She would see him at once.  Yes, she would
 implore him by word of mouth to assist her in this dilemma.  A letter
 to keep him away could not reach him in time, even if he should be
 disposed to listen to it.
 
 Was Bathsheba altogether blind to the obvious fact that the support
 of a lover's arms is not of a kind best calculated to assist a
 resolve to renounce him?  Or was she sophistically sensible, with a
 thrill of pleasure, that by adopting this course for getting rid of
 him she was ensuring a meeting with him, at any rate, once more?
 
 It was now dark, and the hour must have been nearly ten.  The only
 way to accomplish her purpose was to give up her idea of visiting
 Liddy at Yalbury, return to Weatherbury Farm, put the horse into
 the gig, and drive at once to Bath.  The scheme seemed at first
 impossible: the journey was a fearfully heavy one, even for a strong
 horse, at her own estimate; and she much underrated the distance.
 It was most venturesome for a woman, at night, and alone.
 
 But could she go on to Liddy's and leave things to take their course?
 No, no; anything but that.  Bathsheba was full of a stimulating
 turbulence, beside which caution vainly prayed for a hearing.  She
 turned back towards the village.
 
 Her walk was slow, for she wished not to enter Weatherbury till the
 cottagers were in bed, and, particularly, till Boldwood was secure.
 Her plan was now to drive to Bath during the night, see Sergeant Troy
 in the morning before he set out to come to her, bid him farewell,
 and dismiss him: then to rest the horse thoroughly (herself to weep
 the while, she thought), starting early the next morning on her
--**--**--
 besides?"
 
 "Oh, all sorts."
 
 "White as a lily?  You are sure 'twas she?"
 
 "Yes."
 
 "Well, what besides?"
 
 "Great glass windows to the shops, and great clouds in the sky, full
 of rain, and old wooden trees in the country round."
 
 "You stun-poll!  What will ye say next?" said Coggan.
 
 "Let en alone," interposed Joseph Poorgrass.  "The boy's meaning is
 that the sky and the earth in the kingdom of Bath is not altogether
 different from ours here.  'Tis for our good to gain knowledge of
 strange cities, and as such the boy's words should be suffered, so
 to speak it."
 
 "And the people of Bath," continued Cain, "never need to light their
 fires except as a luxury, for the water springs up out of the earth
 ready boiled for use."
 
 "'Tis true as the light," testified Matthew Moon. "I've heard other
 navigators say the same thing."
 
 "They drink nothing else there," said Cain, "and seem to enjoy it, to
 see how they swaller it down."
 
 "Well, it seems a barbarian practice enough to us, but I daresay the
 natives think nothing o' it," said Matthew.
 
 "And don't victuals spring up as well as drink?" asked Coggan,
 twirling his eye.
 
 "No--I own to a blot there in Bath--a true blot.  God didn't provide
 'em with victuals as well as drink, and 'twas a drawback I couldn't
 get over at all."
 
 "Well, 'tis a curious place, to say the least," observed Moon; "and
 it must be a curious people that live therein."
 
 "Miss Everdene and the soldier were walking about together, you say?"
 said Gabriel, returning to the group.
 
 "Ay, and she wore a beautiful gold-colour silk gown, trimmed with
 black lace, that would have stood alone 'ithout legs inside if
 required.  'Twas a very winsome sight; and her hair was brushed
--**--**--
 or copper.  Such a great ornament as they'd be to him on a dull
 afternoon, when he's up in the pulpit lighted by the wax candles!
 But 'tis impossible, poor man.  Ah, to think how unequal things be."
 
 "Perhaps he's made of different stuff than to wear 'em," said
 Gabriel, grimly. "Well, that's enough of this.  Go on, Cainy--quick."
 
 "Oh--and the new style of parsons wear moustaches and long beards,"
 continued the illustrious traveller, "and look like Moses and Aaron
 complete, and make we fokes in the congregation feel all over like
 the children of Israel."
 
 "A very right feeling--very," said Joseph Poorgrass.
 
 "And there's two religions going on in the nation now--High Church
 and High Chapel.  And, thinks I, I'll play fair; so I went to High
 Church in the morning, and High Chapel in the afternoon."
 
 "A right and proper boy," said Joseph Poorgrass.
 
 "Well, at High Church they pray singing, and worship all the colours
 of the rainbow; and at High Chapel they pray preaching, and worship
 drab and whitewash only.  And then--I didn't see no more of Miss
 Everdene at all."
 
 "Why didn't you say so afore, then?" exclaimed Oak, with much
 disappointment.
 
 "Ah," said Matthew Moon, "she'll wish her cake dough if so be she's
 over intimate with that man."
 
 "She's not over intimate with him," said Gabriel, indignantly.
 
 "She would know better," said Coggan.  "Our mis'ess has too much
 sense under they knots of black hair to do such a mad thing."
 
 "You see, he's not a coarse, ignorant man, for he was well brought
 up," said Matthew, dubiously.  "'Twas only wildness that made him a
 soldier, and maids rather like your man of sin."
 
 "Now, Cain Ball," said Gabriel restlessly, "can you swear in the most
 awful form that the woman you saw was Miss Everdene?"
--**--**--
 night.
 
 Troy turned up the hill and quickened his pace.  Boldwood stepped
 forward.
 
 "Sergeant Troy?"
 
 "Yes--I'm Sergeant Troy."
 
 "Just arrived from up the country, I think?"
 
 "Just arrived from Bath."
 
 "I am William Boldwood."
 
 "Indeed."
 
 The tone in which this word was uttered was all that had been wanted
 to bring Boldwood to the point.
 
 "I wish to speak a word with you," he said.
 
 "What about?"
 
 "About her who lives just ahead there--and about a woman you have
 wronged."
 
 "I wonder at your impertinence," said Troy, moving on.
 
 "Now look here," said Boldwood, standing in front of him, "wonder or
 not, you are going to hold a conversation with me."
 
 Troy heard the dull determination in Boldwood's voice, looked at his
 stalwart frame, then at the thick cudgel he carried in his hand.  He
 remembered it was past ten o'clock. It seemed worth while to be civil
 to Boldwood.
 
 "Very well, I'll listen with pleasure," said Troy, placing his bag on
 the ground, "only speak low, for somebody or other may overhear us in
 the farmhouse there."
 
 "Well then--I know a good deal concerning your Fanny Robin's
 attachment to you.  I may say, too, that I believe I am the only
 person in the village, excepting Gabriel Oak, who does know it.  You
 ought to marry her."
 
 "I suppose I ought.  Indeed, I wish to, but I cannot."
 
 "Why?"
 
 Troy was about to utter something hastily; he then checked himself
 and said, "I am too poor."  His voice was changed.  Previously it had
 had a devil-may-care tone.  It was the voice of a trickster now.
 
 Boldwood's present mood was not critical enough to notice tones.  He
 continued, "I may as well speak plainly; and understand, I don't
 wish to enter into the questions of right or wrong, woman's honour
--**--**--
 
 "A moment," he gasped.  "You are injuring her you love!"
 
 "Well, what do you mean?" said the farmer.
 
 "Give me breath," said Troy.
 
 Boldwood loosened his hand, saying, "By Heaven, I've a mind to kill
 you!"
 
 "And ruin her."
 
 "Save her."
 
 "Oh, how can she be saved now, unless I marry her?"
 
 Boldwood groaned.  He reluctantly released the soldier, and flung him
 back against the hedge.  "Devil, you torture me!" said he.
 
 Troy rebounded like a ball, and was about to make a dash at the
 farmer; but he checked himself, saying lightly--
 
 "It is not worth while to measure my strength with you.  Indeed it
 is a barbarous way of settling a quarrel.  I shall shortly leave the
 army because of the same conviction.  Now after that revelation of
 how the land lies with Bathsheba, 'twould be a mistake to kill me,
 would it not?"
 
 "'Twould be a mistake to kill you," repeated Boldwood, mechanically,
 with a bowed head.
 
 "Better kill yourself."
 
 "Far better."
 
 "I'm glad you see it."
 
 "Troy, make her your wife, and don't act upon what I arranged just
 now.  The alternative is dreadful, but take Bathsheba; I give her up!
 She must love you indeed to sell soul and body to you so utterly as
 she has done.  Wretched woman--deluded woman--you are, Bathsheba!"
 
 "But about Fanny?"
 
 "Bathsheba is a woman well to do," continued Boldwood, in nervous
 anxiety, and, Troy, she will make a good wife; and, indeed, she is
 worth your hastening on your marriage with her!"
 
 "But she has a will--not to say a temper, and I shall be a mere slave
 to her.  I could do anything with poor Fanny Robin."
 
 "Troy," said Boldwood, imploringly, "I'll do anything for you, only
 don't desert her; pray don't desert her, Troy."
 
 "Which, poor Fanny?"
--**--**--
 
 Coggan replied to the greeting.  "Bain't ye going to answer the man?"
 he then said to Gabriel.  "I'd say good morning--you needn't spend a
 hapenny of meaning upon it, and yet keep the man civil."
 
 Gabriel soon decided too that, since the deed was done, to put the
 best face upon the matter would be the greatest kindness to her he
 loved.
 
 "Good morning, Sergeant Troy," he returned, in a ghastly voice.
 
 "A rambling, gloomy house this," said Troy, smiling.
 
 "Why--they MAY not be married!" suggested Coggan.  "Perhaps she's not
 there."
 
 Gabriel shook his head.  The soldier turned a little towards the
 east, and the sun kindled his scarlet coat to an orange glow.
 
 "But it is a nice old house," responded Gabriel.
 
 "Yes--I suppose so; but I feel like new wine in an old bottle here.
 My notion is that sash-windows should be put throughout, and these
 old wainscoted walls brightened up a bit; or the oak cleared quite
 away, and the walls papered."
 
 "It would be a pity, I think."
 
 "Well, no.  A philosopher once said in my hearing that the old
 builders, who worked when art was a living thing, had no respect
 for the work of builders who went before them, but pulled down and
 altered as they thought fit; and why shouldn't we?  'Creation and
 preservation don't do well together,' says he, 'and a million of
 antiquarians can't invent a style.' My mind exactly.  I am for making
 this place more modern, that we may be cheerful whilst we can."
 
 The military man turned and surveyed the interior of the room, to
 assist his ideas of improvement in this direction.  Gabriel and
 Coggan began to move on.
 
 "Oh, Coggan," said Troy, as if inspired by a recollection "do you
 know if insanity has ever appeared in Mr. Boldwood's family?"
--**--**--
 married woman were still new, and when the weather was yet dry and
 sultry, a man stood motionless in the stockyard of Weatherbury Upper
 Farm, looking at the moon and sky.
 
 The night had a sinister aspect.  A heated breeze from the south
 slowly fanned the summits of lofty objects, and in the sky dashes
 of buoyant cloud were sailing in a course at right angles to that
 of another stratum, neither of them in the direction of the breeze
 below.  The moon, as seen through these films, had a lurid metallic
 look.  The fields were sallow with the impure light, and all were
 tinged in monochrome, as if beheld through stained glass.  The same
 evening the sheep had trailed homeward head to tail, the behaviour of
 the rooks had been confused, and the horses had moved with timidity
 and caution.
 
 Thunder was imminent, and, taking some secondary appearances into
 consideration, it was likely to be followed by one of the lengthened
 rains which mark the close of dry weather for the season.  Before
 twelve hours had passed a harvest atmosphere would be a bygone thing.
 
 Oak gazed with misgiving at eight naked and unprotected ricks,
 massive and heavy with the rich produce of one-half the farm for
 that year.  He went on to the barn.
 
 This was the night which had been selected by Sergeant Troy--ruling
 now in the room of his wife--for giving the harvest supper and dance.
 As Oak approached the building the sound of violins and a tambourine,
 and the regular jigging of many feet, grew more distinct.  He came
 close to the large doors, one of which stood slightly ajar, and
 looked in.
 
 The central space, together with the recess at one end, was emptied
 of all incumbrances, and this area, covering about two-thirds of
--**--**--
 "Will you tell him, then," said Gabriel, "that I only stepped ath'art
 to say that a heavy rain is sure to fall soon, and that something
 should be done to protect the ricks?"
 
 "Mr. Troy says it will not rain," returned the messenger, "and he
 cannot stop to talk to you about such fidgets."
 
 In juxtaposition with Troy, Oak had a melancholy tendency to look
 like a candle beside gas, and ill at ease, he went out again,
 thinking he would go home; for, under the circumstances, he had no
 heart for the scene in the barn.  At the door he paused for a moment:
 Troy was speaking.
 
 "Friends, it is not only the harvest home that we are celebrating
 to-night; but this is also a Wedding Feast.  A short time ago I had
 the happiness to lead to the altar this lady, your mistress, and not
 until now have we been able to give any public flourish to the event
 in Weatherbury.  That it may be thoroughly well done, and that every
 man may go happy to bed, I have ordered to be brought here some
 bottles of brandy and kettles of hot water.  A treble-strong goblet
 will he handed round to each guest."
 
 Bathsheba put her hand upon his arm, and, with upturned pale face,
 said imploringly, "No--don't give it to them--pray don't, Frank!  It
 will only do them harm: they have had enough of everything."
 
 "True--we don't wish for no more, thank ye," said one or two.
 
 "Pooh!" said the sergeant contemptuously, and raised his voice as
 if lighted up by a new idea.  "Friends," he said, "we'll send the
 women-folk home!  'Tis time they were in bed.  Then we cockbirds will
 have a jolly carouse to ourselves!  If any of the men show the white
--**--**--
 Many of the lights had quite gone out, others smoked and stank,
 grease dropping from them upon the floor.  Here, under the table, and
 leaning against forms and chairs in every conceivable attitude except
 the perpendicular, were the wretched persons of all the work-folk,
 the hair of their heads at such low levels being suggestive of mops
 and brooms.  In the midst of these shone red and distinct the figure
 of Sergeant Troy, leaning back in a chair.  Coggan was on his back,
 with his mouth open, huzzing forth snores, as were several others;
 the united breathings of the horizonal assemblage forming a subdued
 roar like London from a distance.  Joseph Poorgrass was curled round
 in the fashion of a hedge-hog, apparently in attempts to present the
 least possible portion of his surface to the air; and behind him
 was dimly visible an unimportant remnant of William Smallbury.
 The glasses and cups still stood upon the table, a water-jug being
 overturned, from which a small rill, after tracing its course with
 marvellous precision down the centre of the long table, fell into the
 neck of the unconscious Mark Clark, in a steady, monotonous drip,
 like the dripping of a stalactite in a cave.
 
 Gabriel glanced hopelessly at the group, which, with one or two
 exceptions, composed all the able-bodied men upon the farm.  He saw
 at once that if the ricks were to be saved that night, or even the
 next morning, he must save them with his own hands.
 
 A faint "ting-ting" resounded from under Coggan's waistcoat.  It was
 Coggan's watch striking the hour of two.
 
 Oak went to the recumbent form of Matthew Moon, who usually undertook
 the rough thatching of the home-stead, and shook him.  The shaking
 was without effect.
 
 Gabriel shouted in his ear, "where's your thatching-beetle and
--**--**--
 miles in front.  Every hedge, bush, and tree was distinct as in a
 line engraving.  In a paddock in the same direction was a herd of
 heifers, and the forms of these were visible at this moment in the
 act of galloping about in the wildest and maddest confusion, flinging
 their heels and tails high into the air, their heads to earth.
 A poplar in the immediate foreground was like an ink stroke on
 burnished tin.  Then the picture vanished, leaving the darkness so
 intense that Gabriel worked entirely by feeling with his hands.
 
 He had stuck his ricking-rod, or poniard, as it was indifferently
 called--a long iron lance, polished by handling--into the stack,
 used to support the sheaves instead of the support called a groom
 used on houses.  A blue light appeared in the zenith, and in some
 indescribable manner flickered down near the top of the rod.  It
 was the fourth of the larger flashes.  A moment later and there was
 a smack--smart, clear, and short.  Gabriel felt his position to be
 anything but a safe one, and he resolved to descend.
 
 Not a drop of rain had fallen as yet.  He wiped his weary brow, and
 looked again at the black forms of the unprotected stacks.  Was his
 life so valuable to him after all?  What were his prospects that he
 should be so chary of running risk, when important and urgent labour
 could not be carried on without such risk?  He resolved to stick to
 the stack.  However, he took a precaution.  Under the staddles was a
 long tethering chain, used to prevent the escape of errant horses.
 This he carried up the ladder, and sticking his rod through the clog
 at one end, allowed the other end of the chain to trail upon the
--**--**--
 suddenly brightened with the brazen glare of shining majolica--every
 knot in every straw was visible.  On the slope in front of him
 appeared two human shapes, black as jet.  The rick lost its
 sheen--the shapes vanished.  Gabriel turned his head.  It had been
 the sixth flash which had come from the east behind him, and the two
 dark forms on the slope had been the shadows of himself and
 Bathsheba.
 
 Then came the peal.  It hardly was credible that such a heavenly
 light could be the parent of such a diabolical sound.
 
 "How terrible!" she exclaimed, and clutched him by the sleeve.
 Gabriel turned, and steadied her on her aerial perch by holding
 her arm.  At the same moment, while he was still reversed in his
 attitude, there was more light, and he saw, as it were, a copy of the
 tall poplar tree on the hill drawn in black on the wall of the barn.
 It was the shadow of that tree, thrown across by a secondary flash
 in the west.
 
 The next flare came.  Bathsheba was on the ground now, shouldering
 another sheaf, and she bore its dazzle without flinching--thunder
 and all--and again ascended with the load.  There was then a silence
 everywhere for four or five minutes, and the crunch of the spars, as
 Gabriel hastily drove them in, could again be distinctly heard.  He
 thought the crisis of the storm had passed.  But there came a burst
 of light.
 
 "Hold on!" said Gabriel, taking the sheaf from her shoulder, and
 grasping her arm again.
 
 Heaven opened then, indeed.  The flash was almost too novel for its
 inexpressibly dangerous nature to be at once realized, and they could
 only comprehend the magnificence of its beauty.  It sprang from
 east, west, north, south, and was a perfect dance of death.  The
--**--**--
 
 
 RAIN--ONE SOLITARY MEETS ANOTHER
 
 
 It was now five o'clock, and the dawn was promising to break in hues
 of drab and ash.
 
 The air changed its temperature and stirred itself more vigorously.
 Cool breezes coursed in transparent eddies round Oak's face.  The
 wind shifted yet a point or two and blew stronger.  In ten minutes
 every wind of heaven seemed to be roaming at large.  Some of the
 thatching on the wheat-stacks was now whirled fantastically aloft,
 and had to be replaced and weighted with some rails that lay near at
 hand.  This done, Oak slaved away again at the barley.  A huge drop
 of rain smote his face, the wind snarled round every corner, the
 trees rocked to the bases of their trunks, and the twigs clashed in
 strife.  Driving in spars at any point and on any system, inch by
 inch he covered more and more safely from ruin this distracting
 impersonation of seven hundred pounds.  The rain came on in earnest,
 and Oak soon felt the water to be tracking cold and clammy routes
 down his back.  Ultimately he was reduced well-nigh to a homogeneous
 sop, and the dyes of his clothes trickled down and stood in a pool
 at the foot of the ladder.  The rain stretched obliquely through the
 dull atmosphere in liquid spines, unbroken in continuity between
 their beginnings in the clouds and their points in him.
 
 Oak suddenly remembered that eight months before this time he had
 been fighting against fire in the same spot as desperately as he
 was fighting against water now--and for a futile love of the same
 woman.  As for her--But Oak was generous and true, and dismissed
 his reflections.
 
 It was about seven o'clock in the dark leaden morning when Gabriel
 came down from the last stack, and thankfully exclaimed, "It is
--**--**--
 without further speech, some early-withered leaves from the trees
 which hooded the road at this spot occasionally spinning downward
 across their path to the earth.
 
 A woman appeared on the brow of the hill.  The ridge was in a
 cutting, so that she was very near the husband and wife before she
 became visible.  Troy had turned towards the gig to remount, and
 whilst putting his foot on the step the woman passed behind him.
 
 Though the overshadowing trees and the approach of eventide enveloped
 them in gloom, Bathsheba could see plainly enough to discern the
 extreme poverty of the woman's garb, and the sadness of her face.
 
 "Please, sir, do you know at what time Casterbridge Union-house
 closes at night?"
 
 The woman said these words to Troy over his shoulder.
 
 Troy started visibly at the sound of the voice; yet he seemed to
 recover presence of mind sufficient to prevent himself from giving
 way to his impulse to suddenly turn and face her.  He said, slowly--
 
 "I don't know."
 
 The woman, on hearing him speak, quickly looked up, examined the side
 of his face, and recognized the soldier under the yeoman's garb.  Her
 face was drawn into an expression which had gladness and agony both
 among its elements.  She uttered an hysterical cry, and fell down.
 
 "Oh, poor thing!" exclaimed Bathsheba, instantly preparing to alight.
 
 "Stay where you are, and attend to the horse!" said Troy,
 peremptorily throwing her the reins and the whip.  "Walk the horse
 to the top: I'll see to the woman."
 
 "But I--"
 
 "Do you hear?  Clk--Poppet!"
 
 The horse, gig, and Bathsheba moved on.
 
 "How on earth did you come here?  I thought you were miles away, or
 dead!  Why didn't you write to me?" said Troy to the woman, in a
 strangely gentle, yet hurried voice, as he lifted her up.
--**--**--
 there became visible a dim white shape; it was another milestone.
 She drew her fingers across its face to feel the marks.
 
 "Two more!" she said.
 
 She leant against the stone as a means of rest for a short interval,
 then bestirred herself, and again pursued her way.  For a slight
 distance she bore up bravely, afterwards flagging as before.  This
 was beside a lone copsewood, wherein heaps of white chips strewn upon
 the leafy ground showed that woodmen had been faggoting and making
 hurdles during the day.  Now there was not a rustle, not a breeze,
 not the faintest clash of twigs to keep her company.  The woman
 looked over the gate, opened it, and went in.  Close to the entrance
 stood a row of faggots, bound and un-bound, together with stakes of
 all sizes.
 
 For a few seconds the wayfarer stood with that tense stillness which
 signifies itself to be not the end, but merely the suspension, of
 a previous motion.  Her attitude was that of a person who listens,
 either to the external world of sound, or to the imagined discourse
 of thought.  A close criticism might have detected signs proving that
 she was intent on the latter alternative.  Moreover, as was shown by
 what followed, she was oddly exercising the faculty of invention upon
 the speciality of the clever Jacquet Droz, the designer of automatic
 substitutes for human limbs.
 
 By the aid of the Casterbridge aurora, and by feeling with her hands,
 the woman selected two sticks from the heaps.  These sticks were
 nearly straight to the height of three or four feet, where each
 branched into a fork like the letter Y.  She sat down, snapped off
 the small upper twigs, and carried the remainder with her into the
 road.  She placed one of these forks under each arm as a crutch,
--**--**--
 posture, and, resting her two little arms upon the shoulders of the
 dog, leant firmly thereon, and murmured stimulating words.  Whilst
 she sorrowed in her heart she cheered with her voice, and what was
 stranger than that the strong should need encouragement from the weak
 was that cheerfulness should be so well stimulated by such utter
 dejection.  Her friend moved forward slowly, and she with small
 mincing steps moved forward beside him, half her weight being thrown
 upon the animal.  Sometimes she sank as she had sunk from walking
 erect, from the crutches, from the rails.  The dog, who now
 thoroughly understood her desire and her incapacity, was frantic in
 his distress on these occasions; he would tug at her dress and run
 forward.  She always called him back, and it was now to be observed
 that the woman listened for human sounds only to avoid them.  It was
 evident that she had an object in keeping her presence on the road
 and her forlorn state unknown.
 
 Their progress was necessarily very slow.  They reached the bottom
 of the town, and the Casterbridge lamps lay before them like fallen
 Pleiads as they turned to the left into the dense shade of a deserted
 avenue of chestnuts, and so skirted the borough.  Thus the town was
 passed, and the goal was reached.
 
 On this much-desired spot outside the town rose a picturesque
 building.  Originally it had been a mere case to hold people.  The
 shell had been so thin, so devoid of excrescence, and so closely
 drawn over the accommodation granted, that the grim character of what
 was beneath showed through it, as the shape of a body is visible
 under a winding-sheet.
 
 Then Nature, as if offended, lent a hand.  Masses of ivy grew up,
 completely covering the walls, till the place looked like an abbey;
--**--**--
 all!  Ah! once I felt I could be content with nothing less than the
 highest homage from the husband I should choose.  Now, anything
 short of cruelty will content me.  Yes! the independent and spirited
 Bathsheba is come to this!"
 
 "For Heaven's sake don't be so desperate!" Troy said, snappishly,
 rising as he did so, and leaving the room.
 
 Directly he had gone, Bathsheba burst into great sobs--dry-eyed sobs,
 which cut as they came, without any softening by tears.  But she
 determined to repress all evidences of feeling.  She was conquered;
 but she would never own it as long as she lived.  Her pride was
 indeed brought low by despairing discoveries of her spoliation by
 marriage with a less pure nature than her own.  She chafed to and fro
 in rebelliousness, like a caged leopard; her whole soul was in arms,
 and the blood fired her face.  Until she had met Troy, Bathsheba had
 been proud of her position as a woman; it had been a glory to her to
 know that her lips had been touched by no man's on earth--that her
 waist had never been encircled by a lover's arm.  She hated herself
 now.  In those earlier days she had always nourished a secret
 contempt for girls who were the slaves of the first good-looking
 young fellow who should choose to salute them.  She had never taken
 kindly to the idea of marriage in the abstract as did the majority of
 women she saw about her.  In the turmoil of her anxiety for her lover
 she had agreed to marry him; but the perception that had accompanied
 her happiest hours on this account was rather that of self-sacrifice
 than of promotion and honour.  Although she scarcely knew the
 divinity's name, Diana was the goddess whom Bathsheba instinctively
--**--**--
 
 "Not a word, mistress, I assure 'ee!" he said.  "Hardly anybody in
 the parish knows the news yet."
 
 "I wonder why Gabriel didn't bring the message to me himself.  He
 mostly makes a point of seeing me upon the most trifling errand."
 These words were merely murmured, and she was looking upon the
 ground.
 
 "Perhaps he was busy, ma'am," Joseph suggested.  "And sometimes he
 seems to suffer from things upon his mind, connected with the time
 when he was better off than 'a is now.  'A's rather a curious item,
 but a very understanding shepherd, and learned in books."
 
 "Did anything seem upon his mind whilst he was speaking to you about
 this?"
 
 "I cannot but say that there did, ma'am.  He was terrible down, and
 so was Farmer Boldwood."
 
 "Thank you, Joseph.  That will do.  Go on now, or you'll be late."
 
 Bathsheba, still unhappy, went indoors again.  In the course of the
 afternoon she said to Liddy, who had been informed of the occurrence,
 "What was the colour of poor Fanny Robin's hair?  Do you know?  I
 cannot recollect--I only saw her for a day or two."
 
 "It was light, ma'am; but she wore it rather short, and packed away
 under her cap, so that you would hardly notice it.  But I have seen
 her let it down when she was going to bed, and it looked beautiful
 then.  Real golden hair."
 
 "Her young man was a soldier, was he not?"
 
 "Yes.  In the same regiment as Mr. Troy.  He says he knew him very
 well."
 
 "What, Mr. Troy says so?  How came he to say that?"
 
 "One day I just named it to him, and asked him if he knew Fanny's
 young man.  He said, 'Oh yes, he knew the young man as well as he
--**--**--
 
 "Ay--I've heard of it.  And so she's nailed up in parish boards after
 all, and nobody to pay the bell shilling and the grave half-crown."
 
 "The parish pays the grave half-crown, but not the bell shilling,
 because the bell's a luxery: but 'a can hardly do without the grave,
 poor body.  However, I expect our mistress will pay all."
 
 "A pretty maid as ever I see!  But what's yer hurry, Joseph?  The
 pore woman's dead, and you can't bring her to life, and you may as
 well sit down comfortable, and finish another with us."
 
 "I don't mind taking just the least thimbleful ye can dream of more
 with ye, sonnies.  But only a few minutes, because 'tis as 'tis."
 
 "Of course, you'll have another drop.  A man's twice the man
 afterwards.  You feel so warm and glorious, and you whop and slap at
 your work without any trouble, and everything goes on like sticks
 a-breaking.  Too much liquor is bad, and leads us to that horned man
 in the smoky house; but after all, many people haven't the gift of
 enjoying a wet, and since we be highly favoured with a power that
 way, we should make the most o't."
 
 "True," said Mark Clark.  "'Tis a talent the Lord has mercifully
 bestowed upon us, and we ought not to neglect it. But, what with the
 parsons and clerks and school-people and serious tea-parties, the
 merry old ways of good life have gone to the dogs--upon my carcase,
 they have!"
 
 "Well, really, I must be onward again now," said Joseph.
 
 "Now, now, Joseph; nonsense!  The poor woman is dead, isn't she, and
 what's your hurry?"
 
 "Well, I hope Providence won't be in a way with me for my doings,"
 said Joseph, again sitting down.  "I've been troubled with weak
--**--**--
 her, and that she is a member of the flock of Christ."
 
 The parson's words spread into the heavy air with a sad yet
 unperturbed cadence, and Gabriel shed an honest tear.  Bathsheba
 seemed unmoved.  Mr. Thirdly then left them, and Gabriel lighted
 a lantern.  Fetching three other men to assist him, they bore the
 unconscious truant indoors, placing the coffin on two benches in the
 middle of a little sitting-room next the hall, as Bathsheba directed.
 
 Every one except Gabriel Oak then left the room.  He still
 indecisively lingered beside the body.  He was deeply troubled at the
 wretchedly ironical aspect that circumstances were putting on with
 regard to Troy's wife, and at his own powerlessness to counteract
 them.  In spite of his careful manoeuvering all this day, the very
 worst event that could in any way have happened in connection with
 the burial had happened now.  Oak imagined a terrible discovery
 resulting from this afternoon's work that might cast over Bathsheba's
 life a shade which the interposition of many lapsing years might but
 indifferently lighten, and which nothing at all might altogether
 remove.
 
 Suddenly, as in a last attempt to save Bathsheba from, at any rate,
 immediate anguish, he looked again, as he had looked before, at the
 chalk writing upon the coffin-lid.  The scrawl was this simple one,
 "FANNY ROBIN AND CHILD."  Gabriel took his handkerchief and carefully
 rubbed out the two latter words, leaving visible the inscription
 "FANNY ROBIN" only.  He then left the room, and went out quietly by
 the front door.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER XLIII
 
 
 FANNY'S REVENGE
 
 
 "Do you want me any longer ma'am?" inquired Liddy, at a later hour
 the same evening, standing by the door with a chamber candlestick in
 her hand and addressing Bathsheba, who sat cheerless and alone in the
 large parlour beside the first fire of the season.
--**--**--
 
 Bathsheba trembled from head to foot.
 
 "I don't believe it!" she said, excitedly.  "And there's only one
 name written on the coffin-cover."
 
 "Nor I, ma'am.  And a good many others don't; for we should surely
 have been told more about it if it had been true--don't you think so,
 ma'am?"
 
 "We might or we might not."
 
 Bathsheba turned and looked into the fire, that Liddy might not see
 her face.  Finding that her mistress was going to say no more, Liddy
 glided out, closed the door softly, and went to bed.
 
 Bathsheba's face, as she continued looking into the fire that
 evening, might have excited solicitousness on her account even among
 those who loved her least.  The sadness of Fanny Robin's fate did not
 make Bathsheba's glorious, although she was the Esther to this poor
 Vashti, and their fates might be supposed to stand in some respects
 as contrasts to each other.  When Liddy came into the room a second
 time the beautiful eyes which met hers had worn a listless, weary
 look.  When she went out after telling the story they had expressed
 wretchedness in full activity.  Her simple country nature, fed on
 old-fashioned principles, was troubled by that which would have
 troubled a woman of the world very little, both Fanny and her child,
 if she had one, being dead.
 
 Bathsheba had grounds for conjecturing a connection between her own
 history and the dimly suspected tragedy of Fanny's end which Oak
 and Boldwood never for a moment credited her with possessing.  The
 meeting with the lonely woman on the previous Saturday night had been
 unwitnessed and unspoken of.  Oak may have had the best of intentions
 in withholding for as many days as possible the details of what had
 happened to Fanny; but had he known that Bathsheba's perceptions had